Global User Agreement
User Privacy Notice
Seller Policies
Payment Services Agreement for Sellers
Cookie Notice
FanProtect
®
Guarantee
Global User Agreement
Globally applicable StubHub International Marketplace Terms and Conditions.
Last Updated: April 24, 2024
1. Global User Agreement
StubHub International provides an online platform and related services (“
Services
”) that connects sellers and buyers seeking to respectively sell and buy tickets, related passes and merchandise or other related goods and/or services for events (“
Tickets
”) and we may make such Services available internationally via one or more of our websites, our mobile applications and/or associated services (collectively, the “
Site
”). By accessing or using our Site, you agree to be bound by this StubHub International Marketplace Global User Agreement (“
User Agreement
”). Our Payment Services Agreement, User Privacy Notice, Seller Policies, Cookie Notice, FanProtect Guarantee, and all other policies applicable to your use of the Site (collectively, the “
Additional Policies
”) are incorporated by reference into this User Agreement. We may periodically make changes to this User Agreement, and shall notify you by posting a revised version on our Site. The revised User Agreement will become effective upon publication, and your continued use of our Site and Services will constitute acceptance of the revised User Agreement.
2. Contracting Entity
2.1. When you purchase or sell tickets on our Site, you are contracting with Ticketbis S.L., a company registered in the Commercial Registry of Vizcaya, page number BI-5766,
    volume number 5184, sheet number 69. Ticketbis S.L. has its tax domicile and office located at 45 Gran Vía Don Diego López de Haro, 7th floor, 48.011 Bilbao, Biscay, Spain, and
    is registered with VAT number ES B95630034. Ticketbis S.L. is herein referred to as "
StubHub International
",
SHI
”, "we ","us ", or "our ".
2.2. Additionally, Hyperwallet payment services as listed within the Payment Services Agreement for Sellers
https://www.paylution.com/hw2web/consumer/page/legalAgreement.xhtml
.(“
SHI Services
”) is the entity that handles any and all payments and payouts on our Site. Accordingly, if you sell on our Site Tickets, you are contracting Services subject to the terms of the Payment Services Agreement, in addition to contracting with Ticketbis S.L. (as applicable).
3. Ticket Marketplace
3.1. StubHub International is a ticket marketplace that allows registered users to buy (in this capacity, "
Buyer
") and sell (in this capacity, “
Seller
”) Tickets. The Seller (and not SHI) sets the prices for the Tickets. As a marketplace, StubHub International does not own the Tickets sold on the Site. Ticket prices may exceed the face value of the Ticket.
3.2. While StubHub International may provide pricing, shipping, listing and other guidance on the Site, such guidance is solely informational (without any warranty as to accuracy). Also, while we may help facilitate the resolution of disputes between Buyer and Seller and provide the FanProtect Guarantee, StubHub International has no control over and does not guarantee the existence, quality, safety or legality of the Tickets; the truth or accuracy of the user’s content or listings; the ability of Sellers to sell tickets or Buyers to pay for them; or that a Buyer or Seller will complete a transaction.
4. Your Account
4.1. In order to list, sell or purchase Tickets you must register an account ("
Account
") with StubHub International. You must be at least 18 years old and must be able to enter legally binding contracts. If you are registering with StubHub International for a business entity, you represent that you have the authority to legally bind that entity.
4.2. When opening an Account, you must provide complete and accurate information and provide us with a valid credit card, debit card or PayPal account ("Payment Method"). If your registration or payment information changes at any time, you must promptly update your details in your Account. You acknowledge that StubHub International may charge any one of your payment methods on file for amounts you owe us, costs we incur or other losses arising out of your violation of this Agreement (including the Additional Policies).
4.3. StubHub International reserves the right to temporarily or permanently suspend Accounts with incomplete or inaccurate information.
4.4. You are solely responsible for maintaining the confidentiality of your Account information and password. You are solely responsible for any activity relating to your Account. Your Account is not transferable to another party.
4.5. In order to check the data in the system and public databases to detect suspicious behavior, StubHub International may ask you for additional identifying documentation. These documents must be original copies of your identity document and may not have been altered. This is in compliance with applicable privacy policies.
5. Privacy and Communications
All communications between you and StubHub International (including our service providers, our parent company or our affiliates) are subject to our
User Privacy Notice
.
6. Fees and Other Charges
6.1. StubHub International may charge fees for selling and/or buying Tickets through our Site and/or otherwise using our Services, as well as delivery or fulfilment fees (collectively referred to as "
Service Fees
"). Service Fees may vary depending on event type, Ticket type and location. StubHub International may in its sole and absolute discretion change its Service Fees at any time, including after you list your Tickets. Any applicable Service Fees including any taxes if applicable will be disclosed to you prior to listing or buying a Ticket. StubHub International may charge and/or retain Service Fees if you do not fulfil your contractual obligations under this User Agreement.
6.2. If you as a Seller do not fulfil your contractual obligations under this User Agreement and the
Seller Policies
, SHI may charge you certain fees and/or costs in accordance with the
Seller Policies
.
6.3. If you as a Buyer change your postal address after you have purchased your Ticket(s) and require StubHub International to deliver your Ticket(s) to this new postal address, or if you have specified an incorrect postal address, StubHub International may charge you for any
additional delivery costs
which arise out of re-arranging the delivery of your Ticket(s) to the new or correct postal address. Such additional delivery costs may be charged to your Payment Method.
6.4. We may collect amounts owed using a collection agency or other collection mechanism and you may be charged fees associated with collecting the delinquent payments. StubHub International, or the collection agency it retains, may also report information about your account to credit bureaus, and as a result, defaults in your account may be reflected in your credit report. If you wish to dispute the information StubHub International reported to a credit bureau, please contact StubHub International. If you wish to dispute the information a collection agency reported, contact the collection agency directly.
6.5. Debt Maintenance Commission: Users of StubHub International who have an outstanding balance owed to them by SHI and fail to provide the required banking information will be subject to an annual Maintenance Fee of €35 or the equivalent amount in their currency. This fee is applied to cover the maintenance costs associated with the outstanding amount owed to the user by StubHub International and will be invoiced annually. In the event of no contact with StubHub International by the user, the company reserves the right to take further actions, such as suspending or canceling the user's account, until the full outstanding payment has been made to the user by SHI.
7. Selling Tickets
7.1. You must comply with all applicable laws and regulations and the terms of this User Agreement and the
Seller Policies
when listing, selling and delivering your Tickets.
7.2. When listing a Ticket you must set a price for which you are willing to sell your Ticket ("
Sales Price
"). You may modify (e.g., raise or lower the Sales Price) or delete your listing at any time until the Tickets have been sold.
7.3. By listing a Ticket for sale, you are making a binding offer to sell that Ticket to a Buyer who purchases the Ticket at the Sales Price. When a Buyer accepts your offer by purchasing your Ticket through our Site, you are contractually bound to deliver that exact Ticket for Sales Price and within the required delivery timeframe. You are obligated to monitor your inventory and ensure all listings are accurate. Under no circumstances may Sellers cancel orders at one price and repost the same tickets for a higher price. Failure to fulfill your orders will lead to charges as stated in this User Agreement and
Seller Policies
.
7.4. StubHub International does not guarantee that your tickets or related passes will sell or that your listing will appear on the Site within a certain time after it is posted or in a particular order on the event page or through search results. StubHub International will not, for any reason, provide compensation for tickets that do not sell, even if it is due to Site unavailability from an outage or maintenance or listing delays.
7.5. The Seller shall be the one to determine the selling price of each Ticket. However, in some countries maximum price restrictions may apply to the offer, depending on the location of the event. Therefore, SHI is not responsible for Seller’s compliance with any legal restrictions placed on the sale of the Ticket, whether in the Seller’s home city or country or any applicable Laws.
8. Taxes
You as a Seller are responsible for determining whether any taxes are due on your sale of a Ticket, and for collecting and remitting such taxes. Any applicable taxes must be included in the Sales Price of your Ticket. You agree to provide StubHub International any tax identification number if necessary for StubHub International to provide (without notice to You) information to the relevant tax authorities related to payments you receive from us and further authorize SHI to release that information to the relevant tax authorities. The Service Fees include any applicable sales, use, excise, value added, service and other indirect taxes.
9. Buying Tickets
9.1. You are responsible for reading the complete listing before making a commitment to buy Tickets. When placing an order, you are entering into a
binding contract
with the Seller to purchase those Tickets. Additional terms communicated to you by the Seller may apply. Payment is remitted to StubHub International and disbursed to the seller according to our Payment Services Agreement for Sellers or the User Agreement.
All Orders are final
.
You cannot change or cancel any orders after the sale is confirmed.
9.2. StubHub International Marketplace features a large volume of listed tickets and StubHub International takes significant measures to prevent pricing errors. However, in the rare event of a pricing error, StubHub International cannot be held liable for the error. In such cases, if a ticket is affected by a pricing error, StubHub International reserves the right to offer the tickets to you at the corrected price. If you find the corrected price unacceptable, you have the option to cancel your order.
9.3. StubHub International reserves the right to change the delivery method, at its sole discretion. Tickets can be delivered up to the event start time indicated on the tickets. In the event that the delivery method undergoes a change prior to delivery, StubHub International will not charge any additional delivery fees to the buyer. However, despite our commitment to delivering the tickets as soon as possible, there may be external factors beyond our control or the seller's control that could prevent orders from being delivered in a timely manner.
9.4. Upon placing your order, you (i) acknowledge that sales are subject to our final sale terms, including the refund, postponement and cancellation policies as stated throughout these terms; (ii) you acknowledge that StubHub International does not offer “buyer’s remorse” refunds; and (iii) you authorize StubHub International to charge your method of payment for the total amount, which includes the ticket price, service and delivery fees, and any applicable taxes.
By accepting these conditions, you are acknowledging and agreeing not to engage in any actions aimed at evading, avoiding, or bypassing the limitations placed on your right to receive a full or partial refund as specified in these terms. Furthermore, you agree not to initiate a "chargeback" with your payment card issuer for valid charges, meaning that if our decision to deny a refund or credit for a ticket purchase is in accordance with the sale terms provided, or in any other case, you will refrain from seeking a chargeback directly from your payment card issuer.
In the event that you dispute a charge with the card issuer and it is determined that the charge in question is valid and not the result of credit card or payment fraud, StubHub International retains the following rights:
(i) The company has the right to pursue payment, along with any applicable fees, through legal means as necessary, which may include employing collection agencies and initiating legal proceedings.
(ii) StubHub International reserves the right to decline pending and future ticket purchases made using credit card accounts or online accounts associated with previous chargebacks. Moreover, the company may prohibit individuals named on the credit card accounts, those who access related online accounts or credit cards, or anyone who breaches this provision from making future purchases.
10. Payments
10.1. Payments received from Buyers for Tickets purchased via the Site are processed by StubHub International on behalf of the Seller and credited to the Seller in accordance with the
Seller Policies
and
Payment Services Agreement
(as applicable). Without prejudice or limitation to the Payment Services Agreement, Seller appoints the relevant SHI entity as its limited payment collection agent solely for the purpose of accepting funds from Buyers on behalf of Seller. Seller agrees that any payment made by Buyer to StubHub International shall be considered the same as a payment made directly to Seller, and Seller will make the Tickets available to Buyer in the agreed-upon manner as if Seller had received the payment directly from Buyer. Except as otherwise specified in the FanProtect Guarantee, Seller understands that StubHub’s International obligation to pay Seller is subject to and conditional upon successful receipt of the associated payments from Buyer. In accepting appointment as the limited payment collection agent of the seller, StubHub International assumes no liability for any acts or omissions of the Seller.
10.2. Payments from Buyers are due and payable immediately. A Buyer can pay the full order amount which includes any applicable Service Fees and taxes using one of the accepted payment methods.
10.3. A Buyer’s obligation to pay for a Ticket is satisfied when StubHub International has received the Payment in full.
11. Event Cancellations, Postponement and Other Event Changes
11.1.
Cancellation:
If an event is cancelled and not rescheduled, we will remove the event and any listings related to the event from our Site and inform both Buyer and Seller about the cancellation with further instructions. If the Seller requires his Ticket(s) back to obtain a refund of the original purchase price from the promoter or organizer, he must contact
Customer Service
immediately after the cancellation. The Buyer is required to retain the Ticket(s) and upon request from StubHub International to send them back to either the Seller or to StubHub International (as instructed by SHI). The Buyer will receive a full refund or credit for use on a future purchase, as determined in SHI’s sole discretion (unless a refund is required by law) once he has sent back the Ticket(s) (if applicable) and the Seller will not be paid. If the Seller has already been paid, the payment for the sale may be recovered by charging the Seller's Payment Method or by setting off this amount against pending payments for other Tickets the Seller has sold or will sell in the future.
11.2.
Postponement:
If an event is postponed, StubHub International will work with Buyers and Sellers on a case-by-case basis attempting to resolve any Ticket issues. Sellers are prohibited from reselling, invalidating or changing Tickets for postponed events. Refunds will not be issued for postponed events, unless they are ultimately canceled as stated above.
11.3.
Other event changes:
StubHub International is not responsible for partial performances, venue, line-up or time changes. No refunds will be issued in these instances.
12. Term and Termination
12.1. This User Agreement shall commence on the date that you register an Account with StubHub International and will continue for an indefinite period unless terminated in accordance with these provisions.
12.2. You may terminate this User Agreement at any time by contacting
Customer Service
. In the event that you request that we close your Account, we will treat your request as termination of this User Agreement. Without limiting our rights according to Clause 19, we may terminate this User Agreement at any time by giving at least thirty (30) days’ notice via email to your registered email address. We will then close your Account.
12.3. If you terminate this User Agreement as a Seller you are also terminating the Payment Services Agreement (to the extent applicable) as of the time of the termination of the User Agreement taking effect.
12.4. Termination of this User Agreement shall not affect the rights or liabilities of either party accrued prior to and including the date of termination or expiry and/or any terms intended expressly or by implication to survive termination or expiry.
13. Site Changes and Availability
StubHub International reserves the right at any time to modify or discontinue, temporarily or permanently, the Site, the Services or any part of the Site or Services with or without notice for any reason. StubHub International performs regularly-scheduled maintenance. While we do our best to avoid customer impact, the Site or our Services may be temporarily unavailable during maintenance periods.
14. Abusing StubHub International
When using our Site and Services, you agree that you will
not
do any of the following:
contact or invite contact with other StubHub International users for any reason other than the purpose for which you received the StubHub International user’s contact information or solicit sales outside of StubHub International;
use the Buyer's personal data for any reason other than the delivery of Tickets unless otherwise agreed to by the Buyer;
behave in an abusive manner to any StubHub International employee or other user;
violate any venue or event promoter rules at events or violate any applicable third party terms of service (for instance, when using our mobile applications);
breach or circumvent any laws (including, where Tickets are sold internationally, the laws of the destination country), third party rights or our Additional Policies;
post false, inaccurate, misleading, defamatory or libelous content;
fail to fulfil your contractual obligations regarding the sale or purchase of a Ticket;
use SHI's trademarks without our prior written permission;
copy, reproduce, reverse engineer, modify, create derivative works from, distribute or publicly display any content (except for your information) or software from our Site or Services without the prior express written permission of StubHub International and the appropriate third party, as applicable;
use any robot, spider, scraper or other automated means to access our Site or Services for any purpose without our express written permission;
take any action that imposes or may impose (to be determined in our sole discretion) an unreasonable or disproportionately large load on our infrastructure;
interfere or attempt to interfere with the proper working of our Site or Services or any activities conducted on or with our Site or Services;
bypass our robot exclusion headers, robots.txt rules or any other measures we may use to prevent or restrict access to our Site or Services;
commercialize any StubHub International application or any information or software associated with such application;
export or re-export any StubHub International application or tool except in compliance with the export control laws of any relevant jurisdiction and in accordance with posted rules and restrictions; or
do anything else that StubHub International determines, in its sole reasonable discretion, misuses the Site or Services or otherwise negatively impacts our marketplace.
In our effort to protect our Buyers and Sellers we may screen ticket sales or listings for signs of fraud using algorithms or automated systems, which may result in automatic cancellation of listings or sales and temporary or permanent suspension of accounts. If your transaction is cancelled in error, or your account suspended in error, please contact us and we may reinstate your Account or listing, in our sole discretion.
15. Mobile Device Terms
If you are accessing the Site or Services through a mobile application (“
App
”), the following additional terms apply:
15.1. App Use. StubHub International grants you the right to use the App only for your personal use. You must comply with all applicable laws and third party terms of agreement when using the App (e.g. your wireless data service agreement). The App may not contain the same functionality available on the applicable StubHub International website.
15.2. Intellectual Property – Apps. StubHub International owns, or is the licensee to, all right, title, and interest in and to its Apps, including all rights under patent, copyright, trade secret, trademark, or unfair competition law, and any and all other proprietary rights, including all applications, renewals, extensions, and restorations thereof. You will not modify, adapt, translate, prepare derivative works from, decompile, reverse-engineer, disassemble, or otherwise attempt to derive source code from any App and you will not remove, obscure, or alter SHI's copyright notice, trademarks or other proprietary rights notices affixed to, contained within, or accessed in conjunction with or by the App.
15.3. Prohibited Countries Policy and Foreign Trade Regulation - Applications. The App or its underlying technology may not be downloaded to or exported or re-exported: (a) into (or to a resident or national of) Burma (Myanmar), Cuba, Iraq, Iran, Libya, North Korea, Sudan, Syria, or any other country subject to United States embargo; (b) to anyone on the US Treasury Department's list of Specially Designated Nationals or on the US Commerce Department's Denied Party or Entity List; and (c) to any prohibited country, person, end-user, or entity specified by US Export Laws. When using the App, you are responsible for complying with trade regulations and both foreign and domestic laws (e.g., you are not located in a country that is subject to a US Government embargo, or that has been designated by the US Government as a "terrorist supporting" country, and you are not listed on any US Government list of prohibited or restricted parties).
15.4. Device Specific Additional Terms
iOS – Apple
These Mobile Device Terms are an agreement between you and StubHub International, and not with Apple. Apple is not responsible for the App and the content thereof.
StubHub International grants you the right to use the App only on an iOS product that you own or control and as permitted by the App Store Terms of Service.
Apple has no obligation whatsoever to furnish any maintenance and support services with respect to the App.
Apple is not responsible for the investigation, defense, settlement, and discharge of any third-party intellectual property infringement claim.
Apple is not responsible for addressing any claims by you or any third party relating to the App or your possession and/or use of the App, including but not limited to: (a) product liability claims; (b) any claim that the App fails to conform to any applicable legal or regulatory requirement; and (c) claims arising under consumer protection or similar legislation.
In the event of any failure of the App to conform to any applicable warranty, you may notify Apple, and Apple will refund the purchase price, if applicable, for the App to you; and to the maximum extent permitted by applicable law, Apple will have no other warranty obligation whatsoever with respect to the App.
Apple and Apple's subsidiaries are third party beneficiaries of these Mobile Device Terms, and, upon your acceptance, Apple as a third-party beneficiary thereof will have the right (and will be deemed to have accepted the right) to enforce these Mobile Device Terms against you.
Android – Google
These Mobile Device Terms are an agreement between you and StubHub International, and not with Google. Google is not responsible for the App and the content thereof.
StubHub International grants you the right to use the App only on an Android product that you own or control and as permitted by the Google Play Terms of Service.
Google has no obligation whatsoever to furnish any maintenance and support services with respect to the App.
Google is not responsible for the investigation, defense, settlement, and discharge of any third-party intellectual property infringement claim.
Google is not responsible for addressing any claims by you or any third party relating to the App or your possession and/or use of the App, including but not limited to: (a) product liability claims; (b) any claim that the Application fails to conform to any applicable legal or regulatory requirement; and (c) claims arising under consumer protection or similar legislation.
In the event of any failure of the App to conform to any applicable warranty, you may notify Google, and Google will refund the purchase price, if applicable, for the App to you; and to the maximum extent permitted by applicable law, Google will have no other warranty obligation whatsoever with respect to the App.
Google and Google's subsidiaries are third party beneficiaries of these Mobile Device Terms, and, upon your acceptance, Google as a third-party beneficiary thereof will have the right (and will be deemed to have accepted the right) to enforce these Mobile Device Terms against you.
16. Content
16.1. You own and are solely responsible for any content including images, text, audio or other materials that you submit (
“User Content”
). By submitting User Content, you grant us a non-exclusive, worldwide, perpetual (or for the duration of any copyright or other rights in such content), irrevocable, royalty-free, transferable, sublicensable (through multiple tiers) right to use, reproduce, distribute, create derivative works from, publicly perform, display, store, or publish in any way, in any media known now or in the future. You grant StubHub International the right to use your name or image in association with your User Content, if we so choose. Further, to the fullest extent permitted under applicable law, you waive your moral rights in the content and promise not to assert such rights against us, our sublicensees or assignees.
16.2. You represent and warrant that the User Content: (a) is owned by you or you control all necessary rights to it; (b) does not violate, misappropriate or infringe on the rights of any third party including intellectual property rights, privacy rights or publicity rights; (c) is accurate, not obscene, false, libelous or defamatory; and (d) will not cause injury to any person, entity or system. You will indemnify StubHub International for any and all claims resulting from your User Content. StubHub International has the right but not the obligation to monitor, edit or remove your User Content. The User Content is non-confidential and StubHub International will not be liable for its use or disclosure.
16.3. We may offer catalogues of stock images, descriptions and product specifications, which are provided by third-parties (including StubHub International users). You may use catalogue content solely in connection with your StubHub International listings during the time your listings are on our Site. While we try to offer reliable data, we cannot promise that the catalogues will always be accurate and up-to-date, and you agree that you will not hold our catalogue providers or us responsible for inaccuracies in their catalogues. The catalogue may include copyrighted, trademarked or other proprietary materials. You agree not to remove any copyright, proprietary or identification markings included within the catalogues or create any derivative works based on catalogue content (other than by including them in your listings).
16.4. If you submit ideas, suggestions, documents, and/or proposals (
“Ideas”
) to StubHub International, you do so voluntarily and with no expectation of confidentiality. By submitting Ideas, you grant us ownership of the Ideas to use for any purpose, in any way, in any media now known or in the future and throughout the universe without any obligation or payment. You understand that StubHub International may have something similar to the Ideas under consideration or in development.
17. Protecting Intellectual Property Rights
StubHub International places high value on intellectual property rights and promptly addresses notices of alleged infringement.
If you come across material on our Site or Services that you genuinely believe violates your copyright or other intellectual property rights, please get in touch with our Customer Service team and we will conduct a thorough investigation.
You may submit a Notice of Claimed Infringement to SHI, providing the following information:
The physical or electronic signature of a person authorized to act on behalf of the owner of the exclusive right allegedly infringed.
Identification or description of the copyrighted work or other intellectual property you claim has been infringed. If it pertains to an intellectual property right other than copyright (e.g., trademark or patent), please specify.
Identification or description of the location of the material you assert is infringing on StubHub International. Provide sufficient detail for us to locate it on the Site, including, wherever possible, the URL.
A concise description of how the contested content infringes on the owner’s intellectual property rights.
Your address, telephone number, and email address.
A statement by you affirming that you hold a good faith belief that the use of the material in question, as complained of, is not authorized by the copyright or intellectual property owner, its agent, or the law.
A statement, made under penalty of perjury, confirming the accuracy of the information in the notification and asserting that you are either the copyright or intellectual property owner or are authorized to act on the owner’s behalf.
18. Violating the Agreement
18.1. We may investigate any potential or suspected violations of the User Agreement, Additional Policies, security protocols or best practices, third-party rights or applicable law, any actions or any other misconduct or potential abuse on or through the Services or attempts. When assessing whether and which measure(s) to take against a user, we will take the legitimate interests of the user into account and shall in particular consider if the user is responsible for the misconduct.
18.2. We may take any actions we deem appropriate in our reasonable discretion for the conduct described in 18.1. Without limiting other remedies, these actions may include: limit, or temporarily or permanently suspend, or terminate our services and Accounts, restrict or prohibit access to, and your activities on, our Site and/or Services, remove listings, require you to edit listings, cancel sales, require you to send Tickets to a Buyer within a specified time, delay or remove hosted content, remove any special status associated with an Account, reduce or eliminate any discounts, withhold payment, charge the Payment Method on file for amounts you owe or costs we incur due to your misconduct (including, without limitation, any costs associated with collection of delinquent Accounts or chargebacks and any replacement costs), and take technical and legal steps to keep you from using our Site and/or Services.
18.3. We reserve the right to report any activity that we believe to be illegal or otherwise in contravention of this User Agreement and we will respond to any verified requests relating to a criminal investigation (i.e. a subpoena, court order or substantially similar legal procedure) from local and foreign law enforcement or regulatory agencies, other government officials or authorized third-parties.
19. Disclaimer of Warranties; Limitation of Liability
19.1. YOU UNDERSTAND AND AGREE THAT YOU ARE MAKING USE OF THE SITE AND SERVICES ON AN ‘AS IS’ AND ‘AS AVAILABLE’ BASIS. STUBHUB INTERNATIONAL MAKES NO WARRANTY WITH RESPECT TO ITS SOFTWARE, SERVICES, SITE, ANY TICKETS, ANY EVENT, ANY USER CONTENT, OR THAT SELLERS OR BUYERS WILL PERFORM AS PROMISED. ACCORDINGLY, TO THE MAXIMUM EXTENT PERMITTED BY APPLICABLE LAW AND EXCEPT AS SPECIFICALLY PROVIDED IN THIS USER AGREEMENT AND IN OUR FANPROTECT GUARANTEE, WE DISCLAIM ALL WARRANTIES, EXPRESS OR IMPLIED, OF MERCHANTABILITY, FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE, TITLE, OR NON-INFRINGEMENT.
19.2. IN ADDITION, TO THE MAXIMUM EXTENT PERMITTED BY LAW, STUBHUB INTERNATIONAL(INCLUSIVE OF ANY OF ITS SERVICE PROVIDERS AND LICENSORS) IS NOT LIABLE FOR: (A) ANY SPECIAL, INDIRECT, OR CONSEQUENTIAL DAMAGES; (B) LOSS OF: PROFITS, GOODWILL OR REPUTATION, OR OTHER INTANGIBLE LOSSES; (C) DAMAGES RELATING TO: (I) YOUR ACCESS TO, USE OF, OR INABILITY TO ACCESS OR USE THE SITE OR SERVICES; (II) VIRUSES OR OTHER MALICIOUS SOFTWARE OBTAINED BY ACCESSING OUR SITE OR SERVICES OR THOSE OF ANY SITE, SERVICES, OR TOOLS LINKED TO OUR SITE OR SERVICES; (III) ANY USER CONTENT OR CONTENT OF THIRD PARTIES, OR (IV) THE DURATION OR MANNER IN WHICH TICKETS YOU LIST APPEAR ON THE SITE OR SERVICES.
19.3. SOME JURISDICTIONS DO NOT ALLOW THE DISCLAIMER OF WARRANTIES OR EXCLUSION OF DAMAGES, SO SUCH DISCLAIMERS AND EXCLUSIONS MAY NOT APPLY TO YOU AND YOU MAY HAVE RIGHTS IN ADDITION TO THOSE CONTAINED IN THIS USER AGREEMENT. THIS IS ESPECIALLY SO IF YOU ARE A CONSUMER.
19.4. REGARDLESS OF THE PREVIOUS CLAUSES, OUR LIABILITY TO YOU OR TO ANY THIRD PARTY IS LIMITED TO THE GREATER OF (A) THE AMOUNT OF FEES IN DISPUTE NOT TO EXCEED THE TOTAL FEES WHICH YOU PAID TO US IN THE 12 MONTHS PRIOR TO THE ACTION GIVING RISE TO THE LIABILITY, OR (B) $200.
20. Applicable Laws and Jurisdiction
20.1. Any claim, dispute or matter arising under or in connection with this User Agreement shall be governed and construed
by the consumer protection provisions of the law of the member state in which you reside
.
20.2. If you are a consumer residing in the European Union, please note that we do not (and are not legally obliged to) participate in any alternative dispute resolution (
ADR
) procedures or services, unless otherwise (i) specified in the country-specific additional provisions below, and/or (ii) provided by law.
20.3. Any claims or disputes arising under or relating to these Terms and Conditions shall be settled through amicable negotiations between the parties involved. In the event that a dispute cannot be resolved through such negotiations, it shall be subject to the exclusive jurisdiction of the courts of Bilbao, Spain.
21. General Provisions
21.1. This User Agreement (and all documents incorporated by reference) constitutes the entire agreement between the parties pertaining to the subject matter hereof and supersedes all prior agreements and understandings between the parties hereto with respect to the subject matter hereof, whether written or oral. No amendment, modification or supplement of any provision of this User Agreement will be valid or effective unless made in accordance with the express terms of this User Agreement.
21.2. If any provision of this User Agreement is held to be invalid or unenforceable under any circumstances, its application in any other circumstances and the remaining provisions of this User Agreement shall not be affected.
21.3. We may assign or transfer our rights and obligations under this User Agreement at any time, provided that we assign the User Agreement on the same terms or terms that are no less advantageous to you. You may not assign or transfer this User Agreement, or any of its rights or obligations, without our prior written consent, which we can refuse in our sole discretion.
21.4. No agency, partnership, joint venture, employer-employee or franchisor-franchisee relationship is intended or created by this User Agreement, your use of the Site, or the provision of our Services. A person who is not a party to this User Agreement has no right to enforce any term of this User Agreement.
21.5. Nothing in this User Agreement is intended to confer benefits, rights or remedies unto any person or entity other than the parties hereto and their permitted successors and assigns.
21.6. The subject heading at the beginning of each paragraph of this User Agreement is for reference purposes only and in no way defines, limits, construes or describes the scope or extent of such paragraph.
21.7. Our failure to act with respect to a breach by you or others does not waive our right to act with respect to subsequent or similar breaches. We do not guarantee we will take action against all breaches of this User Agreement.
21.8. Legal notices to us shall be served by registered post to your relevant entity listed in Clause 2.1. We shall send notices to you by email to the email address you provide to us during the registration process. Notice to you shall be deemed given 24 hours after the email is sent, unless we are notified that the email address is invalid. Alternatively, we may give you legal notice by registered post to the postal address provided during registration. Notices sent to either party by registered post shall be deemed to have been received by that party three days after the date of mailing.
21.9 StubHub International is VAT-registered with the Zakat, Tax, and Customs Authority (ZATCA) for events held in the Kingdom of Saudi Arabia.
22. Force Majeure
StubHub International shall not be in default or otherwise liable under this User Agreement due to its inability to perform its obligations by reason of any fire, earthquake, flood, substantial snowstorm, epidemic, pandemic, accident, explosion, casualty, strike, lockout, labor controversy, riot, civil disturbance, act of public enemy, terrorism, cyber-terrorism, embargo, war, act of God, natural disaster, or any municipal, county, state or national ordinance or law, or any executive, administrative or judicial order (which order is not the result of any act or omission which would constitute a default by StubHub International hereunder), or any failure or delay of any transportation, power, or communications system or any other or similar cause not under SHI’s control (“Force Majeure”).
Return to top
·
Return to section
User Privacy Notice
User privacy notice
Last Updated: February 6, 2025
StubHub International is committed to your privacy. This Privacy Notice explains our collection, use, disclosure, retention and protection of your personal information and data.
Outline
This Privacy Notice applies to any StubHub International website, StubHub International Mobile Application Service (App), service, or tool (collectively, "Services") where this Privacy Notice is referenced, regardless of how you access or use them, for example, through mobile devices.
This Privacy Notice also applies to the provision of StubHub International services through any StubHub International partner website, application, service or tool where it is referenced or where your ads may be posted or advertised in accordance with the terms of this Privacy Notice.
StubHub International may modify this Privacy Notice at any time by posting the modified version on this site, including the effective date of the new version. We will post any significant changes to this Privacy Notice through the Service or by email.
Who processes your personal data?
StubHub International – by its corporate name, Ticketbis, S.L.- with company number B95630034 and registered office at Calle Gran Vía Diego López de Haro 7º, 45, Bilbao, 48011, Bizkaia – Spain, is the entity responsible for collecting, using, and/or processing data through this platform.
In addition, our specialized Data Protection team is here to assist you. Don't hesitate to contact them via email at
privacystubhub@stubhubinternational.com
.
What is personal data?
Personal data refers to any information about a person who can be directly or indirectly identified. This identification can be done using details like a name, identification number, location data, or online identifier, as well as factors related to the person's physical, physiological, genetic, mental, economic, cultural, or social identity.
It's important to note that we don't consider personal data to include anonymous or aggregated information that cannot be used to identify an individual, either on its own or when combined with other information.
Certain personal data, such as the information needed for identification or to facilitate your use of our services, is necessary for entering into our "Terms of Use." The disclosure of other personal data is voluntary.
For what purpose do we process your personal data?
Depending on the relationship we have with the user, the personal data collected, used and/or processed through our platform will be used for the following purposes:
Create user account and provide access credentials.
Send information about events and/or special offers.
Manage the purchase, sale, delivery and, where applicable, return of tickets.
Detect potentially fraudulent transactions.
To process claims, complaints, or incidents that you communicate to us.
To know your level satisfaction with the services we provide.
Adopt business decisions to optimize and guarantee the security of our services.
Manage requests for the exercise of rights over your personal data that you transfer to us.
With your consent, to transfer some of your personal data to third parties to allow these third parties to perform ad measurement services.
When you use the StubHub International Mobile Application Service (App), we will ask for permissions to access particular functions of your mobile device. The collected information serves various purposes based on the user relationship, and the data collected, used, and/or processed through our platform is employed for the following objectives:
To access precise location information, enhancing personalized experiences within the application, with authorization.
To access mobile device contact information with prior authorization.
To access calendar information, potentially aiding in event scheduling or reminders.
To access the camera or photo library with your consent.
To connect with third-party social networking services, with your approval.
What personal data do we collect?
In accordance with the abovementioned purposes, the categories of personal data we process are the following:
Identifying information
such as, for example, your first and last name or your identity card number.
Contact information
such as postal address, telephone number or your email address.
Means of payment
such as your credit card number.
Location data
such as your time zone or the country from which you connect to our platform.
Data on the purchase and/or sale of tickets
such as the type of event or the cost of the ticket.
Data from your devices
, such as your browser type or IP address.
Why we use your personal data?
In case you wish to create a user account on our platform or join our list to be informed of events or offers we have, we will process your personal data with your
consent
, which you can modify at any time by requesting the cancellation of the account.
In the event that you buy or sell tickets, it will be the
contractual relationship
you have with us that justifies the processing of data derived from it (claims, incidents, delivery, return, etc.).
Moreover, we will also need them to meet
legal obligations
, for example, if you exercise any of your rights over your data or we receive a request from a competent authority or body, and to satisfy our
legitimate interests
in order to prevent fraudulent purchase or sale transactions, make business decisions, and promote and improve the services we offer you thanks to your opinions.
You have the right to withdraw your consent at any time. Such withdrawal will not affect the lawfulness of the processing prior to the withdrawal. To withdraw your consent or exercise your rights under the GDPR you can contact us at the following email
privacystubhub@stubhubinternational.com
.
How do we obtain your personal data?
We may collect your personal data in any of the following ways:
Directly from you from the information you provide to us through our forms.
From Facebook, Google or Apple, if you wish to link your profile when you create your account on our platform.
From the cookies you enable on your device. Detailed information is available in
our Cookie Notice
.
What are your rights regarding your personal information?
Regarding the personal data we hold about you, you may exercise the following rights:
Access
: You may request confirmation as to whether we process your data, including, if you wish, a copy of your personal data.
Rectification
: If you detect any errors or if your information has changed - such as, for example, your telephone number - you can ask us to correct or update this information.
Restriction Processing
: You can request that we restrict the processing of your data in certain cases - such as when you change your address -.
Portability
: This is the right to receive and transmit your personal data.
Object
: This is the right you have to prevent us from continuing to process your personal data on the basis of a particular or personal situation.
Deletion
: This is the possibility to request that your data disappear or be deleted from our databases. Also known as the "right to be forgotten".
Complaint
: This is the right to address our Data Protection Officer or the competent supervisory authority when you are dissatisfied with our actions - such as, for example, in the response we give you when you exercise any of the above rights -.
To exercise your rights under the General Data Protection Regulation (GDPR), you can either access the Privacy settings within your StubHub International account or submit your request via email to
privacystubhub@stubhubinternational.com
. You can view, review and change most of your personal information by logging in to your account. Please update your Personal Information immediately if it changes or is inaccurate.
With whom do we share your personal information?
Where necessary, we will provide access to information to our service providers, such as customer service. Access to information is granted after these providers have been approved to ensure that they have sufficient security measures in place to protect your personal information and have signed an appropriate data processing agreement.
Additionally, we may share it with relevant authorities and competent organizations to fulfill our legal obligations and to investigate illegal activity or violations of our User Agreement.
How long do we keep your personal information?
We will keep your personal data as long as they are necessary to achieve the purpose/s that justified their collection.
Once this purpose is fulfilled, we will keep them blocked during the period of limitation of civil, administrative, or criminal liabilities that may arise. Once this period has elapsed, they will be definitively destroyed .
How do we protect your personal data?
We have robust and solid security measures in place to ensure that when you interact with our platform, you do so in a totally secure environment.
Other important privacy information
This section describes additional privacy information related to your use of our Services that you may consider important:
Your responsibility for the transactional information you receive via StubHub International
For certain transactions, we may provide you with Personal Information about another user (for example, their name, email address, contact details and transaction data) to complete the transaction or allow entry into the venue. Independently of us, you are responsible for this data, and it is recommended that you inform the other user about your security and privacy practices. In any event, you must comply with applicable privacy laws and give the other user the opportunity to request removal of their data from your database and to review the information that has been collected about them.
You may only use Personal Information to which you have access for purposes related to the StubHub International transaction or for other services offered through StubHub International, as well as for other purposes expressly consented to by the user to whom the information relates. The use of Personal Information of other users to which you have access for any other purpose constitutes a breach of our User Agreement.
Unsolicited or threatening e-mail
We do not tolerate any abuse of our Services. You are not allowed to add other users to your distribution list (email or postal mailing list), call them or send them text messages for commercial purposes, even if the user bought something, unless the user has given their express consent. Sending unsolicited or threatening email and text messages is against our User Agreement. To report spam or phishing related to StubHub International, please forward the email to
privacystubhub@stubhubinternational.com
.
Communication tools
We may automatically scan messages for spam, viruses, phishing, malicious activity, illegal or prohibited content, or violations of StubHub International Marketplace Global User Agreement, this User Privacy Notice, Mobile Privacy Notice, Seller Policies, Cookie Notice or FanProtect Guarantee.
How We Collect Your Location Information
To achieve our stated goals, we process certain types of personal data. This includes location data, such as your time zone or the country from which you access our platform and your browser type or IP address. This data is collected through Braze, which identifies user IPs, and on-site collection is additionally managed by Google Tag Manager.
Children's privacy
Our websites are general audience websites and are not intended for children under the age of sixteen (16) and we do not knowingly collect personal information from users who are considered children under their respective national laws.
Cookies and similar technologies
When you visit our websites or use our services, applications, tools or messaging, we or our authorised service providers may use cookies, web beacons and other similar technologies to store information to provide you with a better, faster and safer experience and for advertising purposes. For more information, please read our Cookie Notice.
Third-party privacy practices
This Privacy Notice addresses only our use and control of the Personal Information we collect about you for the purpose of providing our Services to you. If you disclose your information to a third party or visit a third-party website through a link from our Services, their privacy notices and practices will apply to the Personal Information you provide to them or that they collect about you.
We cannot guarantee the privacy or security of your Personal Information once you provide it to a third party, and you should evaluate the business partner's privacy and security policies before entering into a transaction and sharing your Personal Information. This applies even if the third parties to whom you disclose your Personal Information are bidders, buyers or sellers on our site.
Virtual Assistant: Support Technology
To assist with inquiries or incidents, we offer the Virtual Assistant, which will process the personal data provided during the login process to validate your identity and
    deliver a tailored response based on your transaction.
Change of ownership
If we are the subject of a merger or acquisition with/by another company, we may share information with them. If this situation arises, we would require the new combined entity to follow this Privacy Policy with respect to the processing of your personal data.
Contact us
If you have any questions or concerns regarding this Privacy Policy or how we handle your personal data, please reach out to us at
privacystubhub@stubhubinternational.com
. Please note that this channel is specifically for GDPR-related concerns. For any other issues, kindly contact us using our general support website.
Return to top
·
Return to section
Seller Policies
Seller Policies
1. Some Of The Things You're Not Allowed To List
Here's a list of ticket types or ticket items that you're not allowed to list for sale on StubHub International.
Listings without event access (Non-event ticket items)
- You may only list non-event ticket items as an add-on to your event ticket listings or as otherwise approved by StubHub International. The most common forms of non-event items include:
Pit passes
Club passes
Party passes
Parking passes (may only be sold on their own as part of a "PARKING ONLY" event listing created by StubHub International).
Tickets for non-consecutive seats
- All of the seats in your listing must be together (consecutive), unless they are piggyback seats (see below).
“Piggyback seats”
- If you’re listing "piggyback" seats, you must select the "Piggyback" check box when listing your tickets for sale. To list piggyback seats, your seats must
Be directly behind one another (not staggered or off to the side)
Be in 2 consecutive rows, and
Have the same number of seats in each row
Speculative tickets
- You must only list tickets that you already have in your possession (‘In Hand’) or that have been allocated to you. Speculative tickets or ‘spec tickets’ are tickets that are listed for sale or sold before the seller actually owns the tickets or before the tickets have been allocated to the seller. Listing or selling speculative tickets on StubHub International is not allowed and may result in account suspension, fees, charges or other consequences. Sellers who regularly list tickets that are not in their possession and who are known to have listed speculative tickets in the past, may be required to provide an earlier In Hand Date than is normally required (for In Hand Date, see Section 2 below).
Stolen property
- We probably don't need to tell you this, but selling stolen tickets or other stolen items on StubHub International is against the rules and violates various laws.
2. Rules for Listing Tickets
Providing accurate and complete information about your tickets during the listing process is one of the keys to becoming a successful seller and is a requirement to list on the Site. If you do not follow all of the requirements in this section when listing your tickets, your listings may not appear on the Site, your sale may be cancelled, you may not get paid, you may incur fees (associated with us finding replacement tickets for, or refunding, the buyer and/or a fixed admin fee), or you may be subject to other consequences specified in these Seller Policies and Clause 19 of the User Agreement.
2.1. Accurately tell us when you'll be able to send the tickets to buyers (if your tickets aren't In Hand)
For tickets to events located in the US or CANADA (unless otherwise specifically noted)
It's OK to list tickets you own but don't have in your possession yet ('Not In Hand') as long as you're absolutely certain you will have them on the date you give us when listing the tickets (the 'In-Hand Date'). The In-Hand Date you select is the beginning of your shipping window to complete the sale. We'll show buyers a delivery estimate based on your In-Hand Date which sets their expectations of when they'll receive the tickets they purchased, so be accurate. If you're not sure when you will have the tickets in your possession, hold off on listing the tickets or select the latest date available on the calendar. If your tickets haven't sold and the In-Hand Date changes, you may change the In-Hand Date without incurring fees. If your tickets have sold and the In-Hand Date changes, you may incur additional fees.
It’s OK to list tickets you own but don't have in your possession yet ('Not In Hand') as long as you're absolutely certain you will have them within 3 days to the event (In Hand). The In Hand Date is the beginning of your shipping window to complete the sale to ensure buyers receive the tickets in time for the event. We'll show buyers a delivery estimate of one day prior to the event. If you're not sure when you will have the tickets in your possession, hold off on listing the tickets.
2.2. Select the right delivery method for your ticket type
StubHub International will show you the delivery methods available for the event during the listing process. Not all delivery methods are available for all events and the available delivery methods can change over time depending on the remaining time left for the events. The delivery method determines the last available date to send tickets that are Not In Hand and the date and time the listing will expire (i.e., no longer be visible to buyers). This allows you adequate time to get tickets to buyers before the event.
For all other events, when you start listing your tickets on the 'Enter your ticket details' page, you'll select a delivery method based on the type of tickets you have - electronic tickets (e-tickets), paper printouts, or traditional 'hard' tickets (such as tickets printed on card stock) and mobile tickets. Once your tickets sell, you can't change the delivery method and you must deliver the tickets using the delivery method you selected.
Important:
If you have 'hard' tickets, you must select the shipping option (such as UPS or the relevant third-party carrier). You must not select electronic delivery, as traditional 'hard' tickets cannot be delivered electronically. And you cannot scan, copy, or photograph them to convert them into PDF files. Please note that in these cases StubHub International will consider the order as dropped and therefore is subject to be cancelled at any time (See point 3.3)
For Instant Download
Instant Download:
If you have e-tickets that are in your possession (In Hand), using Instant Download has the following benefits:
We'll highlight your listings as being ready for Instant Download (which is the delivery method buyers prefer)
Your tickets can stay listed longer
With Instant Download, you'll 'pre-deliver' your tickets when you list them for sale, instead of waiting to receive a buyer's order to deliver them. That way, within minutes of their sale the tickets are delivered to the buyer. If you choose to list your tickets using Instant Download, you have agreed to list them for sale exclusively on StubHub International.
2.3. Enter accurate ticket info
When you list your tickets on StubHub International, you are responsible for providing full and accurate information about your tickets. Depending on the location of the event, this may include all or part of the following: the name of the event, date, section, row, seat and any other required ticket information. Where required, we may remove any listings, cancel any sales or take other actions if listings are vague, confusing, inaccurate or misleading about section, row and seat information.
2.4. Listing by zones
For some events, we divide sections of the venue into zones and allow you to list tickets by zone. In the case of zone listings, you aren’t required to know the exact seat locations for your tickets. But to list tickets by zone, you must be absolutely certain that you’ll be able to deliver tickets in that zone.
2.5. Select any required disclosures
You are responsible for noting any important required disclosures about your tickets, including:
Limited or obstructed view
Possible obstruction
Wheelchair seating
Wheelchair only
Wheelchair accessible
Alcohol-free section
Behind stage (possible obstruction)
Side stage (possible obstruction)
21 and over event
2.6. Select accurate ticket features and comments
If you have an aisle seat ticket, have a parking pass to include with the tickets you're selling, or want to highlight any other details about your tickets, select the appropriate check box on the 'Enter your ticket details' page when you're listing your tickets. Be sure to list exactly what you will deliver to the buyer and select only comments that accurately describe your tickets.
Don't see a comment you're looking for?
For events located in all other countries, please contact
Customer Service
.
Please keep in mind that the comments should be about specific ticket features and disclosures, not subjective comments like 'Best value' and 'Great view' of the stage
2.7. List valid tickets
Only list tickets that you know are valid. It's your responsibility to make sure the tickets you list for sale on StubHub International are valid. If you deliver incorrect, misrepresented, invalid, fraudulent or counterfeit tickets for any sale or portion of a sale you , you may incur additional fees or you may be subject to other consequences as set out in these Seller Policies and Clause 19 of the User Agreement.
2.8. Comply with applicable law
When setting the sale price of your tickets, it is your responsibility to comply with all applicable laws, statutes, and regulations.
2.9. Manage your listings and sales closely
You are free to modify or delete your listing at any time before a sale is completed between you and the buyer. But keep in mind that by listing a ticket for sale on StubHub International, you are making a binding offer to sell that ticket to a buyer who purchases the ticket for the price you have specified. When a buyer accepts your offer by purchasing your ticket, you are contractually bound to supply that exact ticket for the specified price and within the required delivery timeframe.
If you choose to list your tickets on StubHub International and on other sites and you end up selling your tickets somewhere else or no longer have them in your possession, delete them from StubHub International immediately. If your ticket sells on StubHub International although it has sold somewhere else and you are not able to complete the sale, you will be subject to the consequences described in Section 3.3.
If you upload electronic tickets for sale and then remove the listing, StubHub International is not responsible if you are unable to use those tickets due to technical or other reasons.
2.10. No guarantee
StubHub International does not guarantee that your tickets or related passes will sell or that your listing will appear on the Site within a certain time after it is posted or in a particular order on the event page or through search results. StubHub International will not, for any reason, provide compensation for tickets that do not sell, even if it is due to Site unavailability from an outage or maintenance or listing delays.
3. Rules for Getting Tickets to Buyers
3.1. Completing your sales
When your tickets sell, your sale is not complete until the buyer receives the tickets from you. Completing a sale means following all of the steps to deliver the tickets you sold, on time and as promised in your listing.
As soon as your tickets sell, we'll send you an email with a deadline to complete your sale, i.e. the date by which the buyer must receive the tickets. The deadline to complete your sale is based on whether you told us your tickets were in your possession (“In Hand”) or not (“Not In hand”) - and if not, the date you identified as your In Hand Date.
3.2. Deliver your tickets on time and as promised
When sellers deliver tickets late, worried buyers contact us wondering why they haven't received their tickets yet, when they should be looking forward to going to their event. And when a buyer gets tickets that don't match the information in the listing, we may need to take various remedial actions for that buyer including finding replacement tickets, providing refunds, etc. So if any of the information in your listing doesn't exactly match the actual tickets you deliver to the buyer or if you don't complete your sale on time, we may cancel your sale, you may not get paid, you may incur additional fees or you may be subject to other consequences as set out in these Seller Policies and Clause 19 of the User Agreement. With electronic delivery, you will upload your ticket as a PDF file. To ship hard tickets, you need to use the correct shipping label and follow the directions in the confirmation email. For Mobile Tickets you will send to the buyer and follow directions on the confirmation email. The way to send mobile tickets is normally set by the promoter via an application.
The deadline for completing your sale depends on whether or not your tickets are in hand and how you will deliver your tickets to the buyer. Please refer to the following guideline table to determine when to send your tickets. Your 'Date of Sale' refers to the date you receive the sale notification email.
In hand
Not in hand
UPS Delivery (for orders > 72 hours from event)
Sale Date + 1 business day
In-Hand Date + 1 business day
Electronic Delivery (for orders > 48 hours from event)
Sale Date + 1 calendar day
In-Hand Date + 1 calendar day
In any case, the seller must abide by the guidelines set by SHI's Customer Experience department in the event of discrepancies.
StubHub International will show you the delivery methods available for the event during the listing process. Not all delivery methods are available for all events. The delivery method determines the last available date to list tickets that are Not In Hand and the date and time the listing will expire (i.e. no longer be visible to buyers). This allows you adequate time to get tickets to buyers before the event.
For tickets In Hand (whether “hard” tickets or e-tickets), you are required to send the ticket to the buyer within five (5) working days or if the event is less than two (2) weeks away within 24 hours after you have received an order confirmation email from StubHub International using the shipping label provided by StubHub International in accordance with the third party carrier terms. If a shipping label is provided, use it. If not, as seller use a traceable courier company for shipping.
For tickets Not In Hand (hard tickets only), you are required to send a sold ticket to the buyer as soon as you have received it from the promoter or organiser. At the latest, the ticket should be sent to the buyer one (1) week before the event. Tickets must be posted at a post office (or the approved drop-off location of the applicable third party carrier) by no later than the "Post by" date stated on the shipping label. If you do not post your tickets at such location or post them after the “Post by” date stated on the shipping label, the shipment could be lost, delayed or returned. However, if the tickets have not been issued by the organiser or promoter of the event before the above-mentioned deadline, the seller should adhere to the delivery deadline set by StubHub International Customer Service. This ensures that the buyer receives the tickets in a timely manner, even if they are not available by the original deadline.
For tickets Not In Hand (e-tickets only), you must upload your e-tickets as soon as you receive them from the promoter or organiser, preferably no later than one (1) week before the event.
For Mobile Tickets as soon as you receive them from organiser or promoter preferably no later than one (1) week before the event, you must send them to the email address/phone number you have been provided when you received your order confirmation emails, through the application/method set by the promoter.
Regardless of the situation, sellers must abide by SHI's Customer Experience department's guidelines for handling discrepancies.
For Instant Download
Instant download:
With Instant Download, you'll upload your tickets when you list them for sale, instead of waiting to receive a sale notification email to deliver them. That way, within minutes of their sale the tickets are delivered to the buyer. As with any other tickets, you can always edit or remove your listing before the tickets sell.
3.3. Reporting an issue and offering replacement tickets; Consequences for Dropped Sales and Invalid Tickets
We know things don't always go as planned. You need to report an issue right away if you:
can't send the tickets based on your In Hand Date;
can’t deliver them at all; or
You need to offer replacement tickets.
You can report an issue by following the “Report an issue” link in the sales notification email or on the 'Open sales' tab in My Account.
What is a “dropped sale”?
A dropped sale means any one of the following:
You cannot deliver the exact ticket and related passes in time and as specified in your listing
You don’t have replacement tickets (tickets that StubHub International determines are comparable or better than the ones originally listed) that the buyer accepts.
The buyer or StubHub International rejects your requested change and cancels the order
Or, for any other reason, you fail to complete your sale.
Remember, reporting an issue to request a change to your sale doesn’t mean it has to be accepted. StubHub International may in its sole discretion cancel the order without further notice or payment to you.
Here are a few things to keep in mind:
It’s always your responsibility to report an issue immediately, no matter how much time has passed since you received your sale notification email.
If your tickets sell within 72 hours of the event or you have listed your tickets using Instant Download , you won't be able to report an issue online - but you still need to let us know immediately, so please
call us
.
StubHub International monitors the frequency and rate at which you drop sales as compared to your total sales (your 'dropped order rate') and we reserve the right, upon notice to you, to suspend your account if we determine that your dropped order rate has exceeded an acceptable level. Similarly, if you abuse the StubHub International marketplace as determined by StubHub International in its sole discretion including, without limitation, (i) dropping orders at one price and relisting the same tickets for higher prices; (ii) engaging in speculative listings or (iii) other similar abuses of your obligations as a seller, you may be subject to an investigation and any applicable consequences.
For ticketed events
Dropped Sales
If you drop sales or fail to deliver tickets (as defined above) you will be subject to an Administrative Fee and shall be bound by such costs, StubHub International shall notify you accordingly of such fees.
Incorrect Tickets Delivered
If it is determined, following an investigation and confirmation with the buyer, that you have failed to deliver the tickets that correspond precisely to the ones you sold, StubHub International reserves the right to apply the fees and charges outlined below.
Invalid Tickets
If we receive a report that tickets you sold on StubHub International were not valid for entry, we'll investigate to try to determine what caused the issue, and, if necessary, we'll reach out to you to request documentation.
Fees and charges
If you dropped a sale (as defined above) or do not deliver tickets at all or deliver incorrect, misrepresented or invalid tickets (i.e. tickets that are invalid for entry to the venue) or if you make any changes in respect of your ticket listing after your ticket has been sold (i.e. the order has been made by the buyer) resulting in StubHub International incurring additional costs, StubHub International reserves the right to charge you the following additional fees and other charges to cover StubHub International’s costs for resolving the issue, including finding replacement Tickets or issuing a refund to the Buyer:
StubHub International may charge an administrative fee for the costs incurred by StubHub International when resolving issues caused by any order that is not correctly
      fulfilled, such administrative fee shall be calculated by reference to the location of the event to which your ticket relates, as follows:
For all event(s) located in the United Kingdom a charge of £25 (per order);
For all event(s) located within the European Economic Area or even when they happen in a different country but the event is listed in EUR a charge of €25 Euros (per order);
For all event(s) in the US, Canada or any other country in the world when the events are listed in USD unless otherwise specifically stated a charge of $25.
Additionally to the fee stated above, StubHub International reserves the right to recover all associated costs incurred as a result of any unfulfilled orders by the seller, the seller shall be bound by such costs and StubHub International will notify the seller accordingly. StubHub International may charge the higher amount of the following amounts:
Price Cost Difference: StubHub International may charge a replacement fee which consists of the price of a comparable or better replacement Ticket. The replacement fee can be higher than the original sales price of your Ticket;
40% of Seller Payout: StubHub International may deduct a fee of 40% from the total price for which the ticket was sold.
In case incorrect tickets are delivered and the buyer accepts to keep them, the seller shall be bound by all costs incurred to keep the order active, regardless of the ticket´s selling price.
The aforementioned fees will apply except in cases where the venue or organiser/primary ticketer is responsible for the invalid ticket, as long as it is determined by our investigation. If we receive a report that tickets you sold on StubHub International were not valid for entry, we'll investigate to try to determine what caused the issue, and, if necessary, we'll reach out to you to request documentation. We will work with you to determine the resolution.
If you are unable to deliver the ticket at the latest one (1) week before the event, we reserve the right to cancel the sale and you will not be paid for the sale. If you were already paid, the payment for your sale may be recovered by charging your Payment Method or by setting off this amount against pending payments for other tickets you've sold or will sell in the future. In addition, you may be subject to being charged additional fees or other consequences under the User Agreement at Clause 19.
3.4. Cancellation of Sales in Case of Buyer Chargeback/Fraud
In the event that a buyer initiates a chargeback or participates in fraudulent activity, the seller acknowledges and agrees that StubHub International reserves the right to cancel the sale. This decision will be based on the event's location and associated risk and will be made at the sole discretion of StubHub International. It is a condition that any such cancellation must take place at least seven (7) days before the scheduled event and the tickets must not have been delivered to the buyer. Such cancellation will not impose any charges for the seller.
In the event of cancellation, StubHub International will make reasonable efforts to find a new buyer for the tickets. However, StubHub International does not guarantee that a new buyer will be found.
The buyer's chargeback or fraudulent activity may result in non-payment to StubHub International. StubHub International will not be obligated to pay the seller for the affected tickets, as the funds from the buyer are not received and the sale will be considered cancelled.
4. How We Handle Cancelled Events, Play-off Games and Postponed Events
4.1. Cancelled events and play-off games
If you sold tickets to a cancelled event or a play-off game or contingency game that's not played, we'll email you to let you know and you won't be paid for the sale. If you were already paid, we'll recover the payment by charging your Payment Method on file with us or cancelling pending payments (for other tickets you've sold). If you prevent us from recovering a payment, we may suspend your selling permissions or withhold future payments until the amount owed is recovered.
If you need your tickets shipped back to you in order to get a refund of your original purchase, please contact us by using our customer service email address which can be found under the Contact Us tab.
4.2. Postponed events policy
A 'postponed event' is an event where the time or date has changed because it was rescheduled by the team, venue, artist or organiser. We evaluate postponed events on a case-by-case basis to determine the appropriate course of action. Here are a few things to keep in mind:
If a venue requires new tickets for the rescheduled event to be printed and you have already delivered the original tickets to the buyer,
we will notify you on how you need to fulfil the order. If you don't send the tickets for the rescheduled event as requested and the buyer is denied entry to the event, StubHub International may charge you the full amount of the order, costs incurred to satisfy the buyer, and/or you may be subject to other consequences as detailed in Section 3 above (The rules for getting tickets to buyers).
If an event is postponed and the new event ticket availability is limited and not guaranteed, we will deem the event cancelled and handle this as we do other cancelled events (please see above “Cancelled events and play-off games”).
5. Getting Paid, Paying Taxes and Tips on Avoiding Consequences
5.1. Getting paid for your ticket sale
Payment receipt times will vary depending on the payment method chosen by the seller. We'll also send you an email to let you know the buyer received the tickets and we have begun processing your payment.
For all ticketed events
Payments from buyers are processed by the payout platform that provides services to SHI on behalf of sellers. When your tickets sell,
your payment will be released within 5 to 8 business days after the event takes place
. Please read the Payment Services Agreement for Sellers on the relevant StubHub International Site for more details. If you haven't received your payment 8 business days after the event takes place, please
contact us
.
5.2. Paying taxes
StubHub International is not responsible in any way for the accuracy or suitability of any payment of any applicable taxes on your behalf. We do not collect taxes on any sales. As a seller, you are responsible for collecting and remitting any and all applicable international, federal, state, or municipal taxes in connection with ticket sales (including, but not limited to VAT in the UK, TVA in France or MwSt. in Germany).
To comply with the regulations of the U.S. Internal Revenue Service (IRS), we are required to request a Tax ID Number (TIN) from sellers to generate Form 1099-k, if applicable.
6. Other Things You're Not Allowed To Do
6.1. Misusing buyer contact information or StubHub International's Site and services
We provide you with the buyer’s contact information so you can ship tickets to them. However, don't use this information to contact the buyer for anything other than delivering the tickets you sold to the buyer and do not tell a buyer that you are affiliated with or a representative of StubHub International.
You are not allowed to use the StubHub International Site or services to:
contact other StubHub International users
ask other StubHub International users to contact you
buy, sell, or deliver tickets outside of StubHub International
6.2 Don't place additional items in the envelope (like your contact information, promotional materials for your business etc.)
It may be tempting and seem harmless to include materials in the UPS (or other third party carrier, as relevant) envelope when you ship tickets to buyers - but it's against these Seller Policies. Here are examples of promotional or commercial information that you aren't allowed to include in shipments:
With the exception of StubHub International merchandise or leaflets that we send you for this specific reason, don't place additional items in the envelope (like your contact information, promotional materials, etc.)
Catalogues
Business cards or business reply cards
Bookmarks
Coupons
Flyers
Solicitations
Other marketing or advertising material
Sticky notes with your contact information.
7. What Happens When You Break The Rules
When you violate these Seller Policies, you may face consequences, which could include the following (or any combination):
The fees detailed in Section 3 above (The rules for getting tickets to buyers), including the cost of replacement tickets, reprinting fees, additional delivery costs, administrative fees and refunds to the buyer
Warnings
The removal of your listings
Order cancellation
Limits to your buying and selling privileges
Withholding of payments
Temporary or permanent suspension of your account
Or any other consequences specified in Clause 19 of the User Agreement
Remember, it's your responsibility to consult StubHub International's User Agreement and all StubHub International policies (including these Seller Policies) for all of the detail.
8. Country-Specific Additional Provisions
For events listed on the stubhub.co.uk Site only:
In addition to the tickets listed in Section 1 above
(Some of the things you’re not allowed to list), the following types of tickets are not allowed to be listed for sale:
Tickets for designated football matches:
You may not list tickets for a football match which is a designated football match for the purposes of section 166 of the Criminal Justice and Public Order Act 1994, as defined in the Ticket Touting (Designation of Football Matches) Order 2007 (http://www.opsi.gov.uk/SI/si2007/20070790.htm). This includes (i) matches involving one or more teams who are members of the Premier League (with the exception of any team that has a partnership with StubHub International or has otherwise authorized StubHub International to list its matches), the Football League, the Football Conference or the League of Wales, (ii) any match in England and Wales in which an international team or a club side outside of England and Wales will play, (iii) any match outside England and Wales in which a national team representing England or Wales will play, (iv) every match in the UEFA Champions League and (v) FIFA World Cup Tournaments and UEFA European Championships.
Tickets to free events:
Sellers are not permitted to sell tickets to events where all tickets are free to the public.
For events in the European Economic Area:
In addition to the listing
requirements in Section 2 above (Rules for Listing Tickets), you must also include the face value of the ticket when you list your ticket. Face value is the price printed on the ticket not including service and delivery fees.
9. Contact Us
9.1. Customer Services
If your event is located in the UK, here’s how to
contact us
.
If your event is located in Germany, Austria or Switzerland, here’s how to
contact us
.
If your event is located in France , here’s how to
contact us
.
Return to top
·
Return to section
Payment Services Agreement for Sellers
Payment Services Agreement for Sellers
This "Payment Services Agreement" is between you and Hyperwallet (as described herein). Your use of the StubHub International’s marketplace will continue to be governed by the User Agreement applicable to you.
Hyperwallet Terms and Conditions
These Terms and Conditions are effective as of January 1, 2021. See Section 1.2.4 for further information on how changes may be made. By registering your Pay Portal, you agree to abide by these Terms and Conditions.
1. Introduction
1.1. Hyperwallet and You
1.1.1. Hyperwallet is a PayPal service. We provide payment services and related functionality and technology using a global payout platform and network of financial partners to deliver a range of payout solutions to Hyperwallet’s business customers (each a “
Payor
”) (the “
Services
”) who desire to make payments to their designated payees, like you (a “
Payee
”).
1.1.2. Hyperwallet operates and provides the Services through local affiliates, including members of the PayPal group of companies (each an “Affiliate”) around the world. Together with their respective parents, subsidiaries and affiliates, these Affiliates are individually and collectively referred to in these Terms and Conditions as “Hyperwallet”. Affiliates may be registered and licensed in various jurisdictions with relevant regulatory agencies as set forth in the “Licenses and Complaints” section of the website. The Affiliates set out in the Affiliates and Governing Law Schedule also provide Services to Payors.
1.1.3. Hyperwallet has created a technology portal which may be accessed through a website, application programming interface/API, embedded in or integrated with your Payor’s own platform or system, or other method, and may be branded with your Payor’s brand or co-branded with the Hyperwallet brand (the “
Pay Portal
”). The Pay Portal is the interface that may facilitate certain payments which you will receive from the Payor (the “
Payouts
” and each, a “
Payout
”). Payout capabilities are available in multiple currencies and can be implemented using a variety of different methods. You may be able to receive Payouts from and as directed by your Payor through one of several methods, each as determined by your Payor, such as (but not limited to) a transfer to your bank account, load to a prepaid card issued to you by a third-party issuer (“
Hyperwallet Card
”), load to a closed loop electronic gift card, load to your existing debit card, cheque, cash pickup at collection locations provided by third-party money transfer providers (e.g. Western Union), and other payment methods (each a “
Payout Method
” and collectively “
Payout Methods
”)), all as supported and made available from time to time. Some Payout Methods may require access to the Pay Portal. The Payouts may comprise money remittance and/or the issuance of stored value. The Payouts are delivered through the Affiliates, and a network of banks and financial service providers (“
Network Partners
”). The Payouts are subject to additional terms and conditions as set forth in the Payout Schedule.
1.1.4. Among the Payout Methods, Payees in the EEA or the UK must contract with us directly to use the Payment Processing Services (as defined below) on the Payor’s marketplace platform. Terms applicable to these Payment Processing Services appear in Section 11 of the Payout Schedule.
1.1.5. Fees for Services
1.1.5.1.
YOUR USE OF THE PAY PORTAL MAY BE SUBJECT TO FEES, AS DETERMINED BY YOUR PAYOR. THESE FEES MAY INCLUDE RECURRING MONTHLY FEES, YEARLY FEE AND/OR FEES FOR INACTIVITY.
To view the schedule of fees applicable to your use of the Pay Portal, please click on “Fees” appearing under “Resources” section of the header menu on the Pay Portal Home Screen. Or, you may click on “Fees” at the bottom of the Home Screen (the “Fee Schedule”). Fees will be charged only where permitted by applicable law.
1.1.5.2.
BY ACCEPTING THESE TERMS AND CONDITIONS, YOU AGREE PAY THE FEES APPEARING IN THE FEE SCHEDULE. You further agree that Hyperwallet may collect the fees automatically from available funds reflected in your Pay Portal, or from the amounts transferred by you through the Payout Methods, as applicable.
In addition, you agree third parties facilitating the Payout Methods may impose additional fees on transactions, which may be deducted from available funds reflected in your Pay Portal balance, depending on the type of transaction you conduct. These fees will be displayed to you before completing the transaction. Please review Section 3 for additional terms related to the Fees for Services.
1.1.6. In addition to the Payouts and Pay Portal, Hyperwallet may also originate debit entries directly from your bank account and deliver them to your Payor (“Direct Debits”). Hyperwallet originates Direct Debit entries when instructed by your Payor subject to a written authorization you have granted to your Payor to debit funds from the bank account associated with your Pay Portal. Such authorization must be signed by you, and in a form drafted to meet the requirements imposed under applicable law, including applicable rules of any clearing network through which the Direct Debit entries may be settled. Hyperwallet is reliant on your Payor alone for instructions regarding the amount and frequency of Direct Debit entries. Hyperwallet is not responsible for any losses, fees, or penalties you may incur as a result of processing the Direct Debits from your bank account under a valid and current authorization. Unless applicable law provides for automatic expiry of an authorization, you must communicate your intent to cancel an authorization by sending a written cancellation request to your Payor. In the event that your bank rejects a Direct Debit entry for non-sufficient funds, or in relation to a dispute, Hyperwallet may present the Direct Debit entry again two additional times. Three Direct Debit entries returned for non-sufficient funds by your bank within a 60-day period will void your authorization automatically. To dispute a Direct Debit entry, you must notify the financial institution holding your bank account that you intend to dispute the entry within the 60-day period following the date that your account was debited. Following notification of the dispute with your bank, you should contact Payor to notify them of the dispute.
1.1. 7 Hyperwallet may, at any time and in its sole discretion, delegate the performance of any of the Services, obligations and/or requirements hereunder to any of its Affiliates, agents, suppliers and contractors and Hyperwallet may disclose to any such persons any information required by them to perform the duties so delegated to them pursuant to the Privacy Policy (see the “Privacy” section of the website.
1.2. Why these Terms and Conditions are important to You
1.2.1. The terms “you”, “your” and “Payee” refer to users making use of the Pay Portal to obtain Payouts. The terms “Hyperwallet,” “we,” “us,” “our,” and similar terms, refer to Hyperwallet as described herein. Other capitalized terms not otherwise defined within the body of the Terms and Conditions shall have the meanings set forth in the Definitions Schedule.
1.2.2. Your Payor has engaged Hyperwallet to provide the Services to it, for its subsequent provision of certain Payouts to you. By providing your details on the Pay Portal, registering on, having access to, or accessing the Pay Portal, you acknowledge all of the terms and conditions contained in these Terms and Conditions and the associated Schedules:
(i) Payout Schedule
(ii) Definitions Schedule
(iii) Affiliates and Governing Law Schedule
(iv) and the underlying Hyperwallet Policies, which include:
(a) Privacy Policy (see the “Privacy” section of the website)
(b) Electronic Signature and Communications Delivery Policy (see the “Legal” section of the website); and
(c) if you are issued a Hyperwallet Card, terms found in the associated Cardholder Agreement.
1.2.3. The Terms and Conditions govern your receipt of Payouts through the Payout Methods. As your Payor determines which Payout Methods will be made available to you, not all terms and conditions will apply. Only those terms and conditions relating to the certain Payout Methods determined by your Payor to be made available to you may apply. Nonetheless, these are important documents which you should read and consider carefully. Please print or save a copy of these Terms and Conditions for your records.
1.2.4. We reserve the right to change the Terms and Conditions at any time by posting a revised version in the Pay Portal. The revised version will be effective at the time we post it to the Pay Portal. You are responsible for regularly reviewing the Terms and Conditions. Your continued ability to access the Pay Portal, and/or otherwise using the Payout Methods or receiving the Payouts after the date of any changes constitutes your acceptance of any new or changed Terms and Conditions. If you do not wish to accept the new or changed Terms and Conditions, you must cease accessing the Pay Portal and discontinue receiving the Payouts.
1.2.5. If there is any conflict between the Schedules and any other parts of the Terms and Conditions, the other parts of the Terms and Conditions will prevail with the exception of Section 11 of the Payout Schedule, which shall take precedence over all other parts of the Schedules and the Terms and Conditions in relation to Payees in the EEA or the UK who are using the Payment Processing Services on the Payor’s marketplace platform.
2. Payouts
2.1. Access to Payouts
2.1.1. To be eligible to use the Pay Portal to receive Payouts from your Payor, you must:
(i) be at least eighteen (18) years of age or older,
(ii) be located in a country supported by Hyperwallet
(iii) register your use of the Pay Portal by providing current, complete and accurate information as prompted by the registration process on the Pay Portal, and
(iv) agree to the Terms and Conditions presented either in the Pay Portal or by yourPayor.
2.1.2. Some registration and other identifying information about you may be provided to Hyperwallet directly from your Payor from time to time. Multiple registrations are prohibited. You may register only once, and each user must maintain a separate registration. If we detect multiple active registrations for a single user, we reserve the right to merge or terminate the registrations and refuse to permit you to receive Payouts without notification to you
2.1.3. Payees who are companies or registered under a business name are deemed to provide any information required and accept these Terms and Conditions through their authorised representative. If you register on behalf of a company or under a business name, you represent that you are a legal representative of the business Payee, and that you are authorized to provide any information about the business and accept these Terms and Conditions on its behalf.
2.2. Restrictions
2.2.1. The Services provided to the Payor are subject to certain limits and availability. Not all Payouts Methods may be made available to you. Save as set out in these Terms and Conditions, the Services are not offered to Payees, consumers or the general public.
2.2.2. The Payout Methods are intended to enable Payouts for business-related and commercial activities in connection with your relationship with your Payor and are not intended for, and may not be used for, personal, family, or household purposes. By registering on the Pay Portal, you attest that you are engaged in a trade or business for gain or profit, whether as a sole proprietor or otherwise and are using the Pay Portal for commercial purposes as an independent contractor of Payor and not for the receipt of any wages subject to payroll withholding or otherwise for personal, family or household purposes. Save as set out in Section 11 of the Payout Schedule, you acknowledge that you are not entering into a business relationship with us.
2.2.3. Hyperwallet is not responsible for and does not have any liability with respect to any of the products, services, or activities for which you receive a Payout via the Pay Portal or any of the actions or inactions of any Payor or any third party, including but not limited to any dispute as to any amount of funds paid or payable to you by such Payor or otherwise. Additional restrictions as to the receipt of the Payouts are set forth in the Payout Schedule.
2.3. Third-Party Services
2.3.1. You may be able to elect to receive certain services from other service providers of Hyperwallet (each such service, a “Third-Party Service,” and each such entity, a “Provider”). Hyperwallet is not responsible for such Providers, the Third-Party Services or any material, information or results available through such Third-Party Services. The applicable Providers may require you to agree to terms and conditions or agreements with respect to their provision of the Third-Party Services to you. You are solely responsible for, and assume all risk arising from, your election and receipt of any Third-Party Service.
2.3.2. If you elect to receive a Third-Party Service, you authorize Hyperwallet to submit to the applicable Provider any and all documents and information about you and your Payor necessary for such Provider to provide the Third-Party Service to you, including without limitation your personally identifiable information, requested by such Provider that you have provided to Hyperwallet in connection with this Agreement and your receipt of the Payouts. You are responsible for the accuracy of all information you provide to us and approve to be submitted to Providers. You represent and warrant that you have all the rights in and to any information necessary to provide information to Hyperwallet, and that Hyperwallet’s use of information as contemplated hereunder will not violate any rights of privacy or other proprietary rights, or any applicable local, state or federal laws, regulations, orders or rules.
2.3.3. You agree that by electing to receive a Third-Party Service and consenting and authorizing Hyperwallet to submit your information to a Provider, you have waived and released any claim against Hyperwallet arising out of a Provider’s use of your information. Except as stated in these Terms and Conditions, Hyperwallet is not liable to you or any third party for any direct, indirect, consequential, special, or punitive loss or damages regardless of whether such damages are based on contract, tort (including negligence), strict liability, or any other theory or form of action or whether Hyperwallet knew or should have known of the likelihood of such damages in any circumstances.
2.4. Identity Verification and Third-Party Permissions
2.4.1. You acknowledge and agree that Hyperwallet may, at any time, as a condition of receiving the Payouts and in accordance with our Privacy Policy (see the “Privacy” section of the website), ask you for information that will allow us to reasonably identify you, require you to take steps to confirm the accuracy and/or completeness of information you have provided to us, and/or verify your information against third-party databases or through other means for purposes of providing the Payouts to you and/or as may be required to perform required screening, monitoring, and investigation of your Pay Portal activities and in order to comply with applicable laws. Information we may require from you may include your name, address, date of birth, government identification number, taxpayer identification number, phone number, email address, and other information that will allow us to identify you. We may require you to provide documentation, which may include your passport, driver’s license, or other government issued photo identification document. We may also contact you if we have additional questions. You agree that Hyperwallet reserves the right to directly assess your fees related to our identity verification, screening, monitoring, investigations and similar activities in connection with your Pay Portal and/or receipt of the Payouts. Hyperwallet reserves the right to close, suspend, limit or deny access to the Payouts or the Pay Portal in the event we are unable to obtain this information, for any reason or for no reason, in our sole discretion.
2.4.2. You agree to the disclosure of your information to third-party verification service(s) providers, Network Partners, government agencies, and other third parties for identity verification purposes, to meet anti-money laundering, anti-terrorist financing, transaction monitoring, and suspicious activity reporting requirements, or as otherwise required to provide the Payout Methods to you. You acknowledge and authorize that information concerning the location of the device you use to access the Pay Portal may be used to assess location, may be obtained at any time while logged into the Pay Portal, and such information may be used or disclosed as a part of the Payout Methods and to establish your eligibility to receive Payouts. Any third party to which your information is transmitted will be bound to maintain your confidentiality and may not use the information supplied for any unauthorized purpose other than to verify your identity, meet our legal, regulatory, risk requirements, provide the Payout Methods, or as otherwise described herein or in the Privacy Policy (see the “Privacy” section of the website).
2.5. Your Responsibilities
2.5.1. You are responsible for maintaining adequate security and control of any and all IDs, usernames, passwords, personal identification numbers (PINs), or any other codes that you use to access the Pay Portal or to receive the Payouts. You expressly acknowledge and agree that failure to maintain the security of these items may result in unauthorized transactions and/or loss to you for which Hyperwallet is not responsible to reimburse you or otherwise pay you for any such loss. You agree to notify Hyperwallet immediately of any unauthorized use of your Pay Portal or any other breach of security. You will be responsible for any transfer of funds request received via your Pay Portal unless we are notified of unauthorized use in the manner set out in these Terms and Conditions. You are urged to take appropriate safeguards before downloading information from the Pay Portal. We assume no responsibility for any damages to computer equipment or other property that may result from use of the Pay Portal or downloading anything from the Pay Portal.
2.5.2. Notwithstanding the foregoing, you are responsible for any and all activities, acts or omissions that occur in relation to your Pay Portal, including the accuracy of the information transmitted through your Pay Portal. You are responsible for your Internet connection or any other method that you use to connect to the Pay Portal. You represent that your email account and all information sent to and from your email account is secure and nobody has access to your email account except for you. You also acknowledge that granting permission to a third party to take specific actions on your behalf does not relieve you of any of your responsibilities under this Agreement. Further, you acknowledge and agree that you will not hold Hyperwallet responsible for, and will defend and indemnify Hyperwallet from, any liability arising from the actions or inactions of this third party in connection with any permissions you grant.
2.5.3. Subject to Section 7.5, notwithstanding these Terms and Conditions, you may not assign or transfer your right to utilize the Pay Portal to a third party or otherwise grant any third party a legal or equitable interest in connection with the Pay Portal.
2.5.4. You agree that you may not and will not use the Pay Portal:
(i) for any purpose that is unlawful, fraudulent, deceitful, untruthful, misrepresentative, dishonest or related in any manner to unlawful, unethical or morally questionable activities or is directly or indirectly related to the foregoing;
(ii) if you are located, residing, working or conducting business in any country restricted by any of the following, which Hyperwallet may update from time to time without prior notification to you: Special Economic Measures Act (Canada), the United Nations Act (Canada), the Freezing Assets of Corrupt Foreign Officials Act (Canada), Office of Financial Sanctions Implementation, HM Treasury (UK), the U.S. Office of Foreign Assets Controls’ (“OFAC”) Specially Designated Nationals and Blocked Persons List, or the U.S. Department of State’s Designated Foreign Terrorist Organizations List, as applicable and as, may be amended from time to time; or (ii) any applicable sanction, directive or other action by Foreign Affairs and International Trade Canada, OFSI, OFAC or the United Nations or any other Canadian, U.S, Australian, or European governmental authority regarding terrorism or money laundering;
(iii) for any illegal purposes including but not limited to fraud and money laundering. We will report any suspicious activity to the relevant law enforcement agency;
(iv) in any attempt to abuse, exploit or circumvent any law or regulation;
(v) in any manner that attempts to tamper, hack, modify, frame, "deep link" or otherwise bypass or attempt to bypass security, functionality, entry points or any other features of the Service or the Pay Portal;
(vi) directly or indirectly, either separately or as part of another service, attempt to redirect the Payouts; or
(vii) for uses prohibited by
PayPal’s Acceptable Use Policy
, as applicable, and as may be updated from time to time;
(viii) for any purpose that Hyperwallet prohibits in its sole discretion or as otherwise prohibited by the Terms and Conditions.
3. Other Associated Fees
3.1. In addition to the Fees appearing in the Fee Schedule, you are further responsible for:
(i) bank processing fees, currency exchange fees or intermediary fees which may be charged by third parties such as your own bank or payment provider that is not associated with us;
(ii) fees incurred by Hyperwallet related to a Payout rejected due to errors or omissions in the Payout Method details supplied by you;
(iii) fees and or taxes related to the Pay Portal arising out applicable law, including sales and use taxes, value-added taxes (“VAT”), goods and services taxes (“GST”);
(iv) fees imposed by internet, mobile carriers used by you to access the Pay Portal or use the services via computer or mobile device.
3.2. Changes to Fees
We reserve the right to change Fees appearing in the Fees schedule at the direction of your Payor or otherwise at our sole discretion. We will publish updated fees in the Pay Portal. Fees will take effect immediately unless otherwise stated or as otherwise provided for in these Terms and Conditions. If you have a question about any of the Fees including any dispute involving any Fee paid or payable by you for the Payout Methods, contact your Payor directly or you may direct those inquiries to Hyperwallet by contacting us.
3.3. Currency of Fees
All Fees are based on the currency determined by your Payor. If you if you are billed in a currency other than that of your Payor or you request a Payout in a currency different from a currency in your Pay Portal balance, a foreign exchange fee and/or rate may apply.
3.4. Fees for Hyperwallet Card
Fees associated with a Hyperwallet Card are determined by the Issuer of the Card and are outlined in the Issuer’s Cardholder Agreement. The Cardholder Agreement will accompany the Card when the Card is shipped to you. A copy of the Cardholder Agreement is available to you in the Fees page of the Pay Portal.
4. Pay Portal Content
4.1. Copyright and Other Intellectual Property Rights
The Pay Portal contains copyrighted material, trade-marks and other proprietary and confidential information of Hyperwallet and others (collectively “Proprietary Material”), which may include, but shall not be limited to text, documents, information, data, articles, images, photographs, graphics, software, applications, video recordings, audio recordings, sounds, designs, features, and other materials (collectively with the Proprietary Material, “Content”). All Proprietary Material is owned by Hyperwallet, its licensors and various third parties and is protected by applicable intellectual property rights including copyright, patent and trade-mark legislation and treaties. You agree not to modify, publish, copy, transmit, register or claim title to, participate in the transfer or sale of, create derivative works of, or in any way exploit, in whole or in part, any Proprietary Material except for copying that occurs in the ordinary course of browsing the Internet and personal copies of Pay Portal information that you make for your personal use including for your own records. You agree to respect any copyright, trade-mark, patent and other proprietary rights contained in any Proprietary Material on the Pay Portal. The only rights that you can have in Proprietary Material outside of the Terms and Conditions are those granted in writing by Hyperwallet or other owners with rights to the Proprietary Material.
4.2. Links and Content
4.2.1. The links included within the Pay Portal may cause you to leave the Pay Portal in order to gain access to other websites including those related to Third-Party Services (“Linked Sites”). The Linked Sites are not under the control of Hyperwallet and we are not responsible for the content of any Linked Site, the services provided at any Linked Site, any link contained in a Linked Site, or any changes or updates to such sites unless otherwise noted on such sites. We provide these links to you only as a convenience. We may amend, add or delete links on the Pay Portal as we determine in our sole discretion. The inclusion of any link to any Linked Sites in our Pay Portal or any link on a third party’s site to our Pay Portal does not reflect an endorsement by us nor does it necessarily reflect any association with their operators. When you access Linked Sites, you do so at your own risk.
4.2.2. The Content is intended for information purposes only. Although we exercise reasonable efforts to ensure their quality and accuracy, there might be errors, or the information provided may not be complete, current, or applicable to your particular situation. We assume no liability or responsibility for any errors or omissions. You are responsible for evaluating the accuracy, completeness, and usefulness of any opinion, advice, or other content available through the Pay Portal or obtained from a Linked Site.
4.3. No Endorsement
No endorsement or approval of any third party or their advice, opinions, information, products or services is expressed or implied by the Pay Portal or Payout Methods including, without limitation, any endorsement or approval of any Payor or other third party.
5. Liability
5.1. Disclaimers
5.1.1. The use of the Pay Portal and receipt of the Payouts is at your own risk. The Pay Portal, and any related information, content and/or materials are provided on an “as is” basis without warranties of any kind. Hyperwallet hereby disclaims all warranties, either express or implied, including but not limited to: warranties of title or implied warranties of merchantability; fitness for a particular purpose; non-infringement; and those arising by statute or otherwise in law or from a course of dealing or usage of trade; other than those warranties which are imposed by and incapable of exclusion, restriction, or modification under the laws applicable to this agreement. The disclaimers of warranties and limitations of liability will apply to the maximum extent permitted by applicable law.
5.1.2. Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, you agree that Hyperwallet does not warrant or represent that:
(i) the operation of the Pay Portal and the Payout Methods will be uninterrupted or error free, or that defects will be corrected;
(ii) the Pay Portal, or the servers that make the Pay Portal or Payout Methods available, are free of viruses or other harmful components; and/or,
(iii) the use or the results of the use of the Pay Portal or the Payouts Methods will be correct, accurate, timely, or otherwise reliable.
5.1.3. We make reasonable attempts to exclude viruses from the Pay Portal but cannot ensure that the Pay Portal will be at all times free from viruses or other destructive software.
5.1.4. You further agree, without limiting the generality of the foregoing, that Hyperwallet shall not be responsible or liable to you for:
(i) any actions or inactions of a Payor including but not limited to any dispute as to any amounts paid or payable to you or the failure of a Payor to pay you;
(ii) the Payout Methods for which you receive or intend to receive the Payouts from a Payor regardless whether it is received via the Pay Portal;
(iii) unauthorized access to or alteration of your transmissions or data, any material or data sent or received or not sent or received, or any transactions entered into through the Pay Portal or in connection with the Payout Methods;
(iv) any loss due to payments to unintended users due to the input by you of incorrect information or for payments in incorrect amounts;
(v) any service interruptions, including, but not limited to, system failures, power outages, or other interruptions that may affect processing, settlement, acceptance or disbursement in connection with the Pay Portal or Payout Methods;
(vi) any actions or inactions of any third party, including but not limited to those of any Network Partner or Provider; and/or,
(vii) the inability to perform our obligations because of factors beyond our control.
5.2. Limitation
5.2.1. In no event shall Hyperwallet, including the Affiliates, agents, subcontractors, representatives, network partners or your Payor be liable to you or any other party and you hereby waive any right you may have to sue any of the foregoing entities, for any loss or injury or any damages, either direct, indirect, punitive, special, incidental, consequential or otherwise (including, but not limited to lost profits or lost savings) resulting from or in any way connected to: (a) your use of the Pay Portal or receipt of the Payouts through any of the Payout Methods; (b) any error, failure, or delay of, including, but not limited to the use of or inability to use any functionality or any component of the Pay Portal, for any reason; (c) the performance or nonperformance by Hyperwallet or its agents, subcontractors or network partners, any Payor, third-party service provider products or services, or linked sites; (d) any unauthorized or fraudulent transactions affecting you; or, (e) arising out of any third-party service provider’s use of shared information, even if such party has been advised of the possibility of damages arising out of any of the foregoing. This limitation of liability shall apply regardless of whether the claim asserted is based on contract, tort, negligence, strict liability or otherwise.
5.2.2. In no event shall Hyperwallet, its Affiliates, directors, officers or employees, or your Payor, be liable for any act or omission of any third party including, without limitation, any of Hyperwallet’s agents, subcontractors, representatives, suppliers or network partners, any other users of the pay portal, third-party service providers, providers of a linked site, or for any circumstance beyond the reasonable control of Hyperwallet.
5.2.3. In no event shall the total liability of Hyperwallet (inclusive of all Affiliates, agents, subcontractors, representatives and network partners) to you for all damages in any one or more cause(s) of action exceed the lesser of the actual direct damages incurred by you and the amount of fees paid by you for the affected services giving rise to your claim or cause of action for damages.
5.2.4. Some jurisdictions do not allow the exclusion of certain warranties or the limitation or exclusion of liability for incidental or consequential damages. Accordingly, some of the above limitations may be limited by law in your jurisdiction to the extent that such laws apply to the Terms and Conditions. To the extent the applicable law governing the Terms and Conditions as applied to you limit or prohibit any of the limitations in the Terms and Conditions, then to the extent of such limitation or prohibition, the total liability of Hyperwallet (inclusive of all Affiliates, agents, subcontractors, representatives and network partners) to you will be to complete the performance of the affected transaction which was unable to be performed for you due to the non-performance of the services by Hyperwallet.
5.2.5. You hereby waive any and all rights to bring any claim or action related to the pay portal beyond one (1) year after the first occurrence of the kind of act, event, condition or omission upon which such claim or action is based.
5.2.6. Nothing in this Agreement excludes our liability for liability on our part that cannot be excluded by applicable law. The parties acknowledge that the other party entered into this Agreement in reliance on the limitations of liability stated in this section, and these limitations are an essential basis of the bargain between the parties.
5.3. Indemnity
5.3.1. You agree to indemnify and hold Hyperwallet, the Affiliates, its shareholders, subsidiaries, directors, officers and employees, harmless from any loss, claim, demand, or damage (actual and consequential) of every kind and nature, known and unknown, suspected and unsuspected, disclosed and undisclosed, including all third-party claims, liability, losses, expenses, damages, fines, penalties (including damages awarded or settled amounts and reasonable attorney’s fees), arising out of or in connection with your breach of these Terms and Conditions, your relationship or dealings with your Payor, use of the Pay Portal or receipt of the Payouts through any of the Payout Methods.
5.3.2. You agree to indemnify Hyperwallet for all losses arising from us acting on your instruction or that of your Payor (unless these arise due to our gross negligence or wilful intent or fraud).
5.3.3. You agree to indemnify us from any losses we may incur resulting from any error made by you in providing information or instructions to Hyperwallet whether verbally or in writing, through the Pay Portal (unless these arise due to our gross negligence or wilful default or fraud) or in connection with the Payout Methods.
5.3.4. All notices to Hyperwallet must be sent by postal mail to the Legal Notice Mailing address for the Affiliate associated with your country of location as set forth on the Affiliates and Governing Law Schedule.
5.4. Arbitration
5.4.1. The following Agreement to Arbitrate provisions apply to you if you are located in the United States and where the Payout Methods in question are governed under the laws of the United States as set forth on the Affiliates and Governing Law Schedule.
5.4.2. This Agreement to Arbitrate contains provisions that govern the resolution of legal claims arising between you and us, which will require you to submit claims you have against us to binding and final arbitration, unless you opt out of the agreement to arbitrate within 30 days after the date you accept the Terms and Conditions for the first time.
5.4.3. You hereby consent to arbitration of all claims before a single arbitrator. The arbitrator will be selected, and the arbitration conducted pursuant to the commercial arbitration rules and mediation procedures of the American arbitration association (“AAA”). No “class” or similar group arbitration shall be permitted. All arbitration hearings or similar proceedings shall be held in Austin, Texas, although you may elect telephonic proceedings or waive any hearing.
5.4.4. The AAA commercial arbitration rules and mediation procedures are available for review at: https://www.adr.org/aaa/faces/rules (click rules, then click commercial arbitration rules and mediation procedures). By agreeing to be bound by the Terms and Conditions, you either (a) acknowledge and agree that you have read and understand these rules or (b) waive your opportunity to read these rules and any claim that these rules are unfair or should not apply for any reason.
5.4.5. Any arbitral award shall be final and binding and may be enforced by any court of competent jurisdiction.
5.4.6. You understand that, in return for your agreement to this section, we are able to offer you the service at the terms designated, and that your assent to this section is an indispensable consideration to this agreement.
5.4.7. You also acknowledge and understand that, with respect to any claim:
(i) You are giving up your right to have a trial by jury and trial by judge;
(ii) You are giving up your right to have a court resolve any such dispute; and
(iii) You are giving up your right to serve as a representative, as a private attorney general, or in any other representative capacity, or to participate as a member of a class of claimants, in any arbitration or lawsuit involving any such dispute.
5.4.8. Unless you opt out: (1) you will only be permitted to pursue claims against Hyperwallet on an individual basis, not as a plaintiff or class member in any class or representative action or proceeding, and (2) you will only be permitted to seek relief (including monetary, injunctive, and declaratory relief) on an individual basis.
5.4.9. If a dispute arises between you and Hyperwallet, our goal is to investigate and address your concerns and, if we are unable to do so to your satisfaction, to provide you with a neutral and cost-effective means of resolving the dispute quickly. Disputes between you and Hyperwallet regarding the Payout Methods and/or Payouts may be reported by contacting us and as further set forth in the dispute resolution provision above.
5.4.10. You and Hyperwallet each agree that any and all disputes or claims that have arisen or may arise between you and Hyperwallet, including without limitation federal and state statutory claims, common law claims, and those based in contract, tort, fraud, misrepresentation or any other legal theory, shall be resolved exclusively through final and binding arbitration, rather than in court, except that you may assert claims in small claims court, if your claims qualify and so long as the matter remains in such court and advances only on an individual (non-class, non-representative) basis. This Agreement to Arbitrate is intended to be broadly interpreted.
5.4.11. You and Hyperwallet agree that each of us may bring claims against the other only on an individual basis and not as a plaintiff or class member in any purported class or representative action or proceeding. Unless both you and Hyperwallet agree otherwise, the arbitrator(s) may not consolidate or join more than one person’s or party’s claims and may not otherwise preside over any form of a consolidated, representative or class proceeding. Also, the arbitrator(s) may award relief (including monetary, injunctive and declaratory relief) only in favor of the individual party seeking relief and only to the extent necessary to provide relief necessitated by that party’s individual claim(s). Any relief awarded cannot affect other Hyperwallet customers.
5.4.12. You can choose to reject this Agreement to Arbitrate by mailing us a signed, written opt-out notice which includes your name, address, phone number, and the email address(es) used to log in to the Pay Portal to which the opt-out applies. The opt-out notice must be postmarked no later than 30 days after the date you accept the Terms and Conditions for the first time. You must mail the opt-out notice to PayPal, Inc., Attention: Hyperwallet Legal Department, 2211 North First Street, San Jose, CA 95131. This Section is made pursuant to a transaction involving interstate commerce and will be governed and enforced by the Federal Arbitration Act, 9 U.S.C.1-16.
6. Termination
6.1. Suspension or Termination of Payout Methods
Hyperwallet may at any time suspend or terminate all or any portion of the Payout Methods, including access to the Pay Portal, for any reason whatsoever as determined by Hyperwallet and/or at the instruction of your Payor, each in their sole discretion. Upon such event, your access to and/or use of the Pay Portal and receipt of the Payouts will immediately be suspended or terminated, as the case may be.
6.2. Closing your Pay Portal
6.2.1. You may close your Pay Portal at any time by contacting us. Upon your Pay Portal closure, we will cancel any pending transactions and you will have a limited period of time (as determined by Hyperwallet) to transfer any remaining funds during which time your Pay Portal will be accessible for the purpose of transferring any remaining funds or balance to your Payout Method. You acknowledge that if you choose to close your Pay Portal, you will not be able to receive any further Payouts through our Services unless your Pay Portal is re-opened, or you complete the registration process for a new Pay Portal.
6.2.2. You may not close your Pay Portal to evade an investigation. If you attempt to close your Pay Portal while we are conducting an investigation, we may hold any funds or balance for up to 180 Days to protect Hyperwallet, the Affiliates, any Network Partner, or a third party against the risk of reversals, chargebacks, claims, fees, fines, penalties and other liability. You agree to cooperate in any investigation of any suspected unlawful, fraudulent or improper activity and will remain liable for all obligations related to your Pay Portal or the Payouts even after the Pay Portal is closed.
6.3. Escheatment of Dormant Pay Portals
6.3.1. If you do not login to or use your Pay Portal for one or more years, Hyperwallet may close your Pay Portal and, if required, will escheat (send) any funds in your Pay Portal to administrator of unclaimed property appointed in your state or country of residence. If you are receiving Payouts from a Payor located in the United States, Hyperwallet will determine your residency based on the address identified in your Profile on the Pay Portal. If your address is unknown, or registered in a foreign country or territory, the funds in your Pay Portal will be escheated to the State of Delaware. Where required, Hyperwallet will send you a notice prior to escheating any funds in your Pay Portal. If you fail to respond to this notice, the funds in your Pay Portal may be escheated to the applicable state. If you would like to claim any escheated funds from the applicable state, please contact the applicable state’s unclaimed property administrator.
6.3.4. Notwithstanding the above, escheatment of funds on Hyperwallet Cards, if any, will be managed in the manner described in the applicable Cardholder Agreement. Hyperwallet reserves the right to directly assess your fees related to our escheatment activities in connection with your Pay Portal and/or Payout Method.
7. Miscellaneous
7.1. Communication
7.1.1. The Electronic Signature and Communications Delivery Policy (see the “Legal” section of the website) describes how Hyperwallet communicates with you electronically. To the fullest extent permitted, you agree and consent to receive any and all communications, agreements, policies, schedules, addenda, statements, history and transaction information, documents, legal and regulatory notices and disclosures, and other content of any type or nature (collectively, "Communications") that we provide in connection with the Pay Portal and the Payouts electronically instead of in paper form.
7.1.2. In addition to electronic Communications described above, you understand and agree that we may contact you using autodialed or pre-recorded message calls or text messages at the telephone number(s) you have provided us to (i) provide notices regarding the Payouts, your Pay Portal or Pay Portal activity; (ii) respond to your inquiries; and/or (iii) investigate or prevent fraud. Standard telephone minute and text charges may apply.
7.1.3. You understand and agree that we may, without further notice or warning and in our discretion, monitor or record telephone conversations with you or anyone acting on your behalf. You acknowledge and understand that, your communications with Hyperwallet may be overheard, monitored, or recorded without further notice or warning.
7.1.4. If you have any questions about the Payouts, Payout Methods, your Pay Portal, a transaction, and/or require technical support, we encourage you to contact the Hyperwallet Support Center at 1-877-546-8220 (North America) or 1-604-638-6657 (Worldwide), or by emailing us at support@Hyperwallet.com.
7.2. Jurisdiction
7.2.1. The Terms and Conditions will be governed by and construed in accordance with the governing law corresponding to the Affiliate providing that portion of the Payout Methods to you as set forth on the Affiliates and Governing Law Schedule, without giving effect to any principles of conflict of laws. Where the laws of the United States apply, all claims and disputes arising under or relating to the Terms and Conditions are to be settled by binding arbitration and such other terms and conditions as set forth in the Agreement to Arbitrate above. Where the laws of England and Wales or the Grand Duchy of Luxembourg apply, the courts of England and Wales or the City of Luxembourg shall have exclusive jurisdiction to settle any dispute or claim arising out of or in connection with the Terms and Conditions or its subject matter or formation (including non-contractual disputes or claims). Where the laws of Canada apply, arising under or relating to the Terms and Conditions shall be submitted to and be subject to the jurisdiction of the courts of the Province of British Columbia and you hereby submit and attorn to the exclusive jurisdiction of the courts of the Province of British Columbia to finally adjudicate or determine any suit, action or proceeding arising out of or in connection with the Payout Methods, Payouts and the Pay Portal.
7.2.2. To the extent permitted by applicable law and as set forth in the agreement to arbitrate provision applicable to the Terms and Conditions, the parties hereby unconditionally waive their respective rights to a jury trial, or class action of any claim or cause of action based upon or arising out of, directly or indirectly, the Terms and Conditions, any of the related documents, and/or dealings between them relating to the subject matter of the terms of service.
7.3. Third-Party Beneficiaries
You acknowledge and agree that: (i) you are not a third-party beneficiary of any contract between Hyperwallet and any third party, and (ii) if you are receiving Payouts from a Payor that Payor is solely responsible for paying you and any dispute related to Payor’s failure to pay you shall be solely between you and Payor. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary herein, a Payor and its affiliates are intended third-party beneficiaries of these Terms and Conditions, are entitled to the rights and benefits hereunder and may enforce the provisions hereof as if they were parties hereto.
7.4. Waiver
Our failure to act with respect to a breach of any of your obligations under the Terms and Conditions by you or others does not waive our right to act with respect to subsequent or similar breaches.
7.5. Assignment
You shall not assign, novate, or otherwise transfer any rights or obligations you have under the Terms and Conditions without the prior written consent of Hyperwallet. We may assign and/or otherwise novate any right or obligation under the Terms and Conditions without your consent.
7.6. Validity
If any part of the Terms and Conditions is determined to be invalid or unenforceable pursuant to applicable law including, but not limited to, the warranty disclaimers and liability limitations set forth above, the remainder of the Terms and Conditions shall continue in full force and effect. Unless otherwise specified herein, the Terms and Conditions constitute the entire agreement between you and Hyperwallet with respect to the Payout Methods, Payouts and the Pay Portal and supersede all prior or contemporaneous communications and proposals, whether electronic, oral or written, between you and Hyperwallet with respect to the Payout Methods, Payouts and the Pay Portal. The paragraph titles in the Terms and Conditions are solely used for the convenience of the parties and have no legal or contractual significance. It is the express will of the parties that the Terms and Conditions and all related documents have been drawn up in English. We may make the Terms and Conditions available in a language other than English in our sole discretion. If you are reading the Terms and Conditions in another language, the English text shall prevail in the event of any discrepancy in terms among and between the other language(s).
Payout Schedule
1. Application
This Payout Schedule is a schedule to the Terms and Conditions and sets forth additional terms and conditions applicable to certain payment services and functionality which may be made available through the Payout Method and Pay Portal and as provided by certain Affiliates. As your Payor determines which Payout Method will be made available to you, not all terms and conditions will apply. Only those terms and conditions relating to the Payout Method made available to you will apply. We reserve the right to change this schedule at any time by posting a revised version in the Pay Portal. The revised version will be effective at the time we post it to the Pay Portal. Any capitalized terms not otherwise defined herein shall have the meanings ascribed to them in the Terms and Conditions.
2. Description of the Payout Method
2.1. Through the Pay Portal, you may receive Payouts from your Payor through one or several Payout Methods, as determined by your Payor. Payout Methods may include the ability to receive your Payouts via:
(i) transfer to your bank account via local clearing networks or wire transfer;
(ii) transfer to your Hyperwallet Card (as defined below);
(iii) transfer to your personal debit card;
(iv) transfer to your PayPal Account (as defined below);
(v) issuance of a stored value account (each as supported and where available by us);
(vi) cheque;
(vii) cash pickup at locations provided by third-party money transfer providers (e.g. Western Union, MoneyGram);
(viii) transfer to a closed-loop virtual electronic gift card; and
(ix) other Payout Methods supported and made available by Hyperwallet from time to time.
2.2. Provided you are eligible to use the Payout Methods to receive the Payouts pursuant to the Terms and Conditions and once your registration of Payout Method details (e.g. bank account information) and preferences has been completed, whether by you or through your Payor, then upon and to the extent of Hyperwallet’s receipt of funds and complete Payout Method instructions from your Payor, such funds may then be received by you through your designated Payout Method in accordance of those Payor instructions. You may have the ability to choose a Payout Method for each Payout or set a default Payout Method to receive any or all of your recurring Payouts. Payout Methods will either involve the remittance by Hyperwallet from and on behalf of Payor to you via a Payout Method or, where expressly indicated, funds being held by Hyperwallet on your behalf as stored-value as set forth below and subsequently redeemed through one or several Payout Methods made available to you.
3. General Payout Terms and Conditions
3.1. Bank Account
By directing us and/or your Payor (as the case may be) to make a transfer to your bank account, you are affirming that you are the owner of the bank account, have confirmed the accuracy of the bank account information provided to us, and have authority to initiate transactions in respect of the bank account. Hyperwallet will make electronic credits and debits via bank clearing networks and/or wire to your bank in the amount Payor specifies unless there are insufficient funds available. You agree that your requests for a transfer to your bank account constitutes your authorization to Hyperwallet to make the transfers to and from your designated checking or savings account, including any adjustments necessary for any transactions which are credited or debited in error. We may permit you or we may utilize other methods to process any particular transfer, such as a wire transfer. Once you have provided your authorization for the transfer, you will not be able to cancel that electronic transfer unless you do so in a manner that allows us and your bank a reasonable opportunity to act on such cancellation.
It may take two to five business days for the proceeds of the transfer to transmit to your bank account. In some situations, we may provide you with an estimate of the processing time your transaction will require via the Pay Portal. Although we may be able to specify a timeframe in which the funds will reach your designated bank, we cannot be responsible for any delays due to any bank clearing network or your bank’s processing of a transaction and cannot guarantee that your bank will make funds available to you on the day it receives the transfer.
You must provide us with the correct details for the bank account to which you would like to transfer funds. If you input incorrect bank account information, you agree that you will not hold Hyperwallet liable for any claims or losses should a transaction not be properly executed, including but not limited to where funds are sent to a bank account in error or otherwise. Your bank and/or a bank which is part of a bank clearing network may charge a return fee or other related fee in connection with the attempted transfer. In the event such a fee is incurred or otherwise imposed on Hyperwallet, such fee will be passed on to you and deducted from your Pay Portal balance or amounts otherwise payable to you.
We will not be liable where you do not have enough money available to transfer, your bank account is closed, the transaction exceeds dollar or frequency limitations imposed by us or your bank, your bank does not honor a transaction or participate in electronic funding, the transaction is not processed, or the transaction is returned by your bank or where we otherwise advise you that your request will not be processed. We shall have no responsibility for any action your bank may take with respect to such transfer to your bank account, including offsetting amounts owed to such bank from such transfer due to an overdrawn account, outstanding fees, or otherwise.
3.2. Hyperwallet Card
You may be issued a Visa® or MasterCard® prepaid card in connection with the Payout Methods (“Hyperwallet Card”). The Hyperwallet Card may be branded with the name and logo of “Hyperwallet” or the name and logo of your Payor. The Hyperwallet Card may be a physical card and/or virtual card. Your Hyperwallet Card is issued by a financial institution (“Issuer”) and your use of the Hyperwallet Card is subject to the terms and conditions, including fees, of applicable Issuer Cardholder Agreements. You can receive a copy of such Cardholder Agreement by contacting us.
The Hyperwallet Card does not constitute a credit card or a checking, savings, deposit or other bank account in your name. It is only available to you in connection with your trade or business and your receipt of the proceeds of your commercial activities in such trade or business from your Payor in the form of the Payouts. It is not a consumer account and is not connected in any way to any other account you may have. Funds transferred to your Hyperwallet Card will no longer be held by Hyperwallet and are instead held by the Issuer. Any balance on a Hyperwallet Card may be held by the Issuer in applicable Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation (FDIC) or equivalent government-insured account(s). Hyperwallet may show you the amount of any balance on your Hyperwallet Card in the Pay Portal for informational purposes only.
If you or your Payor directs us to transfer funds to your Hyperwallet Card, you authorize us to, regularly and without further instruction or action by you, load funds to your Hyperwallet Card, subject to limits that may apply to your Hyperwallet Card. We reserve the right to delay or otherwise limit the amounts loaded to your Hyperwallet Card at any time at our sole discretion and/or require further documentation before loading any funds.
Funds transferred to your Hyperwallet Card are generally available within one (1) Business Day (defined below) following the day the transaction request is received by us. The currency loaded on to the Hyperwallet Card is determined by the funds received from your Payor and the requirements of the Issuer and which may further be dictated by Visa or MasterCard (as the case may be).
Hyperwallet Cards do not offer any credit or overdraft features on the Hyperwallet Cards. Hyperwallet does not authorize prepaid card transactions where there the card has insufficient or unavailable funds. In the event of a merchant forced transactions, settlement timing or errors create a negative card balance, Hyperwallet will not charge an overdraft fee to you.
Where permitted by the card issuer, Hyperwallet may transfer funds from your Hyperwallet Card to your bank account identified in the Pay Portal. You acknowledge and agree that any request of Hyperwallet by you to conduct such transfers (unloads) is fulfilled at Hyperwallet’s discretion strictly in its capacity as a service provider and program manager for the bank that issued the Hyperwallet Card to you. You further agree that any such transfer requested by you is made in connection with and on behalf of your trade or business.
3.3. Personal Debit Card
In certain cases, your Payor may support the ability for you to transfer your payments on an existing Visa® or MasterCard® debit card associated with your US bank account (“Debit Card”). Your Debit Card must be enabled by the bank that issued you the Debit Card. Use of your Debit Card, including balance, transaction history, fees, and other limitations and restrictions will be subject to the terms and conditions determined by your bank.
By directing us and/or your Payor (as the case may be) to make a transfer to your Debit Card, you are affirming that you are the owner of the Debit Card and associated bank account linked to it, have confirmed the accuracy of the Debit Card information provided to us, and have authority to initiate transactions in respect of the Debit Card. Hyperwallet will make electronic credits and debits via Visa®, MasterCard®, or other banking networks in the amount you specify unless there are insufficient funds available. You agree that your requests for a transfer to your Debit Card constitutes your authorization to Hyperwallet to make the transfers to and from your designated Debit Card, including any adjustments necessary for any transactions which are credited or debited in error. Transfers to a debit card not owned by you or transfers to any credit card, whether or not owned by you, are not permitted.
Once funds are transferred to your Debit Card, such funds are no longer held by Hyperwallet and are instead held by the bank that issued you the Debit Card. If you or your Payor direct us to transfer funds to your Debit Card, you authorize us to, regularly and without further instruction or action by you, load funds to your Debit Card, subject to limits that may apply to your Debit Card. We reserve the right to limit the amounts loaded to your Debit Card at any time at our sole discretion and/or require further documentation before loading any funds.
Funds transferred to your Debit Card are generally available within one (1) Business Day (defined below) following the day the transaction request is received by us. We cannot be responsible for any delays due to Visa® or MasterCard®, any network or third-party processor, or your bank’s processing or failure or delay in processing of a transaction and cannot guarantee that your bank will make funds available to you on the day it receives the transfer to your Debit Card. The currency loaded on to the Debit Card is determined by the funds received from your Payor and the requirements of the bank that issued you the Debit Card and which may further be dictated by Visa® or MasterCard® (as the case may be).
You must provide us with the correct details for the Debit Card to which you would like to transfer funds. If you input incorrect Debit Card information, you agree that you will not hold Hyperwallet liable for any claims or losses should a transaction not be properly executed, including but not limited to where funds are sent to another debit card in error or otherwise. Your bank may charge a return fee or other related fee in connection with the attempted transfer. In the event such a fee is incurred or otherwise imposed on Hyperwallet, such fee will be passed on to you and deducted from your Pay Portal balance or amounts otherwise payable to you.
We will not be liable where you do not have enough money available to transfer, your Debit Card and its associated bank account is closed, the transaction exceeds dollar or frequency limitations imposed by us, Visa® or MasterCard®, any network or third party processor, or your bank, your bank does not honor a transaction or participate in electronic funding, the transaction is not processed, or the transaction is returned by your bank or where we otherwise advise you that your request will not be processed. We shall have no responsibility for any action your bank may take with respect to such transfer to your Debit Card, including offsetting amounts owed to such bank from such transfer due to an overdrawn account, outstanding fees, or otherwise.
3.4. PayPal Account
If permitted by your Payor, and as Hyperwallet may elect to make available from time to time, you may receive Payouts to a PayPal Account (as defined below) in your name. Transfers directed to your PayPal Account are subject to the terms and conditions imposed by the issuer of your PayPal Account. By directing us and/or your Payor (as the case may be) to make a Payout to your PayPal Account, you are affirming that you are the owner of the PayPal Account, have confirmed the accuracy of the account information provided to us, and have authority to initiate transfers to the PayPal Account. We will not be liable to you if you do not have enough money to make a Payout to your PayPal Account, your PayPal Account is closed, the transaction exceeds dollar or frequency limitations imposed by us or the PayPal, or if the transfer is returned or rejected by the PayPal for any reason.
We are not responsible for fees or adjustments assessed by PayPal or any delay of any Payout Method attributable to PayPal or any third-party processor used by PayPal to process the Payout Method. Hyperwallet may determine in its sole discretion the availability of Payout Methods to any PayPal Account and/or the currency that denominates any transfer to n PayPal Account.
3.5. Cheque
If you direct us to transfer funds to you and issue a cheque as your Payout Method, you are responsible for confirming the accuracy of the mailing address you provide. We will not send cheques to P.O. boxes. We will only issues cheques which are payable to you as an eligible payee of a Payor and will not issue a cheque to any third party.
Funds transferred to cheque are generally mailed via First Class Mail to you within five (5) Business Days following our receipt of your request and confirmation of complete and accurate payment and mailing information. Mailing periods vary depending on geography. Hyperwallet does not provide expedited delivery service. Hyperwallet may limit the amount of transfers via cheque and/or the address or country to which a cheque may be mailed. If you fail to cash a cheque within 90 days of the date of issuance, the cheque will be cancelled and we will return the funds to the Pay Portal for which a fee will be charged.
3.6. Cash Pickup
If you direct us to transfer funds for cash pick up by you at locations provided by third-party cash pickup providers supported by Hyperwallet such as Western Union or MoneyGram, you are authorizing us to transfer, your identifying information, Payout funds, and funding instructions to such third parties.. Cash pick up services are subject to the terms and conditions of those entities, including applicable fees assessed by Western Union or MoneyGram (as the case may be), as described at www.westernunion.com or www.moneygram.com, depending on the service you choose (subject to availability).
Such Payout Method and availability of funds depends on certain factors including the service selected, the selection of delayed delivery options, amount sent, destination country, currency availability, regulatory issues, consumer protection issues, identification requirements, delivery restrictions, agent location hours, and differences in time zones.
Transactions not picked up or canceled within the time required by Western Union or MoneyGram (as the case may be) following the send date may be assessed administrative and/or foreign exchange fees and/or losses which may be deducted from the amount sent.
3.7. Electronic Gift Cards
If permitted by your Payor, and as Hyperwallet may elect to make available from time to time, you may receive your Payment(s) in the form of a closed loop virtual gift card redeemable from a single retail merchant for goods and services online, or in-store (an “eGift Card”). The eGift Card retailer may be selected by your Payor or selected by you from among the menu of retailers that Hyperwallet may make available to you. EGift Cards issued to you will be sent to the email address associated with your Pay Portal. Payments received by you via eGift Card are generally available to you for immediate use on the eGift Card sent to you. We reserve the right to delay or otherwise limit the amounts of the Payments that you may receive via eGift Card at any time at our sole discretion.
Payments received to an eGift Card are available solely for redemption for goods and services from the selected eGift Card retailer and cannot be transferred from the eGift Card to you through any other Payout Method. Once issued, an eGift Card cannot be reloaded with funds from any additional subsequent Payouts you may receive. Additionally, your use of the eGift Card is subject to the terms and conditions, including fees, set by the eGift Card retailer. You may receive a copy of the terms and conditions applicable to your eGift Card by contacting us.
3.8. Currencies
In certain circumstances, Payor funds payable to you may be available in different currencies supported by us from time to time. The currencies made available are dependent upon the funding requirements of your Payor. You will not be permitted to convert funds in your Pay Portal in order to hold the funds in a different currency (except in connection with a Payout to a Payout Method where such currency options are available) and you agree that you will not attempt to use multiple currencies for speculative trading. You may request to receive funds that are reflected in your Pay Portal in a different currency only at the time of and in connection with your requested Payout via a Payout Method. If you request a Payout in a currency different than the currency in which your Pay Portal was funded, the exchange rate, which will include a transaction fee, will be determined at the time your transaction is processed and deducted from the amount transferred. The fees and currency rate applicable to your transaction will be provided to you in the Pay Portal when you initiate your transaction. You are responsible for all risks associated with receiving a Payout in any currency.
3.9. Additional Optional Services
Hyperwallet may offer you additional optional services from time to time. Such services may include the ability to purchase or incent the purchase of goods and services from your Payor from your Pay Portal (“Spendback” and “Promo”), transfer funds from a Hyperwallet Card to your bank account, the population and production of United States Federal tax forms for domestic and foreign Payees, and such other services and functionality as offered and supported by us from time to time. Hyperwallet may offer, limit, restrict, or terminate any such services without notice to you.
4. Additional Restrictions
Any or all of the Payouts, fees, rates, and the availability and timing of your receipt of any Payout may be affected, limited, delayed or restricted due to a number of factors beyond our control, including but not limited to the funding by your Payor, Payout Method selected, Network Partner requirements, currency availability, regulatory and compliance requirements, country and delivery restrictions, time zone differences, and socio-economic and government factors. Hyperwallet does not guarantee the availability of any Payout Method and makes no representation, warranty or otherwise as to any specific service level, fees, rates, availability or timeframe and will not be liable to you for any negative affect, limitation, delay or restriction.
You hereby certify that you will use the Payouts to process transactions in the name of the registered Pay Portal holder only. Hyperwallet prohibits using the Payouts while impersonating any person or entity or falsely claiming an affiliation with any person or entity. If a Payor sends payments for loading to your Pay Portal, you may transfer those funds only to a bank account or other permitted Payout Method of which you are the named holder.
You may not transfer funds to third-party accounts. We may treat any attempt by you to send funds to an account or Payout Method or other payment instrument of which you are not the named holder as a fraudulent act.
You are not permitted to add money, send / transfer any funds to anyone other than yourself via the Pay Portal or through receipt of the Payouts. Use of the Pay Portal, Payout Methods, or Payouts to conduct person-to-person transfers is strictly prohibited. You may not use the Pay Portal, Payout Methods or Payouts to manage multiple currencies or for spot trading or creating forward contracts. We reserve the right to reject or limit Payout Methods at any time in our sole discretion, including but not limited due to anti-money laundering or risk management concerns. We retain full discretion to refuse to accept any user or to complete any instruction from a Payor or from you to make payments using the Pay Portal or Payout Methods.
5. Refused Transactions
We reserve the right in our sole discretion to refuse any transfer or other request. Reasons for refusal may include but are not limited to insufficient funds, incorrect or outdated information, or activity we deem suspicious. We generally will attempt to notify you of any refusal, using the contact information available to us or in your Profile, stating (where possible) the reasons for the refusal and whether the problem can be corrected. We will not notify you of a refusal where to do so would be unlawful or otherwise prohibited by law.
The Payouts may also be subject to transfer limits. These limits may be adjusted dynamically depending on the type of identification document(s) you provide to us as well as on any other criteria we require from time to time. We may require you to provide us with information verifying your identity, address or other information prior to allowing a withdrawal or transfer of funds. You agree to cooperate with us in any such requests.
6. Cancellation of Transactions
You may cancel a Spendback or Promo request for a refund, less applicable transaction fees, (a) within 30 minutes of authorizing your transfer request; or (b) at any time thereafter only if we have not already commenced processing the transaction in accordance with your order. Due to the particular requirements and rules governing the processing of transfers to Payout Methods, such as wire transfers, transfers and redemptions to such Payout Methods may not be canceled. If you believe there to be an error in connection with a transfer you should notify us immediately by contacting us.
7. Liability for Transfer Errors
You must ensure that the Payout Method details you enter when transferring funds are correct and complete. Failure to provide Hyperwallet with accurate information shall be your sole responsibility. We will not be responsible for actions taken by you in directing us to transfer funds and may rely on information you provide. We will not be liable for losses you sustain if a Payout is misallocated due to errors in the Payout Method details provided by you. It is your responsibility to make sure that all Pay Portal details including but not limited to any bank account numbers, bank account provider details, card details, currency selected, etc. are correct before sending. If any such details are incorrect, your funds may be debited or credited to the wrong account, card or other destination and may not be recovered. If you believe there to be an error in connection with a transfer you should notify us immediately by contacting us.
8. Right of Set-Off, Holds, Reversals, and Reserves
You agree that we are authorized at any time to set-off the funds in your Pay Portal or owed to you from your Payor against your debts or liabilities owed to us, including but not limited to those arising out of any breach of the Terms and Conditions. You also agree that we may reverse or place a hold on your transactions or place a reserve on your funds in your Pay Portal or otherwise owed to you from your Payor if you are in breach of or as otherwise as permitted by the Terms and Conditions. We may exercise any of the rights in this section without notice to you.
9. Dispute Resolution
Information regarding Payouts received, transfers made from your Pay Portal, Hyperwallet Card activity, and certain other Payouts are displayed in the “History” section of Pay Portal. You should check your transaction history regularly and report any unauthorized transactions, unauthorized changes, suspicious activity, errors, irregularities or other complaints as soon as possible by Contacting Us.
In order to file a claim for an unauthorized or incorrectly executed transaction, you must notify us as soon as possible after the date of the transaction. Notwithstanding when you notify us, you understand we may not be able to reverse or correct the unauthorized or incorrect transaction. With respect to any Hyperwallet Card transaction, you must follow the instructions and timeframes set forth in your Cardholder Agreement.
After contacting us we will work with you and your Payor as necessary to attempt to resolve your complaint as quickly as possible under the circumstances. We may require you to provide us details of your complaint in writing and request additional information in order to investigate your complaint. If you feel your question or issue remains unresolved after contacting us, you may also contact the appropriate regional dispute resolution organization directly as further set forth in the “Licenses and Complaints” section of the website.
10. Additional Terms for Canada and the United States
10.1. Remittance
In the United States and Canada and except as otherwise explicitly agreed to by Hyperwallet through this Payout Schedule, Hyperwallet acts as an agent of the Payor in carrying out the Payout Method instructions and remittance of funds of such Payors to their designated payees. As an agent of the Payor, any balance of funds in the Pay Portal does not represent stored value owned by you but belongs to and is the property of the Payor until actually received by you via your Payout Method notwithstanding any ability you may have to direct or instruct us to make any payments of funds reflected in the Pay Portal to your Payout Method and/or to execute any Additional Optional Services such as but not limited to Spendback or Promos.
10.2. Stored Value
Where expressly indicated by Hyperwallet only, a Pay Portal balance may be treated as stored value and owned by you. In these situations, Hyperwallet will identify your Pay Portal balance as stored value and owned by you in the Pay Portal. Any such stored value is not a gift card or gift certificate. Where Hyperwallet has identified the balance in your Pay Portal as stored value, you do not need to maintain a balance in your Pay Portal in order to receive the Services although Hyperwallet reserves the right to close your Pay Portal in its sole discretion. You acknowledge that the Services and the Pay Portal are not bank accounts and that Hyperwallet is not a financial institution. Funds reflected in or transmitted in connection with the Pay Portal do not earn any interest payable to you.
Hyperwallet will combine your balance with the balances of other users and will safeguard those funds in accordance with applicable US state money transmitter laws. We will hold pooled balances separate from our corporate funds and will not use balances for our operating expenses or for other corporate purposes. We will not voluntarily make balances available to creditors in the event of insolvency.
11. Additional Payment Terms for the European Economic Area (“EEA”) and United Kingdom Only
11.1. Introduction
The Additional Payment Terms as described under this Section 11 are between (i) you, as an EEA-based or a UK-based Payee; and (ii) PayPal (Europe) S.à r.l. et Cie, S.C.A. (R.C.S. Luxembourg B 118 349), a duly licensed Luxembourg credit institution in the sense of Article 2 of the law of 5 April 1993 on the financial sector, as amended, and under the prudential supervision of the Luxembourg supervisory authority, the Commission de Surveillance du Secteur Financier. From 1 January 2021, PayPal (Europe) S.à r.l. et Cie, S.C.A. is deemed authorised and regulated by the Financial Conduct Authority. The nature and extent of consumer protections may differ from those for firms based in the UK. Details of the Temporary Permissions Regime, which allows EEA-based firms to operate in the UK for a limited period while seeking full authorisation, are available on the Financial Conduct Authority’s website.
PayPal (Europe) S.à r.l. et Cie, S.C.A. provides Services to you in accordance with this Section 11. If you are receiving Payment Processing Services, PayPal (Europe) S.à r.l. et Cie, S.C.A. provides these to you pursuant to Section 11.5.
11.2. Security and Use of Regulated Third-Party Service Providers
As stated in the Terms and Conditions, you must take all the steps you reasonably can to maintain adequate security and control of all IDs, usernames, passwords, personal identification numbers (PINs), or any other codes that you use to access the Pay Portal, receiving the Payouts or in conjunction with use of the Payout Methods, so that no unauthorised person or entity can use your credentials to log on to your Pay Portal. You must tell us as soon as you can by contacting us if you think someone may be using the Pay Portal without your permission. Before using a third-party service provider you should check with the regulator whether it is authorized and review the provider’s terms and conditions. In the event that we have reasonably evidenced and justified concerns about a third-party service provider for reasons relating to authorisation or fraud we may deny the third-party service provider access to your account. In such event we will notify you and the FCA before or immediately after access denial, unless this would compromise our security concerns or it would be unlawful to do so.
11.3. Restrictions
11.3.1. Provision of Spendback
If Hyperwallet makes Spendback available to you for the purchase of goods or services provided by your Payor, and except as otherwise agreed, Hyperwallet acts as an agent of the Payor in carrying out the Payout Method instructions, which instructions may be amended to reflect amounts netted off to execute Spendback purchases via the Pay Portal which is provided for the purposes of this section as a regulated money remittance service. Any amounts available for Spendback in the Pay Portal do not represent e-money owned by you but belong to and are the property of the Payor until actually received by you via your Payout Method notwithstanding any ability you may have to direct or instruct us to make any payments of funds reflected in the Pay Portal to your Payout Method and/or to execute any Additional Optional Services such as but not limited to Spendback. For the avoidance of doubt, the Pay Portal is not a payment account within the meaning of PSD2. Hyperwallet may offer, limit, restrict, or terminate any such services without notice to you.
11.3.2. Spending limits
You agree that we may apply spending limits to your Hyperwallet account and we’ll tell you if we do so.
11.3.3. Stopping a Payout Method
We may stop a Payout Method if:
(i) you do not have enough money in your account to complete the Payout;
(ii) the Payout Method would put you over any spending limit we introduce;
(iii) we reasonably believe and discover that a Payout Method may be unauthorized or you may be acting illegally or that it would be against the law for us allow the Payout Method to be processed; and/or
(iv) the Payout Method would breach or otherwise violate the terms of the Terms and Conditions.
11.3.4. Blocking your Payout instrument
If we have reason to believe that you have engaged in a breach of these Terms and Conditions or any applicable laws and regulations, we may take various actions to protect Hyperwallet, your Payor, a third party, or you from fees, fines, penalties and any other liability. The actions we may take include but are not limited to the following:
(i) We may, at any time and without liability, suspend, block, limit, close or cancel your right to use your account entirely or for any particular transaction, which may in turn suspend, block, limit, close or cancel access to the Payout Methods. We will normally give you advance notice of any suspension or cancellation but we may, if it is reasonable to do so (for example if you are in breach of these Terms and Conditions or we consider it advisable for security reasons), suspend or cancel your right to use your account without prior notice to you; or
(ii) Refuse any particular Payout Method at any time for any reason and will only be required to make available the fact of the refusal and the reasons for the refusal and how you may resolve the problem, where possible, upon request and provided it is not prohibited by law
11.4. PSD2 Provisions
Depending upon the Payouts to be made available to you by your Payor, certain Payout Methods described above constitute a regulated money remittance service in EEA or UK and do not involve you having e-money with us or any Affiliate. In the event that Payout Methods constitute money remittance, then your payment service provider will be a third party such as your bank or card issuer and you should refer to such party’s terms and conditions for the provision of regulated payment services to you.
In the event that you are in receipt of the Payment Processing Services pursuant to Section 11.5, then we are your payment service provider and our provision of regulated payment services to you is governed by all the terms herein and subject to the disapplication of certain provisions of EU’s Payment Services Directive (Directive 2015/2366/EU) (“PSD2”). You agree that, if and to the extent that the provision of any Payouts at any time is subject to any legislation in any jurisdiction implemented for purposes of transposing PSD2, the following provisions of PSD2 shall not apply to this Agreement or to the provision of such Payouts:
(i) Articles 40 (Charges for information), 41 (Burden of proof on information requirements), 42 (Derogation from information requirements for low-value payment instruments and electronic money), 44 (Prior general information), 45 (Information and conditions), 46 (Information for the payer and payee after the initiation of a payment order), 47 (Information for payer's account servicing payment service provider in the event of a payment initiation service), 48 (Information for the payer after receipt of the payment order), 49 (Information for the payee after execution), 51 (Prior general information), 52 (Information and conditions), 53 (Accessibility of information and conditions of the framework contract), 54 (Changes in conditions of the framework contract), 55 (Termination), 56 (Information before execution of individual payment transactions), 57 (Information for the payer on individual payment transactions), 58 (Information for the payee on individual payment transactions), 59 (Currency and currency conversion), 60 (Information on additional charges or reductions), 62(1) (Charges applicable), 64(3) (Consent and withdrawal of consent), 72 (Evidence on authentication and execution of payment transactions), 74 (Payer's liability for unauthorised payment transactions), 76 (Refunds for payment transactions initiated by or through a payee), 77 (Requests for refunds for payment transactions initiated by or through a payee), 80 (Irrevocability of a payment order), and 89 (Payment service providers' liability for non-execution, defective or late execution of payment transactions); and
(ii) where transactions are neither euro nor pound sterling transactions, the requirements regarding execution and time-value dating set out in any PSD2 transposition relating to Articles 83 to 85 of PSD2 will not apply to this Agreement or to the provision of such Payouts, to the extent permitted by Applicable Law.
11.5. Additional Terms of Use of the Marketplace or Payor Platform
11.5.1. If you decide to use the Payment Processing Services (as defined below) provided by PayPal (Europe) S.à.r.l. et Cie, S.C.A. (“
PayPal
”), through a Payor that operates a marketplace platform (“
Payor Platform
”), as well as other related services on the Payor Platform the terms and conditions of this Section 11.5 (as amended from time to time) (“Platform Terms and Conditions”) will apply to you.
11.5.2. PayPal Payment Processing Services and Payor Platform Services
(i)
PayPal Payment Processing Services
. PayPal provides the PayPal Payment Processing Services for your use solely through the Payor Platform and subject to these Platform Terms and Conditions set out in Section 11.5. The Payment Processing Services can only be accessed through an account within the Payor Platform, and used to accept and receive payments from buyers using PayPal branded products and services as well as products and services of non-affiliated merchant acquirers, originating from payment accounts, credit cards, debit cards and other payment types related to your sales taking place only on the Payor Platform in exchange for goods and/or services (“
Platform Payee Account
”). For the avoidance of doubt, this Platform Payee Account is not a payment account within the meaning of PSD2.
(ii)
Payor Platform Services
. The Payor Platform may also provide certain services to you (“
Platform Services
”) examples of which may include, but are not limited to, the following: helping you create your Platform Payee Account; providing customer service; assisting with refund and dispute services for transactions involving your Platform Payee Account; providing dashboards and other tools on the Payor Platform that may allow you to manage certain aspects of your Platform Payee Account; and providing technical services, as related to the PayPal Payment Processing Services. The services provided by the Payor Platform are governed solely by your agreement with the Payor Platform and are not provided by PayPal or its affiliates. Any dispute you might have with the Payor Platform concerning services that the Payor Platform provides is between you and the Payor Platform and PayPal is not a party to such dispute; PayPal will not be responsible or liable for the Payor Platform’s failure to provide the Platform Services as agreed. PayPal is not an e-commerce platform or marketplace, and only provides the PayPal Payment Processing Services.
11.5.3. Fees for PayPal Payment Processing Services and Payor Platform Services
(i) PayPal Payment Processing Services Fees. The fees for your use of the PayPal Payment Processing Services through the Payor Platform are accessible on the Payor Platform or otherwise as disclosed to you by the Payor Platform or PayPal. You undertake to pay such fees and your payment of such fees constitutes valid consideration for purposes of these Platform Terms and Conditions between you and PayPal. Upon instructions by your Payor, PayPal will have the right to deduct from your Platform Payee Account funds PayPal’s fees for the PayPal Payment Processing Services. You are responsible for the fees for the PayPal Payment Processing Services even if there are insufficient funds to cover such fees associated with your Platform Payee Account. If your Platform Payee Account funds are not sufficient to cover the fees, you authorise PayPal to debit immediately the amount owed from your Payouts. In the event that PayPal is unable to recover any fee amount that is due from your Platform Payee Account, PayPal may terminate your use of the PayPal Payment Processing Services within 30 days of the date that the fee was due, and you will remain obligated to pay PayPal for any unpaid amounts.
(ii) Payor Platform Services Fees. You hereby agree that the Payor Platform can deduct from your Platform Payee Account balance any Platform Services fees or other amounts payable to Payor Platform communicated to us by the Payor Platform. You are responsible for such payments to the Payor Platform even if there are insufficient funds to cover such fees associated with your Platform Payee Account. If your Platform Payee Account funds are not sufficient to cover the fees, you authorise PayPal to debit immediately the amount owed from your Payout Methods. In the event that PayPal is unable to recover any fee amount that is due from your Platform Payee Account, PayPal may terminate your use of the PayPal Payment Processing Services within 30 days of the date that the fee was due, and you will remain obligated to pay PayPal for any unpaid amounts. If you want to cancel the authorisation for the future, you can close your account with the Payor Platform.
(iii) Taxes. It is your responsibility to determine what, if any, taxes apply to the payments you make or receive, and it is your responsibility to collect, report and remit the correct tax to the appropriate tax authority. PayPal is not responsible for determining whether taxes apply to your Payout Methods or Payouts, or for collecting, reporting or remitting any taxes arising from any transaction.
11.5.4. Payouts
(i)
General
. You will receive a Payout of your Platform Payee Account funds from PayPal in accordance with Section 2 of the Payout Schedule of the Terms and Conditions. Any funds associated with your Platform Payee Account, net of any deductions, set-off or debit amounts owed to the Payor Platform or PayPal, will constitute a Payout. If any amounts owed to PayPal exceed the amount of funds associated with your Platform Payee Account, PayPal may initiate a debit from your Payout Methods (if applicable). You agree that PayPal may debit your account for the applicable amounts, and/or setoff the applicable amounts against future Payouts. Upon PayPal’s request, you agree to provide PayPal with all necessary bank account, routing and related information and grant PayPal any required permission to debit the applicable amounts from your Payout Method. Any Payouts, including the timing thereof, will be in accordance with the terms and conditions established by, and communicated to you by, the Payor Platform. Any Payout may be reduced by the amount of fees, fines and amounts owed to PayPal or the Payor Platform for any reason.
(ii)
Suspension of Payouts
. PayPal reserves the right to suspend the Payouts to you, even after you have stopped accepting payments to your Platform Payee Account through the Payor Platform. Examples of situations where PayPal may do so are: (i) when PayPal is instructed to do so by the Payor Platform; (ii) where there are pending, anticipated, or excessive chargebacks, refunds, reversals, disputes or invalidated payments; (iii) in the event that PayPal suspects or becomes aware of suspicious activity; (iv) where PayPal is required by applicable law or court order. If PayPal exercises its right to withhold a Payout for any reason, PayPal will work with the Payor Platform to communicate the general reason for withholding the Payout and give you a timeline for releasing the funds and any necessary steps you’re required to take.
(iii)
Incorrect Payouts
. The information required for receiving your Payouts will depend on the financial institution where you hold your Payout Method. Please make sure that any information about your Payout Method that you provide to PayPal is accurate and complete. If your Payout Method information changes or you decide that you want to switch to a different Payout Method, you must notify PayPal by following the procedures established by the Payor Platform. The Payor Platform might require you to provide notice of a change a certain number of days in advance of the change taking effect. You understand that this requirement exists to ensure the Payor Platform has sufficient time to notify us of the change and to give us time to reflect the change in our systems. PayPal will not be responsible for any problems with a Payout that results from PayPal using incorrect Payout Method information because of your delay in providing notice to the Payor Platform.
11.5.5. Service Requirements, Limitations and Restrictions
(i)
Compliance with Applicable Law
. You must use the PayPal Payment Processing Services in a lawful manner, and must obey all laws, rules, and regulations applicable to your use of the PayPal Payment Processing Services and to transactions. As applicable, this may include compliance with domestic and international laws related to the use of provision of financial services, notification and consumer protection, unfair competition, privacy, and false advertising, and any other laws relevant to transactions. This may also include compliance with any rule, guideline, or bylaw of any of the card networks (e.g. Visa, Mastercard, American Express and Discover) or of the Payor Platform.
(ii) Prohibited Businesses and Activities. In connection with your use of the PayPal Payment Processing Services, you must comply with the
Acceptable Use Policy
. You may not use the PayPal Payment Processing Services in or for the benefit of a country, organization, entity, or person embargoed or blocked by any government, including those on sanctions lists identified by the United States Office of Foreign Asset Control (OFAC). You may not use the PayPal Payment Processing Services to facilitate illegal transactions or to permit others to use the PayPal Payment Processing Services for personal, family or household purposes.
(iii)
Service Limitations and Restrictions
. PayPal may refuse, condition, or suspend any transactions that PayPal believes: (i) may violate these Terms and Conditions or other agreements you may have with PayPal; (ii) are unauthorized, fraudulent or illegal; or (iii) expose you, PayPal, the Payor Platform, or others to risks unacceptable to PayPal. If PayPal suspects or knows that you are using or have used the PayPal Payment Processing Services for unauthorized, fraudulent, or illegal purposes, PayPal may share any information related to such activity with the appropriate financial institution, regulatory authority, or law enforcement agency consistent with PayPal’s legal obligations. This information may include information about you, your Platform Payee Account, your customers, and transactions made through your use of the PayPal Payment Processing Services.
11.5.6. Your Obligations to Customers and Customers’ Obligations to You
You are solely responsible for, and PayPal disclaims any liability for, the provision of goods or services sold to your customers or users as part of your use of the PayPal Payment Processing Services, and any obligation you may owe to your customers or users. PayPal is not responsible for your obligations to your customers, including to properly describe and deliver the goods or services being sold to your customers. You are solely responsible for, and PayPal expressly disclaims all liability for, your compliance with applicable law and obligations related to your provision of the goods or services to your customers. This may include providing customer service, notification and handling of refunds or consumer complaints, provision of receipts, registering your legal entity, or other actions not related to the PayPal Payment Processing Services. You agree to indemnify PayPal for any losses we incur based on your failure to properly describe or deliver goods or services, or comply with your legal or contractual obligations to your customers. PayPal is not responsible for any amounts owed to you by your customers, including amounts for payment transactions that were authorized by the issuer or other provider of the customer’s payment method but that were subsequently rejected or reversed.
11.5.7. Payee Permissions and Instructions to PayPal
(i)
Permissions and Instructions
. You hereby appoint the Payor Platform as your technical service provider to:
a) request that a one-time or recurring transaction, submitted to PayPal by the Payor Platform via its technical integration with PayPal for purposes of providing the Platform Services, shall be deemed as if submitted and authorised by you and/or on your behalf;
b) request that an instruction for splitting your Payouts, submitted by the Payor Platform via its technical integration with PayPal, shall be deemed as if submitted and authorised by your and/or on your behalf. An instruction for splitting the Payout amount is your request to PayPal to: (i) deduct the Platform Services fees from Payouts in relation to your Platform Payee Account and (ii) to arrange for this specific amount to be paid by PayPal directly to the Payor Platform on your behalf.
c) request that a refund transaction, submitted to PayPal by the Payor Platform via its technical integration with PayPal, shall be deemed as if submitted and authorised by your and/or on your behalf;
d) agree to obtain your customer’s permission, where legally required, for the transfer of your customer’s data to the Platform by PayPal for the purposes of (i) providing the PayPal Payment Processing Services and (ii) compliance with applicable law.
e) authorise PayPal to share any data and confidential information with the Platform as and when required solely for the purposes of (i) providing the PayPal Payment Processing Services and (ii) compliance with applicable law.
You hereby agree as a principal to confer the authority to the Payor Platform as your exclusive agent to:
a) access your Platform Payee Account, and perform any and all actions therein in your name, on your behalf and instead of you, that a PayPal primary account user can perform, subject to these Terms and Conditions and any restrictions under applicable law;
b) communicate with PayPal as your sole representative, in relation to your Platform Payee Account and that any such communication in writing shall be considered as if received from and/or communicated to you directly, subject to these Terms and Conditions and any restrictions under applicable law. As representative, the Payor Platform shall be released from any restrictions of self-contracting under any applicable law.
You can revoke the permissions and instructions herein anytime. If you decide however to revoke them, you will no longer be able to receive the PayPal Payment Processing Services via the Payor Platform.
(ii)
Responsibility and Liability for Permissions and Instructions
. You hereby accept that to the extent permissible by law: (i) PayPal shall not be liable for any delays and/or errors in the execution of the payment transactions or Payouts caused directly or indirectly by the technical or other issues due to the Payor Platform and/or its technical integration with PayPal and/or (ii) you will be liable for any assessments, fines or similar imposed by the card networks to PayPal and/or its banking partners in relation to the PayPal Payment Processing Services. You further agree to take full responsibility to the extent permissible by law for the above mentioned instructions and authorisations granted to PayPal for the Payor Platform to act on your behalf in performing certain of your obligations when receiving services from PayPal.
11.5.8. Data Sharing
You understand and agree that the Payor Platform and PayPal will share certain information about you, activity on your Platform Payee Account, your transactions and any other information necessary to facilitate your use of the PayPal Payment Processing Services or our provision of the PayPal Payment Processing Services. Where PayPal receives such information, we may use it in accordance with the relevant
Privacy Policy
and (where applicable) the
Data Protection Addendum
which governs PayPal’s provisions of its Payment Processing Services through its Braintree service (the “
Payment Services Agreement
”).
11.6. Further Clarifications
In the event that you are a consumer, a micro-enterprise or a charity, the following clarifications to the Terms and Conditions and the Payout Schedule apply:
For Terms and Conditions:
(i) Sections 1.2.4 and 3.3: We will notify you of any changes to the Terms and Conditions on two (2) months notice except where the changes are more favourable for you in which case the changes will be immediate. In the event that you do not accept the changes you have a right of termination at any time without charge within the two (2) month notice period or such later date when the change is due to come into effect.
(ii) Section 3.1.1: The Pay Portal contains all relevant information relating to the Payouts, fees and exchange rates. It also provides all relevant information relating to the Payout transactions including (a) a reference enabling you to identify the Payout transaction and, where appropriate, the payer and any information transferred with the Payout transaction; (b) the amount of the Payout transaction in the currency in which the funds are at your disposal; (c) the amount of any charges for the Payout transaction payable by you and, where applicable, a breakdown of the amount of such charges; d) where applicable, the exchange rate used in the Payout transaction, and the amount of the Payout transaction before that currency conversion; and (e) the credit value date.
(iii) Section 3.1: You agree that we may deduct all applicable fees listed in the Pay Portal from your account or the sums we send to you.
(iv) Section 6.1: These Terms and Conditions apply from the moment you successfully register to use the Pay Portal and/or receive the Payouts, and end when your Pay Portal is closed and the Payouts are ceased for whatever reason, except that these Terms and Conditions will survive termination to the extent and for so long as we require to deal with the closure of your Pay Portal and to comply with applicable laws and regulations. Furthermore, Sections 5, 6 and 7 shall survive the termination of this agreement.
(v) Section 6.3: You may redeem part or all of the funds in your account at any time up to six (6) years after the date of termination or expiry of this agreement.
(vi) Section 7.1: You may request paper statements free of charge by providing a written request addressed to Hyperwallet Systems Inc., Suite 300, 950 Granville Street, Vancouver, British Columbia, Canada, V6Z 1L2. Please include your name, Pay Portal user ID and address. You can also print or download copies from the Pay Portal free of charge.
For Payout Schedule:
(i) Section 3.1: We will execute your Payout transactions by the end of the business day following the time of receipt of the relevant Payouts.
(ii) Section 5: We will notify you of any refusal of a Payout at the earliest opportunity and such notice will include the procedure for rectification of the reason for refusal if possible
(iii) Sections 6 & 7: Hyperwallet will ensure that the details of each transaction will be made available for you to view online for at least 13 months from when it is first made available. You must notify us without undue delay on becoming aware of any unauthorized, incorrectly executed Payout transaction or in the event that you think someone is using your security credentials without your permission without undue delay on becoming aware of the same and in any event no later than thirteen (13) months after the debit date. You are liable up to a maximum of £35 for any losses incurred in respect of an unauthorised Payout transaction except (1) where the loss, theft or misappropriation of a Payout instrument was not detectable by you prior to the Payout, except where the payer acted fraudulently; or (2) the loss was caused by acts or omissions of an employee, agent or branch of a payment service provider or of an entity which carried out activities on behalf of the payment service provider. You are liable for all losses incurred in respect of an unauthorised Payout transaction where you (1) acted fraudulently; or (2) failing with intent or gross negligence to comply with the terms of this agreement in relation to Payout instruments and personalised security credentials. Except where you have acted fraudulently, you are not liable for any losses incurred in respect of an unauthorised Payout transaction arising after properly notifying us. If we discover a processing error, we will rectify the error. If the error resulted in your receiving less money than you were entitled to, Hyperwallet will credit your account for the difference. If the error results in you receiving more money than you were entitled to, Hyperwallet may debit the extra funds from your account. If a Payout was made to your account by way of mistake, Hyperwallet may correct the mistake by debiting or crediting (as the case may be) your appropriate Funding Source(s). If the error resulted in our not completing a transaction on time or in the correct amount, we will be liable to refund any amount as a result of carrying out a defective, late or non-executed Payout transaction and for your losses or damages directly and reasonably foreseeably caused by this failure, unless:
through no fault of ours, you did not have enough available funds to complete the transaction,
our system was not working properly and you knew about the breakdown when you started the transaction, or
circumstances beyond our control (such as fire or flood or loss of Internet connection) prevented the transaction, despite our reasonable precautions.
Notwithstanding any other term of these Terms and Conditions, Hyperwallet will not be held liable for the non-execution or defective or late execution of a Payout transaction if you have failed to notify PayPal about the issue without undue delay after becoming aware of the issue or in any event within 13 months after the debit date of the Payout transaction.
(iv) Section 9:
PayPal will attempt to resolve any complaint relating to the provision of the PayPal Payment Processing Services via our customer centre. For UK resident users only, we will aim to respond to your complaint as quickly as possible; however, depending on the complexity of the issue, it may take up to 15 business days for payments-related complaints and up to 8 weeks for all other complaints. If there is any delay in our final response, we will send you an update on the progress. In addition, you may make a complaint to the following:
European Consumer Centre (ECC-Net). For EEA resident users only. You may obtain further information regarding the ECC-Net and how to contact them at ( http://ec.europa.eu/consumers/redress_cons/ ). Only for Micro-enterprises.
UK Financial Ombudsman Service (FOS). For UK resident users only - the FOS is a free, independent service, which might be able to settle a complaint between you and us. You may obtain further information regarding the FOS and contact the FOS at http://www.financial-ombudsman.org.uk. Only for small to medium-sized enterprises (as defined by the FOS) with seat in UK.
Commission de Surveillance du Secteur Financier (CSSF). The CSSF is the authority responsible for the prudential supervision of companies in the financial sector in Luxembourg. You can contact the CSSF at 110 Route d’Arlon L-2991 Luxembourg. You may obtain further information regarding the CSSF and how to contact them at: http://www.cssf.lu.
To the extent that the Payouts are provided where the payment service providers of both the payer and the payee are located within the EEA or the UK and the service relates to a transaction in a currency other than the currency of an EEA State or the UK:
(i) Title III of PSD2 applies only in respect of those parts of a transaction which are carried out in the EEA and Articles 45(1)(b), 52(2)(e) and 56 (a) do not apply; and
(ii) Title IV of PSD2 applies only in respect of those parts of a transaction which are carried out in the EEA and Articles 81 to 86 do not apply.
To the extent that the Payouts are provided where the payment service provider of either the payer or the payee, but not both, is located within the EEA or the UK:
(i) Title III of PSD2 applies only in respect of those parts of a transaction which are carried out in the EEA and Articles 45(1)(b), 52(2)(e), 52(5)(g) and 56(a) do not apply; and
(ii) Title IV of PSD2 applies only in respect of those parts of a transaction which are carried out in the EEA and Articles 62(2) and (4), 76, 77, 81, 83(1), 89 and 92 do not apply
13. Additional Terms for Australia
13.1. Services
Hyperwallet is authorised to:
(ii) Provide financial product advice for non-cash payment products;
(iii) Issue, apply for, acquire, vary or dispose of non-cash payment products; and
(iv) Apply for, acquire, vary or dispose of a non-cash payment product on behalf of another person or retail and wholesale clients.
13.2. Financial Services Guide
A copy of Hyperwallet Systems Australia Pty Ltd Financial Services Guide is available in the “Licenses and Complaints” section of the website.
14. Additional Terms for Japan
14.1. Shuno-Daiko Service
The Services in Japan are provided under a “shuno-daiko” service model. Under this service model, Hyperwallet acts as your receiving agent to accept payments from your Payor on your behalf and remit those payments to you. Once, but only to the extent, Hyperwallet receives payment from your Payor, the liability and obligation to remit such payments received to you will be the responsibility of Hyperwallet and not your Payor.
Definitions Schedule
The following capitalized terms not otherwise defined in the Terms and Conditions elsewhere shall have the meanings set forth below:
"ACH" means an electronic transfer method utilized by financial institutions in the United States operated by the Automated Clearing House.
"Affiliate" means any entity at any time controlling, controlled by or under common control with Hyperwallet, as the case may be. The term "control" as used in this definition means the legal, beneficial or equitable ownership, directly or indirectly, of more than 50% of the aggregate of all voting equity interests in such entity.
"BACS" means an electronic transfer method utilized by financial institutions in the United Kingdom operated by Bacs Payment Schemes Limited.
“Braintree” or “PayPal” means PayPal (Europe) S.à r. l. et Cie, S.C.A., a limited liability partnership registered as number R.C.S. Luxembourg B 118 349 having a registered office at 22-24 Boulevard Royal, L-2449, Luxembourg.
"Business Day" means 6 a.m. to 5 p.m., PST, Monday through Friday, excluding any federal holiday in the United States or statutory holiday in British Columbia, Canada, or bank holiday in the United Kingdom or Australia.
“Card” means a plastic, contactless, chip-and-pin, magnetic stripe or virtual card, issued by a financial institution or other authorized institution to which a payment may be made via the Services.
“EEA” the European Economic Area consisting of the following countries Austria, Belgium, Bulgaria, Croatia, Cyprus, Czech Republic, Denmark, Estonia, Finland, France, Germany, Greece, Holland, Hungary, Iceland, Ireland, Italy, Latvia, Liechtenstein, Lithuania, Luxembourg, Malta, Norway, Poland, Portugal, Romania, Slovakia, Slovenia, Spain and Sweden.
"Issuer" means a financial institution or other authorized institution which issues Cards.
"Network Partners" means a third party such as participating banks, money services businesses, card associations, Issuers, processors, cash pick-up, and other providers.
“Payment Processing Services” means the payment processing services offered by PayPal that provide a Payee with the ability to accept PayPal, credit and debit card and other payment types related to the sale by the Payee of goods or services through the Payor Platform. The Payment Processing Services include the routing and processing of sales transactions based on the applicable payment type and Payout to the Payee of resulting settlement funds to the Payee’s Payout Method.
“Payouts” will have the meaning ascribed to it under Section 1.1.3
"Payout Method" means one or more payout disbursement methods such as bank or wire transfer, load to a prepaid card or debit card, cheque, cash pick up, or such other method as supported by Hyperwallet from time to time. “Pay Portal” means the primary technology interface with the Services provided by Hyperwallet, which may be accessed through a website, application programming interface/API, embedded in or integrated with your Payor’s own platform or system, or other method.
"PayPal Account" is a digital payment instrument that may be used to send and receive money or make payments using a supported payment method. A PayPal Account can be a PayPal e-money account, PayPal Cash account, PayPal Cash Plus account, or Venmo account.
“Pay Portal” will have the meaning ascribed to it under Section 1.1.3.
“Payor Platform” will have the meaning ascribed to it under Section 11.5.1.
“Platform Payee Account” will have the meaning ascribed to it under Section 11.5.2 (i).
“Platform Services” will have the meaning ascribed to it under Section 11.5.2 (ii).
"Profile" means your Identification and preference information in the Pay Portal.
"SEPA" means the Single Euro Payments Area is a payment-integration initiative of the European Union for simplification of bank transfers denominated in euro.
“Services” will have the meaning ascribed to it under Section 1.1.1.
"Terms and Conditions" means the applicable terms and conditions governing access and use and receipt of the Services and the Pay Portal as provided and updated from time to time by Hyperwallet.
“Third-Party Service” will have the meaning ascribed to it under Section 2.3.1.
Affiliates and Governing Law Schedule
Location
Hyperwallet Affiliate Provider*
Regulatory Details
Laws Governing the Terms and Conditions
Legal Notice Address
United States
PayPal, Inc.
PayPal, Inc. is a company incorporated under the laws of the State of Delaware. PayPal, Inc. is a licensed money transmitter in various US states. See the “Licenses and Complaints” section of the website for a complete list.
State of Delaware, United States of America
PayPal, Inc., Attention: Legal Department 2211 North First Street, San Jose, California 95131
EEA and the United Kingdom
PayPal (Europe) S.à r. l. et Cie, S.C.A.
PayPal (Europe) S.à r.l. et Cie, S.C.A. (PayPal) is a corporate partnership limited by shares (Société en commandite par actions), registered with the Luxembourg Trade and Company Register under number B118349, a credit institution supervised by the Commission de Surveillance du Secteur Financier (CSSF)
Luxembourg
Attention: Legal Department, 22-24 Boulevard Royal, L2449, Luxembourg
Canada or any other country serviced by Hyperwallet
Hyperwallet Systems Inc.
Hyperwallet Systems Inc. is a company incorporated under the federal laws of Canada. Hyperwallet Systems Inc. is registered as a money services business with the Quebec Autorité des Marchés Financiers (AMF) (reference 901204) and the Canadian Financial Transactions and Reports Analysis Centre (FINTRAC) (reference M08905000) under the Proceeds of Crime (Money Laundering) and Terrorist Financing Act for the transferring of funds and dealing in foreign exchange.
British Columbia
Attention: Legal Department, #1200 - 475 Howe Street, Vancouver, BC V6C 2B3
Australia
Hyperwallet Systems Australia Pty Ltd
Hyperwallet Systems Australia Pty Ltd is a proprietary company (ABN 38 616 937 716). Hyperwallet Systems Australia Pty Ltd is authorised by the Australian Securities and Investments Commission (Licence No. 499092).
New South Wales, Australia
Attention: Legal Department, Level 23, 1 York Street, Sydney. NSW 2000.
*As a general matter, you will receive the Services from the Affiliate based upon your country of location. However, Hyperwallet may, at any time and in its sole discretion, delegate the performance of any of the Services, obligations and/or requirements to any of its Affiliates, agents, or suppliers.
Hyperwallet Privacy Policy
Effective Date: January 1, 2021
I. Overview
This Privacy Policy explains how members of the PayPal group of companies, including PayPal, Inc., PayPal (Europe) S.à r.l. et Cie, S.C.A, Hyperwallet Systems Inc. and Hyperwallet Australia Pty Ltd (collectively, “PayPal”, “Hyperwallet”, “we,” “us,” or “our”) may collect, Process, share, store, and transfer Your Personal Data that You provide when You visit the Sites, access the Services and any other Site as a visitor or User.
For the purpose of the data protection regulations applicable in the EEA, UK and Brazil, the data controller is PayPal (Europe) S.à r.l. et Cie, S.C.A, a duly licensed Luxembourg credit institution under Article 2 of the law of 5 April 1993 on the financial sector, as amended, and under the prudential supervision of the Luxembourg supervisory authority, the Commission de Surveillance du Secteur Financier.
This Privacy Policy is designed to help You obtain information about our privacy practices and to help You understand Your privacy choices when You use our Sites and Services. Please note that our Service offerings may vary by region.
In this Privacy Policy, we sometimes refer to “You” or “Your.” “You” mostly refers to a Payee; however, “You” may also refer to a visitor to our Sites, a Payor, a third-party service provider, or an employee — all of whom are subject to this Privacy Policy.
The Sites and Services are operated by Hyperwallet for Payors or on behalf of Payors, respectively.
We have defined some terms that we use throughout the Privacy Policy. You can find the meaning of a capitalized term in the Definitions section.
Please contact us if You have questions about our privacy practices that are not addressed in this Privacy Policy.
II. What Personal Data Do We Collect?
The Hyperwallet Sites are where You can learn more about the Services.
We collect Personal Data about our business customers (each a “Payor”) and their designated payees (each a “Payee”) when they use the Sites or the Services. We also collect information about the third-party service providers who we engage to help us provide the Services, as well as information about our employees.
We collect information about You that You provide to us when You access or use the Sites or Service. This information may include Your name, nationality, home address, telephone number, personal e-mail address, Your forwarding address (e.g. during a vacation), previous address(es), billing and account information (such as credit or debit card number, or bank account number), Your mailing preferences, delivery instructions, transaction history, IP address, and service preferences, as well as other information defined as non-public or private information about You pursuant to applicable law.
III. How do We Retain Personal Data?
We retain Personal Data in an identifiable format for the least amount of time necessary to fulfill our legal or regulatory obligations and for our business purposes. We may retain Personal Data for longer periods than required by law if it is in our legitimate business interests and not prohibited by law. We will continue to use and disclose such Personal Data in accordance with this Privacy Policy.
IV. How Do We Process Personal Data?
We may Process Your information for the following reasons:
To operate the Sites and provide the Services
, such as to evaluate a Payor’s application to use our Services or to establish Your identity for compliance purposes, authenticate Your access to Your Account; and to process payment transactions on a Payor’s behalf;
To manage our business needs
, such as monitoring, analysing, and improving the Services and the Sites’ performance and functionality
To manage risk and protect the Sites
, the Services and You from fraud by verifying Your identity and helping to detect and prevent fraud and abuse of the Sites or Services.
To market to Payors
by delivering marketing materials about Services.
To provide You with location-specific options
, functionality or offers if You elect to share Your Geolocation Information through the Services. We will use this information to enhance the security of the Sites and Services and provide You with location-based Services, such as advertising, search results, and other personalized content.
To comply with our obligations and to enforce the terms of our Sites and Services
, including to comply with all applicable laws and regulations
For the performance of a contract
, such as where necessary to carry out payment services.
For our legitimate interests:
to enforce the terms of our Sites and Services;
manage our everyday business needs; and
provide aggregated and anonymized statistical data to third parties, including other businesses and members of the public, about how, when, and why Users visit our Sites and use our Services;
With Your consent: to respond to Your requests
, for example, to contact You about a question You submitted to our customer service team. You can withdraw Your consent at any time and free of charge.
We may also use information that we collect in aggregate form to further develop and improve the Sites and Services, and for our own business analyses that will allow us to make informed decisions.
V. Do We Share Personal Data?
We may share personal data or other information about You with others for the following reasons:
With other members of the Hyperwallet corporate family:
We may share Your Personal Data with members of the Hyperwallet family of entities, including PayPal, to among other things, provide the Services You have requested or authorized; to manage risk; to help detect and prevent potentially illegal and fraudulent acts and other violations of our policies and agreements; and to help us manage the availability and connectivity of products, Services, and communications.
With Payors.
We will share Your Personal Data with Payors for processing payments and transactions or as legally required. You should consult with Your Payor to learn how Your Payor uses any Personal Data, as we have no control over Personal Data once it is disclosed to Your Payor.
With other companies that provide services to us.
We may share Personal Data with third-party service providers who assist us in managing, administering or delivering the Site or providing the Services.
With the other parties to transactions when You use the Services
: We may share information with the other participants to Your transactions, including:
Personal Data necessary to facilitate the transaction; and
information to help other participant(s) resolve disputes and detect and prevent fraud, for example we may report device information, including if we conclude that a device has been used in connection with a fraudulent or abusive transaction with us.
With other third parties for our business purposes or as permitted or required by law:
We may share information about You with other parties for Hyperwallet’s business purposes or as permitted or required by law, including:
For the performance of a contract, such as where necessary to carry out payment services;
if we need to do so to comply with a law, legal process or regulations;
to law enforcement authorities or government officials, or other third parties pursuant to a subpoena, a court order or other legal process or requirement applicable to Hyperwallet or Hyperwallet’s corporate family:
if we believe, in our sole discretion, that the disclosure of Personal Data is necessary or appropriate to prevent physical harm or financial loss or in connection with an investigation of suspected or actual illegal activity.
To protect the vital interests of a person;
To investigate violations of or enforce a user agreement or other legal Terms applicable to any Service;
to protect our property, Services and legal rights;
to facilitate a purchase or sale of all or part of Hyperwallet’s business;
to help assess and manage risk and prevent fraud against us, our Users and fraud involving our Sites or use of our Services, including fraud that occurs at or involves our business partners or other individuals;
to companies that we plan to merge with or be acquired by; and
to support our audit, compliance, and corporate governance functions.
With Your consent:
We also will share Your Personal Data and other information with Your consent or direction.
VI. International Transfers
Our operations are supported by a network of computers, cloud-based servers, and other infrastructure and information technology, including, but not limited to, third-party service providers.
The third parties mentioned above may be established in jurisdictions other than your own. These countries do not always afford an equivalent level of privacy protection. We have taken specific steps, in accordance with data protection laws, to protect your Personal Data. In particular, for transfers of your EEA Personal Data within PayPal related companies, we rely on Binding Corporate Rules approved by competent Supervisory Authorities (available
here
). Other data transfers may be based on contractual protections. Please contact us for more information about this.
Please note that Hyperwallet may be required to disclose Personal Data if it is the subject of a lawful request by public authorities, including to meet national security or law enforcement requirements.
VII. How do we use Cookies and Tracking Technologies?
When You use the Site or interact with the Services, we may use cookies and other tracking technologies (collectively, “Cookies”) to collect non-personal data. Cookies are small text files (typically made up of letters and numbers) placed in the memory of Your browser or device when You visit a website or view a message. Cookies allow a website to recognize a particular device or browser.
Our Cookies and similar technologies have different functions. We may use cookies or other technologies that are necessary to the operation of our Sites, Services, applications, and tools. This includes technologies that allow You access to our Sites, Services, applications, and tools; that are required to identify irregular site behavior, prevent fraudulent activity, facilitate transactions and improve security; or that allow You to make use of our functions. Certain aspects and features of our Services and Sites are only available through the use of Cookies, so if You choose to disable or decline Cookies through Your device or browser settings, Your use of the Sites and Services may be limited or not possible.
Where appropriate, security measures are set in place to prevent unauthorized access to our Cookies and similar technologies. A unique identifier ensures that only we and/or our authorized service providers have access to Cookie data.
Service providers are companies that help us with various aspects of our business, such as Site operations, Services, applications, advertisements and tools. We may use some authorized service providers to help us to serve You relevant ads on our Services and other places on the internet. These service providers may also place Cookies on Your device via our Services (third-party Cookies). They may also collect information that helps them identify Your device, such as IP-address or other unique device identifiers.
VIII. What Privacy Choices Are Available To You?
Choices Relating to the Personal Data We Collect
You have the right to access the personal data we maintain about You. You are entitled to one copy of information free of charge; however, we may charge a reasonable fee if Your request is manifestly unfounded or excessive, particularly if it is repetitive.
In addition, You have the right to access and correct the data in certain instances, by logging into the Pay Portal or sending a detailed request to
privacyofficer@hyperwallet.com
; however, for security reasons, the best way to make a request is to do so while logged into the Pay Portal (Go to “Support,” select “Email” and complete the form for “Privacy Concerns”). Some of the Personal Data in Your profile may only be updated in Your Payor’s system. In such case, Your Payor may provide the information to us so that we may update Your profile in our systems. We reserve the right to charge a reasonable administrative fee where permitted by law.
Please note that if we do not collect or receive certain Personal Data from You, You may not be able to utilize the Services offered on the Sites or Service, including receipt of funds from the Payor.
Choices Relating to Cookies
You may have options available to manage Your cookies preferences. For example, Your browser or internet device may allow You to delete, disable, or block certain cookies and other tracking technologies. You can learn more by visiting AboutCookies.org. You may choose to enable these options but doing so may prevent You from using many of the core features and functions available on a Service or Site.
Choices Relating to Registration and Account Information
If You use our Services, You generally may review and edit Personal Data by logging in and updating the information directly or by contacting us. Contact
privacyofficer@hyperwallet.com
if You have questions about Your Account information or other Personal Data. Some of the Personal Data in Your profile may only be updated in Your Payor’s system.
Choices Relating to Communication
We may communicate with Payors (and related business contacts) about our Services. If You wish to unsubscribe from receiving e-mail marketing communications, please opt-out via the unsubscribe link included in such emails, and we will stop sending You communications.
We will send communications to You that are required or necessary to send to Users of our Services, notifications that contain important information and other communications that You request from us. You may not opt out of receiving these communications. However, You may be able to adjust the media and format through which You receive these notices.
IX. How Do We Protect Your Personal Data?
We maintain technical, physical, and administrative security measures designed to provide reasonable protection for Your Personal Data against loss, misuse, unauthorized access, disclosure, and alteration. The security measures include firewalls, data encryption, physical access controls to our data centers, and information access authorization controls. You should keep in mind that no Internet transmission is ever completely secure or error-free. In particular, e-mail sent between You and us may not be secure.
X. Can Children Use Our Services?
The Sites and Services are not directed to children under the age of 16. If we obtain actual knowledge that we have collected Personal Data from a child under the age of 16, we will promptly delete it, unless we are legally obligated to retain such data. Contact us if You believe that we have mistakenly or unintentionally collected information from a child under the age of 16.
XI. Specific provisions relating to EEA, UK and Brazilian Personal Data
What are Your Rights?
If You have an Account with any of our Services, You generally can review and edit Personal Data in the Account by logging in and updating the information directly.
Subject to limitations set out in data protection laws, You have certain rights in respect of Your Personal Data. In particular, You have a right of access, rectification, restriction, opposition, erasure and data portability. Please contact us at
privacyofficer@hyperwallet.com
if You wish to exercise these rights
Banking Regulations Notice for Payors in the EEA and UK
This section applies to Payors who have relationships with PayPal Europe. In general, the Luxembourg laws to which PayPal’s handling of user data is subject (data protection and bank secrecy) require a higher degree of transparency than most other EU laws. This is why, unlike the vast majority of providers of internet-based services or financial services in the EU, PayPal has listed in this Privacy Policy the third-party service providers and business partners to whom we may disclose Your data, together with the purpose of disclosure and type of information disclosed. You will find a link to those third parties
here
. By acknowledging this Privacy Policy and maintaining an account with PayPal, You expressly consent to the transfer of Your data to those third parties for the purposes listed.
PayPal may update the list of third parties referred to above every quarter (January 1st, April 1st, July 1st and October 1st). PayPal will only start transferring any data to any of the new entities or for the new purposes or data types indicated in each update after 30 days from the date when that list is made public through this Privacy Policy. You should review the list each quarter on the PayPal website on the dates stated above. If You do not object to the new data disclosure, within 30 days after the publication of the updated list of third parties, You are deemed to have accepted the changes to the list and to this Privacy Policy. If You do not agree with the changes, You may close Your account and stop using our services.
In order to provide the PayPal Services, certain of the information we collect (as set out in this Privacy Policy) may be required to be transferred to other PayPal related companies or other entities, including those referred to in this section in their capacity as payment providers, payment processors or account holders (or similar capacities). You acknowledge that according to their local legislation, such entities may be subject to laws, regulations, inquiries, investigations, or orders which may require the disclosure of information to the relevant authorities of the relevant country. Your use of the PayPal Services constitutes Your consent to our transfer of such information to provide You the PayPal Services.
Specifically, You consent to and direct PayPal to do any and all of the following with Your information:
a) Disclose necessary information to: the police and other law enforcement agencies; security forces; competent governmental, intergovernmental or supranational bodies; competent agencies, departments, regulatory authorities, selfregulatory authorities or organizations (including, without limitation, the Agencies referenced in the “Agencies” section of the Third Party Provider List
here
) and other third parties, including PayPal Group companies, that (i) we are legally compelled and permitted to comply with, including but without limitation the Luxembourg laws of 24 July 2015 on the US Foreign Account Tax Compliance Act (“FATCA Law”) and 18 December 2015 on the OECD common reporting standard (“CRS Law”); (ii) we have reason to believe it is appropriate for us to cooperate with in investigations of fraud or other illegal activity or potential illegal activity, or (iii) to conduct investigations of violations of our User Agreement (including without limitation, Your funding source or credit or debit card provider).
If You are covered by the FATCA or CRS Law, we are required to give You notice of the information about You that we may transfer to various authorities. Please read more about PayPal’s obligations under the FATCA and CRS Law and how they could affect You as well as take note of the information we may disclose as result.
We and other organizations, including parties that accept PayPal, may also share, access and use (including from other countries) necessary information (including, without limitation the information recorded by fraud prevention agencies) to help us and them assess and to manage risk (including, without limitation, to prevent fraud, money laundering and terrorist financing). Please contact us if You want to receive further details of the relevant fraud prevention agencies. For more information on these Agencies, fraud prevention agencies and other third parties, click
here
.
b) Disclose Account Information to intellectual property right owners if under the applicable national law of an EU member state they have a claim against PayPal for an out-of-court information disclosure due to an infringement of their intellectual property rights for which PayPal Services have been used (for example, but without limitation, Sec. 19, para 2, sub-section 3 of the German Trademark Act or Sec. 101, para 2, sub-section 3 of the German Copyright Act).
c) Disclose necessary information in response to the requirements of the credit card associations or a civil or criminal legal process.
d) If You as a merchant use a third party to access or integrate PayPal, we may disclose to any such partner necessary information for the purpose of facilitating and maintaining such an arrangement (including, without limitation, the status of Your PayPal integration, whether You have an active PayPal account and whether You may already be working with a different PayPal integration partner).
e) Disclose necessary information to the payment processors, auditors, customer services providers, credit reference and fraud agencies, financial products providers, commercial partners, marketing and public relations companies, operational services providers, group companies, agencies, marketplaces and other third parties listed
here
. The purpose of this disclosure is to allow us to provide PayPal Services to You. We also set out in the list of third parties, under each ” Category”, non-exclusive examples of the actual third parties (which may include their assigns and successors) to whom we currently disclose Your Account Information or to whom we may consider disclosing Your Account Information, together with the purpose of doing so, and the actual information we disclose (except as explicitly stated, these third parties are limited by law or by contract from using the information for secondary purposes beyond the purposes for which the information was shared).
f) Disclose necessary information to Your agent or legal representative (such as the holder of a power of attorney that You grant, or a guardian appointed for You).
g) Disclose aggregated statistical data with our business partners or for public relations. For example, we may disclose that a specific percentage of our users live in Manchester. However, this aggregated information is not tied to personal information.
h) Share necessary Account Information with unaffiliated third parties (listed
here
) for their use for the following purposes:
Fraud Prevention and Risk Management: to help prevent fraud or assess and manage risk. For example, if You use the PayPal Services to buy or sell tickets using StubHub International’s marketplace, we may share Account Information with StubHub International in order to help protect Your accounts from fraudulent activity, alert You if we detect such fraudulent activity on Your accounts, or evaluate credit risk.
As part of our fraud prevention and risk management efforts, we also may share necessary Account Information with StubHub International in cases where PayPal has placed a hold or other restriction on Your account based on disputes, claims, chargebacks or other scenarios regarding the sale or purchase of goods. Also, as part of our fraud prevention and risk management efforts, we may share Account Information with StubHub International to enable them to operate their programmes for evaluating buyers or sellers.
Customer Service: for customer service purposes, including to help service Your accounts or resolve disputes (e.g., billing or transactional).
Shipping: in connection with shipping and related services for purchases made using PayPal
Legal Compliance: to help them comply with anti-money laundering and counter-terrorist financing verification requirements.
Service Providers: to enable service providers under contract with us to support our business operations, such as fraud prevention, bill collection, marketing, customer service and technology services. Our contracts dictate that these service providers only use Your information in connection with the services they perform for us and not for their own benefit.
XII. What Else Should You Know?
Links to Third-Party Websites
We are not responsible for the websites of third parties to which we provide links for Your convenience. We cannot endorse these websites or their privacy practices and this Privacy Policy does not apply to them. You should familiarize Yourself with the privacy policies provided by the owners of these third-party sites before submitting any Personal Data to them.
Changes to this Privacy Policy
We may revise this Privacy Policy from time to time to reflect changes to our business, the Sites or Services, or applicable laws. The revised Privacy Policy will be effective as of the published effective date.
If the revised version includes a substantial change, we will provide You with advance notice by posting notice of the change on our website.
XIII. Contact Information
In compliance with applicable privacy laws, Hyperwallet is committed to responding to concerns regarding our collection or use of Your Personal Data. For inquiries or complaints regarding this Privacy Policy You should first contact Hyperwallet and the Data Protection Officer at
privacyofficer@hyperwallet.com
or at PayPal (Europe) S.à.r.l. et Cie, S.C.A., 22-24 Boulevard Royal L-2449, Luxembourg.
XIV. Supervisory Authority
If You are not satisfied by the way in which we address Your concerns, You have the right to lodge a complaint with the Supervisory Authority for data protection in Your country.
Definitions
Personal Data
means any information that can be associated with an identified or identifiable person. “Personal Data” can include name, home address, telephone number, personal e-mail address, forwarding address (e.g. during a vacation), previous address(es), billing and account information (such as credit or debit card number, or bank account number), mailing preferences, delivery instructions, transaction history, IP address, and service preferences, as well as other information defined as non-public or private information pursuant to applicable law. Personal Data does not include information that does not identify a specific user.
Process
describes any method or way that we handle Personal Data or sets of Personal Data, whether or not by automated means, such as collection, recording, organization, structuring, storage, adaptation or alteration, retrieval, and consultation, disclosure by transmission, dissemination or otherwise making available, alignment or combination, restriction, erasure or destruction of Personal Data.
Services
means the online payment platform (“Pay Portal”), payment services and related functionality and technology.
Sites
s means the Hyperwallet websites, mobile apps, official social media platforms, or other online properties through which Hyperwallet offers the Services.
User
means You or anyone else who has established a relationship with Hyperwallet or otherwise uses the Services or accesses the Sites
California Consumer Privacy Act Notice
In this notice, we are addressing specific disclosure requirements under the California Consumer Privacy Act of 2018 for California residents. This notice should be read together with Hyperwallet’s Privacy Policy and applies to all California residents who visit our Sites or use the Services.
Personal Data Collection and Purposes of Use
We collect, use and share personal data regarding California residents as described in this notice.
We did not sell any consumers' personal data in the preceding 12 months.
California Residents' Privacy Rights
California residents have rights to request access to certain personal data collected about them over the past 12 months, or deletion of their personal data, subject to certain exceptions, and may not be discriminated against because they exercise their rights under the California Consumer Privacy Act. We may require you to provide additional personal data to verify your identity before we process your request; we may not process your request if we are unable to verify your identity.
You may contact us by clicking
here
, calling 1-877-546-8220, or e-mailing
privacyofficer@hyperwallet.com
. For security reasons, the best way to make a request is to do so while logged into the Pay Portal.
In the preceding 12 months, we have collected the following categories of personal data from California residents:
We have collected such personal data from the following categories of sources:
We collected such personal data to use for the following purposes:
In the preceding 12 months, we shared personal data with the following categories of third parties:
a. Identifiers such as a real name, alias, postal address, unique personal identifier, online identifier, Internet Protocol address, email address, account name, social security number, driver’s license number, passport number, or other similar identifiers
from you (Payor or Payee) when you use our Site and Services
service providers
operate the Sites and provide Services
manage our business needs such as monitoring, analyzing, and improving the Services and Sites’ performance and functionality
manage risk
market to Payors
provide you with location- specific options, functionality, or offers
comply with our obligations and to enforce the terms of our Site and Services
performance of a contract
respond to your requests
members of the PayPal corporate family
service providers
financial institutions
parties to transactions when you use the Services, such as other users, merchants, and their service providers
third parties for our business purposes or as permitted or required by law
b. Personal data listed in California Customer Records statute, which may include: name, signature, social security number, address, telephone number, passport number, driver’s license or state identification card number, insurance policy number, education, employment, employment history, bank account number, credit card number, debit card number, or any other financial information, medical information, or health insurance information.
from you (Payor or Payee) when you use our Site and Services
service providers
operate the Sites and provide Services
manage our business needs such as monitoring, analyzing, and improving the Services and Sites’ performance and functionality
manage risk
market to Payors
provide you with location- specific options, functionality, or offers
comply with our obligations and to enforce the terms of our Site and Services
performance of a contract
respond to your requests
members of the PayPal corporate family
service providers
financial institutions
parties to transactions when you use the Services, such as other users, merchants, and their service providers
third parties for our business purposes or as permitted or required by law
c. Personal data that is protected under California or federal law.
from you (Payor or Payee) when you use our Site and Services
manage risk
comply with our obligations and to enforce the terms of our Site and Services
members of the PayPal corporate family
service providers
third parties for our business purposes or as permitted or required by law
d. Commercial information, including records of personal property, products or services purchased, obtained, or considered, or other purchasing or consuming histories or tendencies.
from you (Payor or Payee) when you use our Site and Services
operate the Sites and provide Services
manage our business needs such as monitoring, analyzing, and improving the Services and Sites’ performance and functionality
manage risk
market to Payors
provide you with location- specific options, functionality, or offers
comply with our obligations and to enforce the terms of our Site and Services
performance of a contract
respond to your requests
members of the PayPal corporate family
service providers
financial institutions
parties to transactions when you use the Services, such as other users, merchants, and their service providers
third parties for our business purposes or as permitted or required by law
e. Internet or other electronic network activity information, including, but not limited to, browsing history, search history, and information regarding a consumer’s interaction with an Internet Web site, application, or advertisement
from you (Payor or Payee) when you use our Site and Services
operate the Sites and provide Services
manage our business needs such as monitoring, analyzing, and improving the Services and Sites’ performance and functionality
manage risk
market to Payors
provide you with location- specific options, functionality, or offers
comply with our obligations and to enforce the terms of our Site and Services
performance of a contract
respond to your requests
members of the PayPal corporate family
service providers
financial institutions
parties to transactions when you use the Services, such as other users, merchants, and their service providers
third parties for our business purposes or as permitted or required by law
f. Geolocation data
from you (Payor or Payee) when you use our Site and Services
service providers
operate the Sites and provide Services
manage our business needs such as monitoring, analyzing, and improving the Services and Sites’ performance and functionality
manage risk
provide you with location- specific options, functionality, or offers
comply with our obligations and to enforce the terms of our Site and Services
respond to your requests
members of the PayPal corporate family
third parties for our business purposes or as permitted or required by law
g. Audio, electronic, visual, thermal, olfactory, or similar information.
from you (Payor or Payee) when you use our Site and Services
operate the Sites and provide Services
manage our business needs such as monitoring, analyzing, and improving the Services and Sites’ performance and functionality
manage risk
comply with our obligations and to enforce the terms of our Site and Services
respond to your requests
members of the PayPal corporate family
service providers
third parties for our business purposes or as permitted or required by law
j. Inferences drawn from any of the information identified in this subdivision to create a profile about a consumer reflecting the consumer’s preferences, characteristics, psychological trends, predispositions, behaviour, attitudes, intelligence, abilities, and aptitudes
from you (Payor or Payee) when you use our Site and Services
operate the Sites and provide Services
manage our business needs such as monitoring, analyzing, and improving the Services and Sites’ performance and functionality
manage risk
market to Payors
respond to your requests
members of the PayPal corporate family
service providers
Return to top
·
Return to section
Cookie Notice
Cookie Notice
Last Updated: April 24, 2024
This is the cookie policy for StubHub International governing our website and StubHub International Mobile Application Service.
Our website and applications may utilize both proprietary and third-party cookies for technical, analytical, advertising, and/or customization purposes. For cookies that are not essential or necessary for the basic functioning of this website, you can enable or disable the cookies we use through
this link
.
The primary aim of this policy is to enlighten users about the nature of cookies, their usage across our platforms, and how users can manage their installation or utilization.
What is a cookie?
A cookie is a small file that contains letters and numbers that is downloaded on to your device when you visit a website. It is sent to your browser and stored on your computer’s hard drive, tablet or mobile device. When you visit our sites, it can allow us to recognise and remember you.
We use the term "cookies" in a general sense, but this concept encompasses both strictly cookies and other similar technologies that involve the storage and retrieval of data on users' end devices, such as web beacons, HTML 5 cookies, or SDK technologies.
They can be used to gather information about the user's browsing habits and activity within the website, track across websites, and store login data, such as user credentials or page customization. The specific uses we make of these technologies are described below in this Policy.
Types of cookies we use
Depending on the owner of the cookies, they can be classified as:
a.
First-party cookies
: These are cookies that are set by StubHub International when you use our site.
b.
Third-party cookies
: Cookies that are set by parties or organizations other than StubHub International when you use our site. To identify these third parties, please see the "How do third parties use cookies for advertising?" section of this Cookie Notice.
Our website or mobile application cookies can be classified based on their intended purpose into the following groups:
Technical or essential cookies:
These are cookies that allow navigation and the use of options and/or services available through a website, platform, or mobile application. For example, they control traffic, identify data or session, remember the elements of an order, carry out the purchasing process, manage payment, and control fraud related to service security. Technical cookies, being strictly necessary, are downloaded by default when they enable the display of the platform or provide the service requested by the user.
Preference or customization cookies
: These allow remembering the user's login information and the configuration characteristics of the website, platform, or mobile application. This ensures that the user accesses the service or platform with specific features that can differentiate their experience from other users, such as language, appearance, or content of the service based on the type of browser used by the user or the region from which they access the service, etc.
Performance cookies
: These are cookies that enable tracking and analysis of user behavior on the website, platform, or mobile application. For example, they quantify the number of users, the sections visited on the platform, and how they interact with it. This allows for the measurement and statistical analysis of user usage, with the aim of introducing improvements based on the analysis of user data on the platform or service.
Marketing or behavioral advertising cookies:
These are cookies that store information about user behavior obtained from browsing habits with the goal of delivering advertising through banners or similar mechanisms.
Profiling cookies
: These allow the generation of a profile based on browsing habits and information provided by the user through other means.
How do third parties use cookies for advertising?
With your consent, we share and receive online data collected through cookies with our advertising partners. Online retargeting represents another facet of online advertising that enables us and certain advertising partners to display ads tailored to your browsing patterns and interactions with other websites.
We insist that all our contractual partners treat your personal data with the same level of respect that we adhere to. We exclusively collaborate with partners who offer transparency regarding the usage of any shared data.
We share this information with our associates based on the granted consent. These third parties include:
Facebook
Google Ad Manager
Apple (Only for iOS)
Braintree, a service of PayPal Inc
In addition, in order to prevent fraud in transactions and detect issues during your navigation on our platform, we rely on the services of the following providers:
Accertify
Braze
UXCam
Hotjar
Firebase
For more detailed information we recommend reading the privacy policies/settings of these collaborating third parties, accessible through their platforms.
Modifying and Uninstalling Cookies
Users have the option to accept or reject (either entirely or partially) the use of cookies through the banner that will appear the first time they access the Sites and Applications, when the cookie expiration period elapses, or when browsing in incognito mode.
Users can modify this consent at any time through
this link
.
Additionally, it is also possible to stop your browser from accepting cookies altogether by changing your browser’s cookie settings. Typically, you can find these settings in the "options" or "preferences" menu of your browser. If you choose to block your browser from accepting cookies entirely, some features on our site may not function as expected. Please be aware that searching in incognito mode or regularly clearing your cookies may reset your cookie settings. You can find more information here:
Cookie settings in Microsoft Edge.
Cookie settings in Mozilla Firefox.
Cookie settings in Google Chrome.
Cookie settings in Safari web and iOS.
Updating this Policy
In the event that we make improvements or significant changes to the cookies, we will update this Policy and duly inform all users of this website.
Return to top
·
Return to section
FanProtect
®
Guarantee
FanProtect
®
Guarantee
StubHub International backs every qualified order so you can buy and sell with 100% confidence. If you have an issue with your order, please contact StubHub International
Customer Service
. Please provide your order number.
The FanProtect Guarantee excludes any primary ticket sales. Refund or replacement requests related to primary ticket sales are governed by the original seller’s terms and conditions.
FanProtect
®
for Buyers
Summary of FanProtect for Buyers:
You will get your tickets in time for the event.
Your tickets will be valid for entry.
Your tickets will be the same as or comparable to those you ordered.
If any of these things do not occur and you comply with applicable policies and timelines, we will find you comparable or better tickets to the event or offer you a refund of what you paid for your purchase on StubHub International or credit of the same amount for use on a future purchase.
If the event is cancelled and not rescheduled, you will get a refund or credit for use on a future purchase, as determined in StubHub International’s sole discretion (unless a refund is required by law).
Getting Tickets on Time
If you don't receive the tickets you ordered by the date communicated to you when you placed your order, notify StubHub International. StubHub International will, in its sole discretion, attempt to locate and facilitate delivery of your tickets. StubHub International will, in its sole discretion, provide you with comparable or better replacement tickets at no additional cost, issue you a full refund of your purchase on StubHub International (including any fees and shipping/handling charges), or issue you a credit for use on a future purchase.
StubHub International reserves the right to change the delivery method, based on restrictions by the organiser or promoter. In such cases, the buyer is not eligible for a refund. If the delivery method changes before ticket delivery, no additional fees will be charged by StubHub International.
Getting Valid Tickets
StubHub International will require information from you or the venue to confirm that the tickets were invalid for entry. You are encouraged to call our
Customer Service
from the venue if you experience problems with your tickets. You must notify StubHub International and complete any required forms no later than seven days (or such other time as communicated by StubHub International to you) after the event.
Getting Comparable or Better Tickets to Those you Ordered
If you receive tickets that are not comparable or better than the ones you ordered, notify StubHub International immediately. Upon verification by StubHub International shall: i) provide you with comparable or better replacement tickets; ii) issue you a full refund (including any fees and shipping/handling charges); iii) issue you a partial or full credit for use on a future purchase. StubHub International may require that you return the tickets you received.
If the Event is Cancelled or Postponed
Cancelled and non-rescheduled events:
If an event is cancelled and not rescheduled, we will provide you with a full refund of the full amount you paid on StubHub International (including any fees and shipping/handling charges) or credit for use on a future purchase, as determined in StubHub International’s sole discretion (unless a refund is required by law). We will notify you that the event was cancelled and provide instructions on how to obtain the refund.
Postponed and rescheduled events:
If an event is postponed and rescheduled, you may use the tickets on the rescheduled date or, time permitting, list them for sale on StubHub International. If replacement tickets are required for entry to the event on the rescheduled date, StubHub International will work to obtain replacement tickets for you or provide you a full refund of the price you paid on StubHub International (including any fees and shipping/handling charges). If you cannot attend the event on the rescheduled date, you are also encouraged to list the tickets on StubHub International if you wish. StubHub International does not provide refunds for partial performances, lineup or time changes.
Other Terms
"Comparable or better" tickets are determined by StubHub International in its sole discretion based on cost, quality, availability and other factors.
Tickets may include event tickets, parking passes or other items offered for sale on StubHub International (unless the listing explicitly exempts the order from the FanProtect Guarantee).
To receive the benefits of the FanProtect Guarantee, you must comply with the StubHub International User Agreement and all policies, guidance and emails we send you regarding your order, including any timelines or procedures to notify StubHub International of issues.
The FanProtect Guarantee does not apply in cases of buyer's remorse or any reason other than the reasons stated in this Guarantee. This includes situations where the seller requires specific information from the buyer to complete the order (such as TDT, Nominative, Local Address, Account Creation, etc.), and the buyer fails to provide it.
FanProtect
®
for Sellers
Summary of FanProtect for Sellers:
In most cases, buyers or prospective buyers are not permitted to contact you.
You can adjust your ticket prices any time before they sell.
You will receive payment for all tickets you sell and deliver in accordance with the StubHub International User Agreement and all policies.
Buyer or Prospective Buyers Contact Regarding a Sale
Buyers and prospective buyers are not permitted to contact you unless you consent or it is necessary for the specific transaction, namely you are considered to sell tickets as a Trader. If you are contacted and an exception does not apply, you are encouraged to refer the customer to StubHub International
Customer Service
for assistance and let us know.
Setting and Adjusting the Ticket Prices Before Your Tickets Sell
You set ticket prices. You can adjust the ticket price as often as you desire before your tickets sell. If you cannot adjust pricing for a ticket listing before the tickets have sold, you should contact
Customer Service
for assistance.
Receiving Payment
If you sell your tickets and send them in accordance with the StubHub International User Agreement, policies, and emails we send you but there is a problem with the delivery that was not caused by your actions or inaction, you will still get paid for the sale.
If You Have Not Received Payment for a Ticket Sale
You will be paid for a ticket sale in accordance with the time frames detailed in our
Seller Policies
but if you have not received payment for a ticket sale within such time, you should first make sure that the Seller Payment Information provided to StubHub International is correct by logging in and going to My Account.
If you have chosen to receive payment via PayPal, please ensure that the email address provided in your Seller Payment Contact on StubHub International matches the one registered on your PayPal account. It is not required for this email to be the same as the one registered on your SHI (StubHub International) account. If any corrections are necessary, kindly make them accordingly. Please allow approximately 2-3 weeks for StubHub International to process and issue the payment.
If the Seller Payment Information is already correct, you should contact
Customer Service
for assistance. StubHub International will investigate the matter promptly and determine the status of the payment. If your payment has not already been properly processed by StubHub International, we will make every effort to do so as quickly as possible. You can always contact Customer Service at any time throughout this process if you have any questions.
FanProtect
®
for Buyers and Sellers
Abuse of the FanProtect Guarantee
StubHub International will investigate all claims under the Guarantee and determine resolutions on a case-by-case basis. Such decisions are final. StubHub International reserves the right to limit the amount a Buyer or Seller may be awarded and the number of claims a Buyer or Seller may file in a calendar year. If you have chosen to receive payment via PayPal, please ensure that the email address provided in your Seller Payment Contact on StubHub International matches the one registered on your PayPal account. It is not required for this email to be the same as the one registered on your SHI (StubHub International) account. If any corrections are necessary, kindly make them accordingly. Please allow approximately 2-3 weeks for StubHub International to process and issue the payment. StubHub International may temporarily or permanently suspend any Buyer or Seller who attempts to abuse the FanProtect Guarantee and may report any such abuse to the appropriate legal authorities.
To safeguard against False Claims, SHI reserves the right to charge the designated payment method for any funds that need to be reimbursed in the event of an investigation determining a false claim. In such cases, users should refrain from initiating a "chargeback" directly with their payment card issuer, as the charge is considered valid.
Terms and Conditions
If we change this Guarantee, we will post a revised version of the Guarantee on the Site, which shall automatically replace the terms of this Guarantee. Your use of the Site and the Services following the effective date of the revised Guarantee will constitute your acceptance of the revised Guarantee. If you do not agree with the terms of this Guarantee or any revised version of this Guarantee, do not continue to use the Site or Services.
Return to top
·
Return to section
Sub-section Policy: 
Sub-policy 0
https://www.braintreepayments.com/es/legal/braintree-privacy-policy:
<< Back To Home Page
Braintree Privacy Statement
1. Overview
2. Your privacy rights and choices
a. Understanding your rights
b. Understanding your choices
3. The personal data we collect
4. Where personal data comes from
a. How we use tracking technologies
5. Why we collect personal data
6. How and why we share personal data
7. How we protect your personal data
8. How long do we keep your personal data
9. How and where we transfer your personal data
10. How this statement changes over time
11. Children’s privacy
12. Contact Us
13. Additional Information
Braintree Privacy Statement
Last updated on 28 March 2022
1. Overview
This privacy statement explains how and why PayPal (Europe) S.à r.l. et Cie, S.C.A., as a controller, collects, stores, uses, shares and transfers personal data when you visit our websites offering Braintree services or use the Braintree services. Reading it will help you understand your privacy rights and the choices may you have.
PayPal is deemed authorised and regulated by the Financial Conduct Authority. The nature and extent of consumer protections may differ from those for firms based in the UK. Details of the Temporary Permissions Regime, which allows EEA-based firms to operate in the UK for a limited period while seeking full authorisation, are available on the Financial Conduct Authority’s website.
“Personal data” in this statement means information about you, including your identity, financial information, contact information, and online behavior.
2. Your privacy rights and choices
When it comes to how your personal data is collected, stored, used, and shared, you have rights and choices.
a. Understanding your rights
You have the right to request a copy of the personal data, restrict processing, correct inaccuracies, anonymize or delete, and transfer your data that we’ve collected about you, subject to limitations under applicable law.
You may also have the right to review the outcome of certain automated decisions and request not be subjected to automated decision-making. If you want to exercise any of your rights, please
contact us
.
b. Understanding your choices
Here are some of the ways we communicate with you and the choices you have to limit these communications.
How we communicate with you
Your choices about how we communicate with you differ depending on the purpose of the message and how it is delivered.
If you use our services to pay for goods and services, we may contact you via email, telephone, or send you paper mail. We do this when we reply to a message from you or when we have to communicate with you to comply with a law or other obligation. These messages contain important information and you may not opt out of receiving them.
If you are an existing merchant using our services so your customers can pay you, we may contact you using a telephone, email, text, paper mail, and send notifications to your merchant dashboard to help manage your account, deliver important information to you, and market our products and services.
If you are a merchant inquiring about our payment services, we may contact you via email or telephone to market our products and services and answer questions you may have about how our services work.
Depending on how we send the marketing communications, you can either click the unsubscribe link in any marketing email, opt out of a text message by replying “STOP,” or turn off notifications on your device to stop receiving these types of messages.
3. The personal data we collect
We may collect your personal data when you visit our websites, create a merchant account, or use our payment services to buy or sell goods and services.
Here are the kinds of personal data that we may collect when you use our services to purchase goods and services or contact us:
Information that identifies you, for example:
First and last name
Shipping address
IP address
Information collected from cookies or other tracking technologies
Records and financial information, for example:
Credit and debit card information
Commercial information, for example:
Transaction information
Internet or network activity, for example:
Interactions with our services
Geolocation information, for example:
IP-based geolocation
Audio, electronic, visual, or similar information, for example:
Call recordings when you talk to customer service
Information we infer based on your personal data, for example:
Fraud and risk assessments
Here are the kinds of personal data that we may collect when you inquire about our services, create a merchant account with us, or use our services so your customers can pay you. This may also include the personal data of your employees:
Information that identifies you, for example:
First and last name
IP address
Information collected from cookies or other tracking technologies
Records and financial information, for example:
National identification Number
Government-issued identification
Bank account and routing numbers
Personal characteristics, for example:
Age
Internet or network activity, for example:
Interactions with our services or websites
Geolocation data, for example:
IP-based geolocation
Audio, electronic, visual, or similar information, for example:
Call recordings when you call us
Photo IDs
Professional or employment information, for example:
Business information, contact emails and phone numbers
Tax IDs
Information we infer based on your personal data, for example:
Fraud and risk assessments
Here are the kinds of personal data that we may collect when you visit our websites:
Information that may identify you, for example:
IP address
Email address
Information collected from cookies or other tracking technologies
Internet or network activity, for example:
Interactions with our services or websites
Information we infer based on your data, for example:
Fraud and risk assessments
4. Where personal data comes from
We may collect personal information about you from various sources, for example from:
Website visitors and those who inquire about our services
Merchants and their employees
Your customers when they pay you using our services
Our payment partners, such as card networks and payment processors
Credit bureaus
Service providers, such as companies that help us manage risk and fraud, deliver services to you, and market our services
a. How we use tracking technologies
We or our authorized service providers may use cookies and similar tracking technologies to collect data whenever you use our services, visit our websites, or visit websites that offer our services. The information collected with these technologies helps us deliver our services, measure the effect of our ads, prevent fraud and enhance the security of our websites and service.
You can disable or decline some cookies for our websites and services. But, since some parts of our service rely on cookies to work, those services could become difficult or impossible to use.
To learn how to opt-out of this kind of tracking technology, visit
About Ads
.
5. Why we collect personal data
We collect personal data for many reasons, including to improve your experience, and to run our business. Let’s look at some specific reasons why we collect your personal data.
If you use our services to pay for goods and services or contact us, we may use your information for our legitimate interests to:
Communicate with you when you need us, such as answering a question you sent to our customer service team.
Run our websites and provide payment processing services.
Manage and improve our business.
Protect you from risk and fraud.
Comply with laws.
If you are a merchant (or the merchant’s employee) who use our services so your customer can pay you, we may use your information to fulfill our contract with you and for our legitimate interests to:
Communicate with you when you need us, such as answering a question you sent to our customer service team.
Run our websites and provide services, for example to verify access to your account and enable payment processing.
Manage and improve our business.
Protect our business and our customers from risk and fraud.
Market our products and services.
Personalize your experience when you use our websites and services.
Contact you when you need us, such as answering a question you sent to our customer service team.
Comply with laws and enforce our agreements with you and other people who use our services.
If you visit our websites or inquire about our services, we may use your information in our legitimate interests to:
Communicate with you when you need us, such as answering a question you sent to our customer service team.
Manage everyday business needs.
Protect our business and our customers from risk and fraud.
Analyze and improve our services.
Market our products and services.
Comply with laws.
6. How and why we share personal data
We do not sell your personal data. However, we may share data across our services and with other members of the PayPal corporate family. Sometimes we also share the personal data we collect with third parties to help us provide services, protect our customers from risk and fraud, market our products to merchants and those who inquire about our services, and comply with legal obligations.
You can review the kinds of personal data that we may share by reviewing
The personal data we collect
section.
We may share personal data with:
Other members of the PayPal corporate family
Merchants to help us manage risk, fraud and to help provide us with information to effectively communicate with you to meet our legal obligations
Service providers that help us with processing payments, marketing, research, compliance, audits, corporate governance, communications, and security
Card networks and payment processors
Courts, governments, regulators and law enforcement when accompanied by a subpoena or other legal documentation that requires PayPal or members of our corporate family to respond
Third-party tools used to help fight spam and abuse.
Other third parties to:
Comply with laws
Investigate or enforce violations of our user agreement
Facilitate a merger, purchase, or sale of part or all of our business
Comply with card association rules
To prevent physical harm or illegal activity
7. How we protect your personal data
Helping to keep your personal data safe against loss, misuse, unauthorized access, disclosure, and alteration is our top priority.
To protect your personal data, we use technical, physical, and administrative security measures that include:
Firewalls
Data encryption
Physical access controls at our data centers
While we protect our systems and services, you’re responsible for keeping your password(s) and account information private. Also, you’re responsible for making sure your personal information is accurate and up to date.
8. How long do we keep your personal data
We retain personal data for the time necessary to fulfil your request and our legal obligations. We may maintain personal data for longer periods if it is our legitimate business interests and not prohibited by law. If you no longer use our services, we may keep your personal data and other information as required by law and according to our data retention policy. If we do, we’ll continue to handle it as we describe in this statement.
9. How and where we transfer your personal data
Our operations are supported by a network of computers, cloud-based servers, and other infrastructure and information technology, including, but not limited to, third-party service providers.
The parties mentioned above may be established in jurisdictions other than your own and outside the European Economic Area and Switzerland. These countries do not always afford an equivalent level of privacy protection. We have taken specific steps, in accordance with EEA data protection law, to protect your Personal Data. In particular, for transfers of your Personal Data within PayPal related companies, we rely on Binding Corporate Rules approved by competent Supervisory Authorities (
available here
). Other transfers may be based on contractual protections. Please contact us for more information about this.
If you make transactions with parties outside the EEA or Switzerland or connect our Service with platforms, such as social media, outside the EEA or Switzerland, we are required to transfer your Personal Data with those parties in order to provide the requested Service to you.
10. How this statement changes over time
We’ll make changes to this privacy statement from time to time. This helps us stay up to date with changes to our business and the most current laws. After a new version is published, we’ll collect, store, use, and protect your personal data as we outline in that revised statement.
If the new version reduces your rights or increases your responsibilities, we’ll post it on the
Policy Updates or Privacy Statement
page of our website at least 21 days before it becomes effective.
We may also notify you about these changes through email or other communications.
11. Children’s privacy
Our services are for a general audience and are not directed at individuals under the age of majority. We do not knowingly collect information from children and individuals who are not legally able to use our services. If we realize that information has been collected from a child, we will move to promptly delete it, unless we are legally required to keep this information. You can help us by informing us if you believe that we have unintentionally collected information from a child, please contact us.
12. Contact Us
If you wish to learn more about our privacy practices, exercise your rights, or have questions about this Privacy Statement, please contact us following the instructions below. You can exercise your rights whether you use PayPal services or Braintree services (card payments made on a merchant’s website) by visiting
PayPal’s website
, and submitting your inquiry using the contact information provided in our privacy statement.
Users have the right to lodge a complaint with the Supervisory Authority for data protection in their country, should they find that we did not appropriately address their question or concern.
Our Data Protection Officer can be reached at PayPal (Europe) S.à r.l. et Cie, S.C.A., 22-24 Boulevard Royal L-2449, Luxembourg.
13. Additional Information
Banking Regulations Notice for Customers in the EEA
In general, the Luxembourg laws to which PayPal’s handling of user data is subject (data protection and bank secrecy) require a higher degree of transparency than most other EU laws. This is why, unlike the vast majority of providers of internet-based services or financial services in the EU, PayPal has listed in this Privacy Statement the third party service providers and business partners to whom we may disclose your data, together with the purpose of disclosure and type of information disclosed. You will find a link to those third parties
here
. By accepting this Privacy Statement and maintaining an account with PayPal, you expressly consent to the transfer of your data to those third parties for the purposes listed.
PayPal may update the list of third parties referred to above every quarter (January 1st, April 1st, July 1st and October 1st). PayPal will only start transferring any data to any of the new entities or for the new purposes or data types indicated in each update after 30 days from the date when that list is made public through this Privacy Statement. You should review the list each quarter on the PayPal website on the dates stated above. If you do not object to the new data disclosure, within 30 days after the publication of the updated list of third parties, you are deemed to have accepted the changes to the list and to this Privacy Statement. If you do not agree with the changes, you may close your account and stop using our services.
In order to provide the PayPal Services, certain of the information we collect (as set out in this Privacy Statement) may be required to be transferred to other PayPal related companies or other entities, including those referred to in this section in their capacity as payment providers, payment processors or account holders (or similar capacities). You acknowledge that according to their local legislation, such entities may be subject to laws, regulations, inquiries, investigations, or orders which may require the disclosure of information to the relevant authorities of the relevant country. Your use of the PayPal Services constitutes your consent to our transfer of such information to provide you the PayPal Services.
Specifically, you consent to and direct PayPal to do any and all of the following with your information:
a. Disclose necessary information to: the police and other law enforcement agencies; security forces; competent governmental, intergovernmental or supranational bodies; competent agencies, departments, regulatory authorities, self-regulatory authorities or organisations (including, without limitation, the Agencies referenced in the “Agencies” section of the Third Party Provider List here) and other third parties, including PayPal Group companies, that (i) we are legally compelled and permitted to comply with, including but without limitation the Luxembourg laws of 24 July 2015 on the US Foreign Account Tax Compliance Act (“FATCA Law”) and 18 December 2015 on the OECD common reporting standard (“CRS Law”); (ii) we have reason to believe it is appropriate for us to cooperate with in investigations of fraud or other illegal activity or potential illegal activity, or (iii) to conduct investigations of violations of our User Agreement (including without limitation, your funding source or credit or debit card provider).
If you are covered by the FATCA or CRS Law, we are required to give you notice of the information about you that we may transfer to various authorities. Please read more about PayPal's obligations under the FATCA and CRS Law and how they could affect you as well as take note of the information we may disclose as result.
We and other organisations, including parties that accept PayPal, may also share, access and use (including from other countries) necessary information (including, without limitation the information recorded by fraud prevention agencies) to help us and them assess and to manage risk (including, without limitation, to prevent fraud, money laundering and terrorist financing). Please contact us if you want to receive further details of the relevant fraud prevention agencies. For more information on these Agencies, fraud prevention agencies and other third parties, click
here
.
b. Disclose Account Information to intellectual property right owners if under the applicable national law of an EU member state they have a claim against PayPal for an out-of-court information disclosure due to an infringement of their intellectual property rights for which PayPal Services have been used (for example, but without limitation, Sec. 19, para 2, sub-section 3 of the German Trademark Act or Sec. 101, para 2, sub-section 3 of the German Copyright Act).
c. Disclose necessary information in response to the requirements of the credit card associations or a civil or criminal legal process.
d. If you as a merchant use a third party to access or integrate PayPal, we may disclose to any such partner necessary information for the purpose of facilitating and maintaining such an arrangement (including, without limitation, the status of your PayPal integration, whether you have an active PayPal account and whether you may already be working with a different PayPal integration partner).
e. Disclose necessary information to the payment processors, auditors, customer services providers, credit reference and fraud agencies, financial products providers, commercial partners, marketing and public relations companies, operational services providers, group companies, agencies, marketplaces and other third parties listed
here
. The purpose of this disclosure is to allow us to provide PayPal Services to you. We also set out in the list of third parties, under each " Category", non-exclusive examples of the actual third parties (which may include their assigns and successors) to whom we currently disclose your Account Information or to whom we may consider disclosing your Account Information, together with the purpose of doing so, and the actual information we disclose (except as explicitly stated, these third parties are limited by law or by contract from using the information for secondary purposes beyond the purposes for which the information was shared).
f. Disclose necessary information to your agent or legal representative (such as the holder of a power of attorney that you grant, or a guardian appointed for you).
g. Disclose aggregated statistical data with our business partners or for public relations. For example, we may disclose that a specific percentage of our users live in Manchester. However, this aggregated information is not tied to personal information.
h. Share necessary Account Information with unaffiliated third parties (listed
here
) for their use for the following purposes:
Fraud Prevention and Risk Management: to help prevent fraud or assess and manage risk. For example, if you use the PayPal Services to buy or sell goods using eBay Inc, or its affiliates (“eBay”), we may share Account Information with eBay in order to help protect your accounts from fraudulent activity, alert you if we detect such fraudulent activity on your accounts, or evaluate credit risk.
As part of our fraud prevention and risk management efforts, we also may share necessary Account Information with eBay in cases where PayPal has placed a hold or other restriction on your account based on disputes, claims, chargebacks or other scenarios regarding the sale or purchase of goods. Also, as part of our fraud prevention and risk management efforts, we may share Account Information with eBay to enable them to operate their programmes for evaluating buyers or sellers.
Customer Service: for customer service purposes, including to help service your accounts or resolve disputes (e.g., billing or transactional).
Shipping: in connection with shipping and related services for purchases made using PayPal.
Legal Compliance: to help them comply with anti-money laundering and counter-terrorist financing verification requirements.
Service Providers: to enable service providers under contract with us to support our business operations, such as fraud prevention, bill collection, marketing, customer service and technology services. Our contracts dictate that these service providers only use your information in connection with the services they perform for us and not for their own benefit.